GET HYPE!After seeing that I REALLY wish, and will be going with head cannon from now on that Frank Underwood is HYDRA too. 

The line about soft old HYDRA mistaking symbols for power is just like Frank's Money vs Power line from House of Cards: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LYnnm3L12fA

My God we need Kevin Spacey to do a guest role on AoS now! 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=EDi7cRFcnnY

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3iw3x8vNYE0

Tell me you dont want him as the new political face of HYDRA, too well connected to be outed, or too smooth to be caught.

Or maybe as a twist, he really isnt connected, but the political power behind the ATCU.Going after a super powered killer monster and the team is a powered white guy, powered white girl, and unpowered black guy.

I think its reasonable for Mack to have some concerns here. NEXT UP: The University of Georgia Squidbillies! To alos expand. Not every school is adding the COA value to their scholarships. 

The only group doing it en mass so far is the "Power 5" Conferences, the SEC, ACC, Pac12, Big10 and Big12, the largest most affluent schools and about 70 of the 130 in Division I sports. 

The NCAA had previously barred schools from doing even that, but the ruling and internal NCAA reform means that the P5 can make a lot of decisions for themselves now. They also passed legislation that removes limits on how much free food and meal plans schools can give athletes. 

So you have the 70 biggest enforcing the new additional value on themselves, and the rest of the NCAA can do it if they want, so some schools that want to or can afford it like Cincinnati or Boise State or East Carolina have announced they are including it but their peers in the lower half of Division I int he NCAA are not required to. 

NIL payments had been seen as a separate issue with the amount or ratio to be decided but he courts as each school calculates the COA value for students themselves, but the Appeals Court obviously saw a COA padded full scholarship as fair compensation for a Basketball or Football player. 

Its basically the Wild West out there. And the COA value addition is already in place, and has been since January for the Power 5 conferences. 

Which is only a few grand more a year for beer money, snack food, and some sweet new Jordans if you want. Hell just have the team's account retweet the "original gator hater clips" thatd be good enough for me!Sorry, re-reading the original post I DID miss interpret one of your comments, so I was writing to answer the wrong question. 

And I think we are in agreement more then we are in disagreement.

I think the best discussion at this point is since the game essentially forces us into distances where contact by both visual or radar is imminent, how do we model or give some flair for the nations which chose one of the other since broadly speaking the Axis nations leaned heavily on visual fire control and spotting while the Allies went with radar.  The problem is we have basically 1 surface engagement for IJN capitol ships in the entire war. The action of Leyte is for all intents and purposes one of only 2 times IJN warships engage surface targets in daylight. And even then we dont have them fighting enemy heavy surface actions, or scoring confirmed reliably attested hits above 20-24k yards. 

The other being Java Sea, which its doubtful anyone or any circumstances could have led the hodgepodge Allied squadron to anything but defeat given the circumstances. And even then the fleets sighted each other in the later afternoon, and fought until near midnight. And was of course a smashing IJN victory. 

Basically every other fight Sundra Strait, Cape Esperance, Tassforanga, Cape St George, Kula Gulf, Surigao and the scattering of actions around Guadalcanal in the fall of '42 were all night actions.  

And the IJN gave as good as it got in many of them (Tassa and Savo Island of course being the standouts), obviously skewing better in the actions involving light units and playing to their strengths. 

So its a bit miss interpreting to say that the IJN ruled by Day and the US by night when &gt;90% of the surface actions took place after dark and were victories for both sides.

If anything it shows that the game is UNDER representing just how dangerous air power is to warships, making surface actions ONLY viable at night when any aircraft could be present. And dammit WG we need night maps! I mean they got Edward James Olmos, its been a few years since Battlestar ended but I dont imagine he comes particularly cheap either. Both Neptunes Inferno by Hornfischer and First Team at Guadalcanal by Lundstrum make it quite clear that no squadron level training was conducted by the USN before the war for night fighting, limited to individual gunnery drills at most for the ships.  

So if you have something contradicting it would love to read it, Lundstrum was writing in the 80's and Hornfischer is not a historian by trade so I would be willing to believe both were off the mark. See other response. 

The two hard sources I have on hand, both point out the lack of practical squadron level night training, or night preparations in general beyond individual ship gunnery drills. And Fischer even critiques the pre war Fleet Problems for lacking hard en mass night operations as opposed to the Combined Fleet's drills.Another consideration is that there just arent that many easily accessed sources of Tin anywhere in the new world.

Tin while by itself is sort of useless, it is necessary for the making of Bronze when in an alloy with copper. Meaning that metallurgy took a different turn int he Americas as compared to Europe. 

The Central and South American cultures had marvelously advanced metallurgy of things like gold and silver, since they lacked the raw materials needed for large scale production of things like Bronze. Though certain cultures did even learn to work iron, in particular some Inuit cultures gathered it from meteorites and worked it for their needs. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QuDDiRN-9TA

They could literally copy paste the first scene too, as him as the older less crazy version of a mentor for Ward, teach him to be a real leader not just a man with a talent for violence. Yes, Ellis's former VP, one Frank Underwood. They are incredibly Limited usefulness though. 

They dont do the job of a regular carrier or airplane better enough to justify the risks involved in combining them. 

A cannon is a poor tool when a missile with hit it from farther away and can turn. And if you are getting close enough for artillery to be a tool, why risk losing your air wing with the artillery, splitting them up means you can at most lose one at a time. 

If you want to hide you need to be cloaked, which then means you cant fire or conduct air ops, so a whole lot of good you are doing compared to a more conventional asset. 

Its really hard to conduct flight ops with 150mph crosswinds or everyone needing to wear oxygen masks.

The nice thing about a ship is that if it sinks or you fall off you likely survive, not so with one up in the air. AND how did SHIELD afford an entire seagoing carrier on top of it themselves too!http://www.msha.gov/District/Dist_01/History/history.htm

Supposedly it has become quite scarce in Northern/Central Appalachia, it peaked at +100 million tons in 1917, down to less than 5 million tons in the 90's according to the Mine Safety and Health Administration website.  Same with Pitt@VT.

Blacksburg set a record for 1 say rainfall on Monday. But the New River has been handling the influx well and besides some flooding on the Drill Field it isnt an emergency yet.

So in general games we could see effected, ND@Clem, Mich@UMD, FSU@WF, Temple@Charlotte, Pitgt@VT, Lville@NCST, AF@Navy, BC@Duke and ODU@Marshall

Well ACC brethren, hope you brought your water wings!Last time the Aggies visited Blacksburg was a good Hurricane game IIRC back in the early 2000's. 20 college players died during the 1905 season, then the President got involved and reformed the game, and not a one died the next year.

We are at the point where it needs another round of reforms. To expand a bit, from the very get go, the US did its damnedest to establish that they were going to be partner#1 and the British partner #2. 

Even the prewar meetings between Churchill and FDR occurred on our side of the Atlantic, and the first formal meeting of the leaders and their military staffs, the ARCADIA conference occurred just 2 weeks after Pearl Harbor, again in the US in and around Washington. 

Besides just some generic formalizing of the alliance, and confirming to a Europe First as soon as the bleeding stopped int eh Pacific, a key factor was that it established the Combined Chiefs of Staff as the military leadership of the alliance, and that it would be Headquartered in the US, with British representation, over requests for either 2 bodies, or a London HQ from the British. Some old Czarist BB's, CL's and DD's. A British BB, a few US CL's, a few slapped together Soviet DD's and CLs. And a German CA they bought and then never finished, wonderful.

And if we want to go post war an Italian BB they got as compensation and then never did anything with. HAS ANYONE TOLD SOUVLAKI ABOUT THIS THOUGH!?!?I dont think we have a problem with a lack of BC classes, we FOR SURE have enough to get to tier 6/7 for the UK and Germans, and Japanese if we retool their BB line a bit. Since BC's were built all the way until after WW1 and 6/7 is where that stops for the most part. 

After that we would need to go paper, but even then we have options like the US Original LEXINGTON designs. 

So I say that while late game there wont be tons, mid and low tiers there is an abundance of classes of BC's that can be used without detracting from any nation's BB line, so your assertion is False. I suspect eventually, maybe Germany and the UK get them instead of 2nd CV lines?

For every BB class prior to and during WW1 both nations built a BC class for every BB class they had. So you have incremental easy to model tierd lines, and then the smattering of real and paper post war designs.

Becuase colleges are not your normal business, and not all colleges do it.

Its basically just PUBLIC or state schools which make the distinction. Private schools can charge whatever they want and often do. 

Its because as a prerequisite to receive the state money the Governor and State legislature make the schools charge less.

As for why it isnt discrimination its because state of residence is NOT considered a protected class, while race is, so it is up to the states themselves if they want to add it, and very few do. You are free to move and establish residency in a new state, you arent able to move and change your genetic race. 

Its a net positive as it compels states to look to their own internal higher education systems to improve them, not just sponge off of neighboring states, raising the level of education and opportunity everywhere. Until you want to carry anything or anyone that is. Why would you want to fire him? SOMEBODY has to wear their dad's oversize dress shirt to their first job interview, and besides do you know another FBS coach who can sell his team a used car and do their taxes for them? To pass a new Amendment it would require the proposed addition to pass both the Senate and House with 2/3's majorities. 

Then 3/4's of the states have to approve it for it to be added.

The process is basically only meant to be possible for minor straight forward process improvements like the date the President is sworn in, or major social movements with overwhelming support. There is no such well defined movement that could win the needed legislative battles when it comes to firearms possession in the US currently. 

You also dont "overwrite" an Amendment, you add anew one negating it. Thats why there is still the 18th making alcohol production and sale illegal, and the 21st making it legal again.  Even if it passed Congress it still isnt a sure thing, you need 3/4ths of the states to say yes too. If you assume that Mike London is ACTUALLY, VIOLENTLY allergic to success, a lot more of his decisions make sense. Nope. 

The ACCCG record is 4-6 currently to the Atlantic, since the 2004 shift its 5-6 in ACC titles, thats one game away from the divisions having won equal championships. 

From 2007 till 2011 the Coastal won it every year, people werent calling for change when it was 4-2 Coastal. 

Both divisions just have had multi year runs.Going into 2011 the record was 4-2 in favor of the Coastal. So your name should be "Partial ACC Fan" is what yourre saying? And we contributed to BOTH those figures along with Miami!Yep, I did sort of word it weirdly. The 5-6 being if we include VT winning it in the last year of round robin before the title game since it was basically all the same schools anyway just waiting on BC. I dont think we are going to see a run again of either school winning it 3-4 times back to back basically again.

The coaching level in the divisions is starting to balance out, whoever Beamer is replaced by is likely going to be a name winner, Narduzzi is up at Pitt, PJ isnt going away, thats at least as much of a brain trust as in the Atlantic. Exactly, where is YOUR G5 loss GT, nerds be slacking #ALLCANESCONFERENCE!!!I laughed

I cried

I Laughed again!I don't see why not, they happened.

My larger point is that thanks to the 2004 Realignment the ACC got much more competitive than many people on the outside seem to think just based ont he past 2/3 years. Its also definitive, you have to beat your division to be in the ACCCG, very rare is it possible to say the best team in the division isn't in the game. There are a few remaining states in the US that don't actually require a degree either.

Virginia is one where if you apprentice for a number of years under a lawyer and pass the bar you are good. The trick is that you aren't allowed to be paid while apprenticing so its rarely used today. What wheel is the title spoilering? Is he on a ship, a golf cart? Is he a racecar driver now? So what is being spoiled by the phrase? If you have A team, not teamS. Since 2010...

So our last ACC title, and when we got the conferences FIRST At-Large Bid? Agreed, it is incredibly unlikely and the new rules should help, but be careful about going overboard on rules, have you seen the tie breaker rules the ACC has now? Its bad. True and it blows, but such is life, football existed before him, we will find our way after him.

But my larger point was that we were still had 11 win seasons the first 2 years of the data, so its unfair to put the downturn on us as much as other schools, we did our part. There is actually a rule where in the end the ACC will pick a name out of a hat to name a divisional winner: https://www.reddit.com/r/CFB/comments/3muk83/updated_acc_tiebreaker/I would be ok with it too, as it would mean the dream of an entire Coastal of 4-4 teams would have come True. Membership includes VT, Miami, Lville, BC, Cuse, and Pitt so that checks out. 

Seriously of the 20 BE Conference championships, 13 of them are now represented in the ACC. I mean 13 of the 20 BE Championships ARE in the ACC now. Ok we will just include Lville and Cuse with you then. Wars do NOT occur in a vacuum, they are as Cluasewitz put it "Politics by other means"

Wars are waged for political goals, even if they can be poorly defined at times. Thus there is a desired endsate, and a state intends to keep existing and doping the other things governments do after the war.

But if they were to allienate themselves from all the other nations, even if it meant they didnt get invovled actively it would make t that much harder for the state to keep going after the war. 

That is one of the reasons that states abide typically by "rules of war" it means they are showing they are not unreasonable, and can exist as part of an international community and framework(despite the war, war of course, and the ability to monopolize state violence being one of the defining traits of a state).

Then of course is the fact that wars can be lost, and even if not lost become very costly, agreeing to abde by some standards means that if you are working with a rational enemy then it minimizes risk on both sides. Case in point, even though the 3rd Reich did ghastly things they never used poison gas on the battlefield in WW2, the Allies had said they did not wish to either, so long as Germany did not, and it actually worked that both sides avoided its use, preventing the horrid conflict from becoming even more terrible. 
Most every nation had manned small underwater craft, while the Japanese went more literal with it, the Italians and British used them to sneak demolition and frogmen into ports and even attempted to attack the Tirpitz once. 

So it is plenty appropriate to class manned torpedoes as their own type as opposed to unmanned traditional types which could be fired from a ship or plane.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chariot_manned_torpedo

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Neger&gt; Most every nation had manned small underwater craft, while the Japanese went more literal with it, the Italians and British used them to sneak demolition and frogmen into ports and even attempted to attack the Tirpitz once. 
&gt; 
&gt; So it is plenty appropriate to class manned torpedoes as their own type as opposed to unmanned traditional types which could be fired from a ship or plane.
&gt; 
&gt; https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chariot_manned_torpedo
&gt; 
&gt; https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Neger

My other response. I think manned torpedoes can easily be said to be a separate class from unmanned.

If only from the fact that manned weapons could not be launched the same was as traditional ones. Nor were they supposed to, standard practice for the US at least was that once the Division Leader brought them into the final run the planes would either be staggered line ahead, or more usually line abreast, and that each individual plane would be free to maneuver independently to avoid AAA and then line up the best shot they could. Main cast member appearing in episode of show. Fucking shocking. Whats everyone's current shows?

The new season of Agents of SHIELD had a pretty good premier I thought.

And so far season 2 ofGotham has been more hit than miss compared to season 1. And neither are you, the mods have not removed, ergo it is not being considered as a spoiler and thus not against the rules of the sub.

Once concern is definitely deck space.

While the Harriers and F-35's are an important component of the air group, their first and primary mission is to get Marines ashore by air and sea. So a Ski ramp could theoretically take away 1/4 of the space they could be using to operate flight operations with helicopters at the max rate possible. So in general I think GC is a shitty blog and a distant 3rd behind Key Play and Tech Sideline, and I want to address some of the complaints they make and see if they are Beamer's fault or if they just want to stir the pot.

&gt; You are losing the student body.

The presumption being that winning would bring them back. that is 100% quantifiable bullshit and just about everyone on the sub knows it. When Nick Saban has to call out students for not being there, when do we say that individual coaches only do so much and that dropping attendance is a sport wide issue that it is. 

&gt; Your teams aren't winning because you haven't recruited the best talent.

Where was this complain in the past decade, the trends haven't changed, VT traditionally pulls about 1/3 - 1/2 of the top kids in Virginia and has for 20 years. This is NOT a team full of 2* kids, there are +30 4*s and of course Fuller is still on the roster, the 4th 5 star since 2000, not great, but the team did not suddenly lose all its talent. Hell we just signed our highest rated QB recruit since Tyrod Taylor in Lawson. 

&gt; Frank, you have too much power. 

What? Do we not remember the Military Bowl not one year ago? Ya know when the coach wasn't even at practice after a throat surgery, and the Assistant were just fine. When Frank wasn't even on the sideline and Shane was the HC on the field and we did great? If he wasn't already delegating, and had been doing so as an ongoing culture would the team have done that well? Not likely. 

So the continuing poorly researched, poorly screened, and over all shitty work GC has always put out. 

EDIT: also this line "Frank, it's time to go.  I mean go NOW."

So you would intentionally tank the season? You would intentionally make it as messy as possible? You would throw a DC who has never held HC responsibilities into the fire while also game planning week to week instead of a clean start with months to get ready? THAT is what is the best course for the team. Look at Bowden's last year, yes he announced it early, but he didn't leave immediately, and the players banded together and fought to a bowl win. Something tells me we wouldn't turn into the Lane Kiffin/Coach O of this year, Orgeron had legitimate HC experience and knew what it was like, Bud is amazing but he shouldn't be asked to do that while also fixing an under performing Defense at the same time. 

EDIT: 2.0

&gt; There also seems to be a real conditioning issue somewhere because our injury rates to lower bodies are atrocious.

Look at ND, or TCU and tell me we have an injury problem, we have had just 2 starters down for the year, and 1 for a month. TCU is up to 7! Look at those schools and tell me top teams don't also suffer injuries, it is a fact of life in the sport, and while it sucks especially the Brewer and Fuller injuries it is not some anomaly, nor is it an indictment on the HC for allowing such a rash of injuries. 

EDIT the Third: 

 I think if we enter Nov with less than 6 wins I would want him to announce that he is done after the bowl, if we go into the last 3 games with a real shot at 10 wins, and win the bowl, well lets see how we shake out. 

Either way we have 5 games between now and Nov 1. 3-2 is the WORST we could do in them for me to be confident that we will be ok. 

There are legitimate reasons for Beamer to call it a day, and since August many of them have trended more towards sooner rather than after 2016, but we are also still a team that is at .500 without an ACC loss and our main rival in GT is now 0-1 in the ACC already.
Most likely limited regional power projection.

But that is still a shift from their current force structure and posture. Until now the vast majority of their force projection and amphibious assault capabilities were focused on how to get to Taiwan.

And while not global the East Indies, East Africa, India, and Polynesia are all well within the range of potential deployments. 

One thing to consider is that with only 2 it is likely at most 1 will be operational at a time, ships this big require tons of yard time and maintenance between deployments. 

The US has 12 carriers in order to keep 4 on deployment. Looks very promising, and eagerly awaiting the report and how it goes!

Looks like some other very promising presentations too.

Some that stood out: 

A War of Words: Academics and the Military Establishment in the Age of Terror #26

Crisis at the National Archives: A Discussion of Issues and Options #18

Nation Building in the Borderlands: Anglo-Scottish Relations in the Frontier, 1553\u20131603 #13

Model and Mirror: Civil-Military Relations in the Late Austro-Hungarian Empire #59

Interpreting Reconstruction in the National Parks #251

in large part, but it is also hampered by how CV's are portrayed in game.

For instance the speeds relative between ships and planes are pretty messed up with planes being slower than they should be in game for the most part. 

We also have the fact that the AAA mounts are reduced compared to what they would have peaked at IRL. Which while not a deal breaker is something to consider. 

Finally we also have how the air groups are portrayed in game, the result being that most CV's have fewer planes than they should. Fore example while with replacements the Lexington's aircraft total comes up to close to her 70-80 plane historical total. That they are not all in the air at once is a hindrance from their historic potency. While some would be used for scouting (primarily Dive bombers) strikes could include a large portion of the air wing and the idea was to get as many planes airborne as possible if you had spotted the enemy so you aren't caught with your pants down. 

For instance on the first day of the Coral Sea Lexington's Strike Group consisted of 10 Wildcats, 2 dozen Dive bombers, and a dozen Torp bombers with another 6 Wildcats, and 2 dozen DB's on CAP over the ship or on search missions. 
 That could be good.

The law firm gets a call, un named voice asks them to consult on an issue of great importance(become super hero prosecutors for the Dept of Justice maybe?)

Get told a car will be outside shortly to pick them up and hangs up.

House of Cards theme starts playing as a black Escalade pulls up, window goes down and its Underwood inside, maybe still in the House since Ellis is still POTUS. While not tracking CFB players, they are tracking the future and seeking to establish how early issues arise and what impacts are doing even before college, Wake Forest and Brown are also partners in the study. 

Should be an important analysis as the discussion on how to reform and improve the sport with an eye towards sustainability goes forward. The NBA and NHL have international teams and they seem to be getting on just fine. For short to medium range the US feels relatively confident in their anti ICBM system built around the AEGIS weapons system and Standard Missile. They have even tested it with shooting down multiple satellites that were broken or old. 

The SM-3 is the model and currently deployed aboard USN and Japanese warships.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/RIM-161_Standard_Missile_3For shorter range threats the SM-3 aboard the Navy's Burke and allied AEGIS equipped warships is a pretty impressive system, and seems from all reports to be a promising weapon to fight threats eventually up to orbit. The Navy's SM-3 has even successfully shot down satellites as practical tests of its ability to hit objects in reentry. For once this game is going to depend on if the Defense shows up.

The Hokie offense has somehow become potent over 3 weeks. 

Even after ECU the Hokies have put up +400 yds of offense for 3 consecutive weeks for the first time since Tyrod Taylor in 2010!

Isaih Ford is leading the ACC in catch yards, let me say that again, A HOKIE WR IS LEADING THE ACC. What a time to be alive, with our backup QB. Its not even close he has 361, the next guy has 300. 

Now its time to see what the secondary has done with a week to adjust without Fuller. Both sides ABSOLUTELY need to cut down on the penalties as well. WOOOO RON CHERRY!! THIS JUST GOT INTERESTING PEOPLEhttp://mediatechnologycenter.info/ho1.php?channel=sacola33&amp;crn=836734488.2648847which one, the whole scrteen is your flash one?Attendance guess 2/3rds at most it looks? Well im stressing so I guess that means these Narduzzi/Bud-Beamer games will be fun as long as they last. Yea the Pitt band section is clear, top looks empty, maybe if we spread the Corps around it would look more full.not for nothing but there were plenty og games VT has won with that little offense through the half.How far are the schools from each other? Even with the struggles there seem like there is a smaller UT fan turnout than I would have thought. As the other poster mentioned for most of the past 20 years the BCS system made heavy use of multiple computer polls. 

But each unique algorithm favored certain styles of play, or certain teams with quirky schedules or lucky breaks with their opponents.

There is no "Unbiased" Computer poll possible since there is no real value of the transitive property when you have 128 teams involved, and even opponent's winning percentage is a messy factor to use.  It also not like the committee isnt USING stats.

ESPN has a privet contract to provide all the stats the members ask for. They can see which teams have the highest opponent win rate, or who has the highest opponent adjusted Pass Def Efficiency. Yes, part of Obama's platform in 2008 and 2012 was on getting American troops OUT of the Middle East, and taking more of a supporting role. You see a guy driving on the road, you cant see inside the truck, you dont have the fuel to follow him all day, and you see he has a gun, s he a terrorist, or just a guy who wants to be able to protect himself? Yes, that is as much as the US govt wants to and is willing to help. 

Each bomb can be up to 1.5 MILLION US dollars to drop so that is a large commitment of money and resources. Thats why real nations like Russia, wear uniforms, to make it clear who they are.for whatever reason the 42k active duty isnt included. http://www.uscg.mil/top/about/doc/uscg_snapshot.pdfDONT YOU DO IT HOKIES, DONT GET Y HOPES UPJesus Frank said in the post game that on +2 times when kicking with only 10 guys out there.The ship is leaking amd there are no easy answers. 

Would Frank saying this is it? Not sure. On a short week not likely. Would it improve possible names? IDK. Will Brewer be able to salvage it? Who knows but he has an injury history still.

No easy answers but after the NCST game it might be time for long honest conversations on how well the team is responding to this staff.

I was against Beamer being done till after the bowl. But if the right names are in play I trust Whit above all.Looking at our D would you trust Bud to do better if Frank called it tmrw? 

Players just not fundamental strong and Bud is NOT a strong recruiting coach.Who is really the shitty team? The team that loses or the team that wins?I would pump the breaks on a UT blow out. Bitch Jones is rapidly wearing out his welcome. Demote him to QB only. Give Sereals play calling if he wants.  Best pedigree of any of our coaches on O.This week, this is the same group with 3 Freshman and Soph's who put up the last 3 weeks.

The man has been hired by Miles, Saban, Richt, and Mack Brown. If anyone has it in them to figure it out on that side Id take him. When he is a True Fr and had been the 3rd String/ Scout guy until 3 weeks ago.

Seriously 07 Tyrod probably had more time to run with the 1's than Lawson.NCST got beat 20-13 by Lville, so we might actually be on the same level. Hi Wolfpack, seems like you guys had a rough day too.

See yall Friday, hope you enjoy Blacksburg, the on field stuff though i shaping up to be pretty damn bad though. I think they could slap something together. 

But where the US and IJN seem to be eventually getting at least 2nd partial CV lines, give the Germans and the UK BC lines. Why do you assume they are the same suits you wear or buy at the store, a properly tailored suit can provide an unrestricted range of motion, and any shoes can LOOK formal. Yep, fuck us for giving a guy with a pedigree every opportunity to fix things, clearly we are the bad guys right? Pump the breaks on ST's. In the post game Frank commented that there were multiple times we had 10 guys out there for kicking...Certainly to a degree, but I mean when you know you are in a certain group or personnel grouping for ST's at some point it behooves you to know if they were called out. No argument, There are maybe 4 coaches on this staff I would even entertain keeping .

1. Sane: Controversial but he WAS a DB's coach in the SEC and recruiting coordinator for the SCAR teams that landed Clowney amongst others and was their ST coordinator under SPurrier. 

 Move him to D or make him ST's full time.

2. Sereals: Dude has the best pedigree of any coach Beamer has ever hired. 

3. Torrian Gray: Bud's #1 disciple and he WILL be a top tier DC when he wants.

I assume Wiles will hang it up when Bud does, they are just so close, so if Bud is the enxt guy or is convinced to sta maybe he does too. 

I Like Leoffler and what he can do for QB's, fuck look at him making Motley look competent against anyone, but he just isnt cut out to design an entire offense it seems. Seriously, does ANYONE want to win the Coastal? 

And BC, we will see you on Halloween, maybe we can pass the impending terrible game off as a haunted house type prank? Its not like a BDU, ACU, or other tactical jacket would be any different, its because you are wearing any type of jacket, not the material or cut.

The solution then I guess would be to send them out in t shirts?Well then...Honestly no me neither, Burden seems to be working hard to repair the 757 ties, and blocking has been better.

But I also want the new HC to feel free to build a staff he can win with. Scott Loeffler has to be the KING of doing that. RichRod is #1.

Then anyone from the pool of maybe Mark Richt if he gets sick of UGA, or PJ Fleck, Tom Herman, Chad Morris, Justin Fuente at Memphis, If Mike Riley or Charlie STrong get run off then either would be a steal!

Also not for nothing but Bo Pellini IS still out there too.

And I think in the next 12 months it would be tough to open the coffers, but we will soon have JJ's old contract off the books, Greenburg's was last Spring, and Weaver's is now no longer an issue(RIP). So even come the Spring we will have a much reduced level of debt from HR. And a new coach could definitely open up some donor check books to afford him. I actually was gong to post something in the UF post game thread. 

I will say I was very much a noted UF doubter, but that is as big a statement win as we have had this year. A losing season would do it, we just might this year. Last one was 1992 so that would be my personal tipping point. Well I was very skeptical of UF this year, did not think McElwain could do anything in the SEC in yr 1.

But kudos to him and his staff, clearly has done a good job of turning the ship around and using the pieces he had.

Enjoy it UF the team earned every bit of praise they get for this. And here it is. https://www.reddit.com/r/CFB/comments/3nesxp/post_game_thread_florida_defeats_ole_miss_3810/cvndwix

Its been a while since UF has had much to be happy about, savor it, in this sport moments like this dont come around near enoughWell fuck, at this rate the Battle at Bristol is going to be the most hyped 7-6 on 7-6 matchup in history.Has anyone considered that its the fact that an article like this even exists is part of why everyone enjoys watching Alabama lose? Besides legal protection for your job, it is considered much better and more fair to have a jury of your peers as it were, than a small closed group deciding guilt or innocence. I will say Shane needs to move from RB responsibility. He was hired and trusted by both Steve Spurrier and Hugh Freeze as DB's and ST's coaches in the SEC. You dont suck at our job and get those gigs.

He was in charge of recruiting and helped land Jadeveon Clowney at SCAR. But then he came to a square peg round hole situation with the RB's.

Hell before we fire the guy who has experince and was considered a strong recruiter in the SEC, maybe we look at the guy (Cornell Borwn) who coaches 2 players that see the field on fewer than 50% of snaps now thta we run nickle so often. Fuck that Stacy Sereal is and remains the best pedigreed coach we have hired in 20 years. 

Or were Les Miles, Nick Saban, Mark Richt, and Mack brown all wrong to hire him too? If anyone is damn near above reproach on the O staff it is him. Lets fire Cornell Brown since his spot is wasted with just 2 players, make Shane ST coordinator full time like he was for Spurrier when he turned SCAR around, and then hire a real RB coach. https://www.reddit.com/r/CFB/comments/3ndf2h/post_game_thread_pittsburgh_defeats_virginia_tech/

Dont worry you clown, a simple run down shows that the game and post game threads were perfectly full of the toxic parts of our own fan base. Personally Im surprised they went ahead with the schedule as is with the Hurricane incoming, though the video looked like the sea state/ wind wasnt too bad, just lots of rain, so not the worst it could be. If they are smart and believe in him they will hold onto him for as long as it takes if they think he can get them to an NY6 bowl.

Took our alum 6 years to even reach a bowl game and 2 years after that he beat Texas in the Sugar Bowl. No for the reasons the other posters laid out. 

Additionally you have the issue that there is no sing "British" or "American" English. 

A person from Louisiana will sound as different to somebody from New York as someone from Scotland. 

Dialects and accents do not on their own constitute separate languages. The Hospital was in Afghanistan...

AT least I assume you are referring to the Doctors Without Borders one?

It was in an Afghan provincial capitol which recently fell to a new Taliban offensive which the US was supporting the Afghan National Army in retaking. The Pentagon is building, a REALLY BIG office building. 

It serves as the main office building for the Department of Defense, which contains the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marines, Defense Intelligence Agency, the NSA, the Missile Defense Agency, DARPA, the Defense Logistics Agency, and several others. 

All of them have offices at the Pentagon, along with many other commands and groups. 

Some of the top officials like the Secretary of Defense, the service Secretaries (Secretary of the Army, etc.) and the Under Secretaries (Under Secretary of the Army for Manpower for instance) are APPOINTED by the President, the rest are serving members of the armed forces (Chief of Staff of the Army, etc.) or DoD civilian employees.

Either way the general public doesnt directly vote for anyone associated with the Pentagon except the President. The Battle at Bristol is shaping up to be the world's most attended shit show at this point. Would recommend the run that Chris Yost and Craig Kyle had. 

Essentially continuous from New x-Men #20-43 then X-Force #1-28

A lot of focus on both the younger generations of X-Men in the aftermath of the Decimation, the Messiah Complex/War/ Second Coming.

And some overarching characters like X-23 and Elixir, along with the Purifiers being a recurring foe. &gt; Battleworld the assumption is they died with the rest of the Multiverse

While likely we DO have other characters not on Battleworld which survived, Loki and Silver Surfer namely. Nothing. The two possible courts, the UN formed ICJ relies on the UN Security Council to enforce decisions, which the US has veto over.

And the US does not recognize and for the most part does not participate in the functions of the ICC, which basically also relies upon the UNSC for enforcement of decisions. It isnt, basically just a way to introduce Fitz, Simmons, and May into the 616 Universe, and then have weekly adventures. Coulson is not the Director, Maria Hill still is, while Phil and Fury Jr are basically her go to strike team leaders for SHIELD.

The bit is that Coulson(who was introduced a few years ago along with new black Nick Fury Jr.) knows the other superheros better than anyone, so he gets the exact help he needs to do the job, in this case it was Sue.

Frankly the best Coulson series is the current and previous volume of "Secret Avengers", especially an arc that has Phil deal with the fact that being a non powered non "Best at anything" guy in a suit with a hand gun is a real easy way to get PTSD, and the real heroes are the ones who are able to come to terms with that and still try to save the world. 

Plus it gives us some top notch covers like these: http://img2.wikia.nocookie.net/__cb20141119002643/marveldatabase/images/0/03/Secret_Avengers_Vol_3_13_Textless.jpg

http://orig15.deviantart.net/98c0/f/2014/016/e/f/secret_avengers__1_cover_color_by_tradd-d72et1m.jpgI mean im fairly certain they will be able to understand the concept of an empire no matter where they are from, empires aren't something only European states have, the British were just more successful than most. As /u/hillrat stated, and included the source, the HMMWV is actively being replaced.

Using lessoned learned, including the experience in Iraq and the MRAP, to build a light vehicle which is survivable and answers many of the complaints of its predecessor. 

So no the plan isn't to update the Humvee ad nauseum, the DoD has awarded the contract for its intended replacement, but production takes time. It was not a "UN" Hospital. It was an MSF one operating as a non governmental organization, in a city taken over by the Taliban, deciding to treat anyone, and without the ability to prevent militants from operating in and around the hospital. Some other notes that OP doesn't mention.

Wade McLusky was NOT a dive bomber man by trade. His career until taking over as CAG of Enterprise had been in fighter squadrons, and he had been CO of Fighting 6 aboard Enterprise, until being promoted in April of 1942.

However standard procedure for CAG's was for them to fly a Dauntless to use the additional manpower, range, and communication equipment, with 2 wingmen, he was in control of a section independent of the Scouting or Bombing Squadrons also in Dauntless's.  

In addition until the fall of 1942 the sights on the Dauntless had a poor tendency to fog over when diving through temperature and humidity changes, meaning with unfortunate regularity that the pilots aim would be hampered. Making the number of hits that WERE recoded all the more incredible. 

Also the USS SABLE mentioned is a truly unique ship. She was one of 2 shallow draft paddle wheel steamers that the Navy converted to carriers for use in training on the great Lakes, however because of her small size and slow speed, planes could only land and not takeoff, so once she was full, training had to stop for the day and the planes be unloaded at the pier. Fear not!

It in the end doesn't require too much previous knowledge, outside of a general idea that the X-Men as the mutants, in a world that hates and fears them.

So in the aftermath of the Scarlet Witch going crazy and cutting the mutant population from millions to just under 200, the first part of the run follows the remaining students of the Xavier school as they try to survive and repeatedly get dragged into fights to defend what little of mutant kind is left. 

The second half is about how Cyclops responds once he really asserts himself as the leader of mutant kind and takes a proactive approach to defending them. He has Wolverine for a wetwork team to go after and stop threats before they happen, a mutant Seal team 6 as it were.

The enemy that show sup repeatedly are the Purifiers, Christian extremists founded by Reverend Stryker, who the bad guy from X2 was based on. Consider also that by the time that a case has already gone to trial, baring some occasional terrible misconduct, a DA or State Attorney ahs decided that there is sufficient and compelling evidence that the person accused is guilty and committed the crime in question.

Thus if they DIDNT seek as strong a punishment as possible then they are not doing their own job, that being to see the law fully applied, and for the full power of the US and States to be used to punish and stop crime. Sweet the run basically begins right after that.

The team Yost and Kyle have done a lot of Marvel work, they worked on the old X-Men Evolution show, and Wolverine and the X-Men, Yost also was one of the writers for Thor: Dark World, and they are both working on Ragnarok.  In most cases there are two ways they could be censured.

Either their State/Federal superiors could find fault with them, and demote, reprimand, fire as decided, and generally they will set the tone for how their subordinates prosecute, whom they bargain with, whom they don't, what crimes they focus on, what actual charges they bring.

The other is if it is an actual ethic violation, the state Bar Association where they  practice could step in. 

That is what happened to the Prosecutor for the Duke Lacrosse players. When just how poor the evidence against them was came to light, and how the DA basically ran a smear campaign against them and his actions to slow the release of evidence to the defense, his law license in North Carolina was revoked.

State Bar Associations will generally publish expected best practices of lawyers, and while most are procedural and ethical, there are some that are based on conduct. 

Many are also elected and could lose elctions if it got that bad.

But as for your example, what is your issue with the state explaining that this person is not a normal human being, and that any rational person should fear for their own safety in his presence and that his crimes go beyond ones of passion or snap reaction, but show malice, and willful infliction of suffering with monstrous cruelty? That is part of the State's case, that he couldn't be treated as a normal criminal or say a man walking in on his wife cheating and losing it, that Holmes was worse. I kind of wish they would include Sable or Wolverine as T1 or 2 CV's so new guys could use them in coop to get used to the dynamic and also give a reason for those early ships to eve have AA. 

And yep, while nowhere near as bad as VF squadrons, for the first 6 months the Bombing and Scouting squadrons did have to juggle to try to get full compliments aboard the carriers, coming down to whichever CV(s) were out on raids getting as many as could fit, the one covering Pearly out at sea getting mostly full, and whoever was in Pearl/coming from the states having either fewer or plenty of replacements. With scratch or cadre formations ashore. 

Im willing to bet you've at least heard of the book.

But for anyone interested the BEST history still today of carrier warfare from pearl to Midway is Lundstrum's "First Team" despite being written in the 80's it holds up remarkably well and offers unique insights not just to the fighter squadrons but to all the air wings which were all the USN had to fall back on to win with. 

One interesting tidbit that it explained was that until the late 30's USN pilot training was a bit different, pilots got time in all 3 types, fighters, DB's, and TB's, before being assigned a type, along with many doing stints in float planes, meaning that it was slightly easier to reassign the commanders and senior pilots as the need arose. A few reasons, one is how Germany credited kills.

While the US and UK for instances would give multiple pilots 1/2 or 1/3 of a kill, Germany only gave 1 pilot 1 full kill, and once a man was established as important or an Ace, it became more likely to give partial ones to him to keep up the myth and fa\u00e7ade. 

Germany also did not require independent verification of kills, meaning the pilots word was good enough, leading to hugely inflated kill counts, while the US for instance did. Claims by pilots could almost always be vastly over stated, at Midway for instance the IJN claimed the aircraft of LTCDR Jimmy thatch and his 2 wingmen as 15 separate kills, when in reality just 1 of the 3 planes were shot down!

Then yes for much of the first 3 years of the war especially in the East German pilots were going up against pilots in inferior equipment, with poor tactics, and with a better support network, and just like the Japanese the policy was to keep pilots flying as long as possible, and rarely rotate them back to training commands. A counterpoint would be the above mentioned Jimmy Thatch, who was credited with 6 kills, and 3 alone at Midway, but soon after the battle he was sent back to the states to lead a training command not continue racking up kills. Are you the King of deciding how people are allowed to express their fandom now? Really, can you cite or quote anyone but yourself right now who has said it prevents them from comprehending the English Language? Then don't come here if its the worst, start your own "pure' CFB sub where you can make the rules. What we need is night maps if anything. Lol hey guys what up!A major thing you probably didn't see in person was how much research the school is conducting. How many journal articles are they publishing, how many labs are they funding. While not of direct impact to most undergrads, for advanced degrees that is big, and has a major impact of school rankings. 

Directly correlated to that then is the size of the school's endowment, and thus how much funding they can lay out and how dependent they are on outside sources. I do hope you enjoy yourself and have a good time, but to be completely honest, prepare to be let down by the game and atmosphere. 

Between the weather and the state of the team the fan base is even more down than Tennessee, and coming of a shit show of a loss to Pitt.

The one redeeming factor is that as a Friday night game the student turnout should be good(the student section at VT is #12 in the nation is size as a % of the stadium) but expect Lane to be maybe 2/3 full at most. 

As for sites and sounds the Pregame should be a good time, the April 16th Memorial and Drillfield as a whole will give you a good taste of the campus as a whole, and are easy walking, also the War Memorial Pylons are a wonderful place to view the sunset before the game and are inscribed with the names of all VT's war dead. 

TOTS is a fun super Greek bar, but their Rails will get you drunk plenty fast. Also be sure to get a smoke Turkey Leg in the stadium! They have repeatedly and often, virtually every PM, and the Emperor have whenever pressed to.

But it is easy for other nations to just keep saying they want more as a tool of diplomacy to make japan look bad. And they have easy targets Japan is a free country with freedom of speech and association, so elements which either deny or ignore the unsavory events of their empire will have voices, and do find their ways into government posts. While inside the 20 year limit, we do have a pretty straightforward legislative reaction to the Virginia Tech shooting on April 16, 2007.

In the aftermath of Virginia Tech Bush did support and legislation was passed designed to bolster the National instant Criminal Background Check System. Part of the review ordered by Bush to examine national issues that could be addressed ID'd it as an area of improvement, the gunman Cho if info had been properly shared would not have been allowed to purchase firearms, having been ordered to undergo psych counseling by a court. 

While his speech the day after the shooting, in Blacksburg, did not call for gun control measures, the Bill did have the support of the administration. 

News Article on the Bill: http://www.latimes.com/la-na-guns9dec09-story.html

Bush's remarks in Blacksburg: http://georgewbush-whitehouse.archives.gov/news/releases/2007/04/20070417-1.htmlCan we also talk about how sharing the page with the Bush article is a Big East Conference Realignment article?

That may be the most college football page in the history of college football. Nope no problem if neither team is an opponent for the current regular season.  Auburn Sucks: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5m6Sw26gUQoFair enough, allow me to rephrase that.Im not honestly sure if there would be a retroactive issue come Bowl season but to my knowledge it has never actually come up, most coaches don't visit other schools on bye weeks. Don't think we ever got official word but would assume, was also his non throwing shoulder. Honestly a dark red would probably be your safest option. Could be either NCST or VT, so you probably wont get crap from anyone. #Hope I am torn, if he is ready, we just need to hope that Sereals(the best Offensive Coach we have) will get them back right. 

If not, hope we bumblefuck our way to a win and get him ready for Miami with an extra day of rest. You really want to invest hours and hours check out the 'Victory at Sea" series. A wonderful documentary series about the global war on above and below the waves, produced less than a decade after the war. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fSCWi0ivx9w&amp;list=PLMOJ05TrdIZA7pNQa5YjrHuPIDPdHPIodAre there any SEC vs AAC bowls? "ordeal"

3 winning seasons and 2 bowl wins is what you term an ordeal?!?

What qualify as a Catastrophe then? 

Take some perspective, it was a decline and regression to the average. Sucks yes, but dont frame it as some sort of personal injury to the students. Doesnt mean you should stop fighting to spread knowledge in the face of disinterest, thats when you need to fight all the harder. Give me RN Battleships or give me death!You are looking for Hideki Tojo. 

He was a career IJA officer who was staunchly militaristic and fascist. He also held numerous important positions in 1937 he was appointed Chief of Staff of the Kwantung Army in Manchuria, and under his watch the expansion into China and Mongolia began in earnest. 

In July 1940 he was appointed Minister of War in the Cabinet(many cabinet posts were held by sitting military officers). During this time he supported the expansion of the war in China and the Tripartite Pact. Then in Oct of 1941 he was made Prime Minister, and approved the plan for war with the West and the attack on Pearl Harbor.

He remained Prime Minister and primary political leader until late 1944 when the war was decisively against Japan and following the fall of Saipan he was forced out. After the war he was tried by the War Crimes Tribunal and hung. So what part of that constitutes a physical "Ordeal" for your average student? How are they physically harmed by loosing games?

And the counter argument is that Beamer is the exception and the outlier, not the real VT. That the years and years of middling finishes under Dooley, Moseley, Sharpe and the rest are really what the schools is. Thus we are now regressing to what the school should reasonably expect with the size of our athletic budget, size of the alumni and donor base, and our location. Tell us if somebody figures that out!&gt; well known as Stalin or Mussolini?

That is a function of where you are from, and where you were educated in all likelihood, any cursory history book of the era is going to mention him.

And I dare say to any Asian population he will most likely be more of a "name" than Mussolini half a world away. right up there with 1872 for the highlight. So Marvel would rather do this than build on 1872? 

Just great/sThat too. 2.5 million a year isnt going to buy you more than 8wins a year now. Frank gave us the friends price for years.

If we want to win the ACC we need to be equaling FSU and Clemson in their budgets and we arent there yet, getting there, but not there yet. 

In total budget we are 6th in the ACC for athletics, so we are finishing right where we are paying to finish. This reminds me so much of the Dave Chapelle, "Why dont Black people trust Ronald Regan bit" 

The answer: he was never supposed to be trusted in the first place. I tend to agree with your statement since Bobby at the end of the day did win the 2 nattys.

But arguably Beamer also started with less, with the difference between the haves and have nots already much more pronounced, and VT having not won a Bowl game ever until 6 weeks before Beamer's hiring. Then shepherding through the 2 conference moves, winning both, and the NCG run. I dont believe Frank can win the ACC again. 

But why do you think we can win the ACC again with anyone with the current state of the program and out competitors? 

We are not even in the top 4 in budget in the ACC, if we arent able to keep up spending with even Clemson, why should we expect to beat them? http://sports.usatoday.com/ncaa/finances/

Of the Public schools which released their figures that are still in the ACC we are behind FSU, Clemson, UVA, Lville, and UNC.

So why do you expect us to afford a coach who can beat them? 

We got a deal with Beamer and underpaid him for the past decade to hide the fact that we have a smaller alumni base and budget than our competitors. Our options then are to hope somebody comes on the cheap, or get a Coordinator and hope for the best, and at the same time hope our expensive risky Basketball coach in Buzz doesnt flame out. 

Once again, what is YOUR basis for expecting a coach post Frank to win the ACC once even say every 5 years? 

SO while it might SEEM massively promoted we are middling at best and only in the top 40 when it comes to actual money invested in the Athletics Dept, obviosuly the majority of which is football.  We are paying Beamer 2.5million/year in total compensation right now. 

That is 35th in the FBS. We are finishing right where we are investing to finish. http://sports.usatoday.com/ncaa/salaries/

And we have a total budget just barely in the top half of the ACC. 

Honestly its debatable if we could afford a proven HC from another P5 or top tier G5 school. Meaning we would have to look cheaper and riskier.

So while its doubtful Frank will win any more meaningful games, it is likely we are 5-6 years away from the next ACCCG regardless.

We are what we pay to be in college sports, and the bottom line is we dont appear to have the money to be better than we are right now. Everything's Coming up Milhouse! I mean at this point isnt the answer obvious, just move to North America? I feel like you might have gotten the best deal of all. same class and were sister ships, Aurora just got a more thorough reconstruction. 

If its that important to you, you could always move? One type of formation that is heavily dominated by Reserve and Guard units is in fact WMD and emergency respond units, mobile hospitals, decontamination units, and the like.

That is a conscious decision on the part of the DoD. Units like that arent needed too often, so can be called up as needed for Federal missions. The other benefit is that by making it the Guard's responsibility it diffuses the knowledge and capabilities around the country, thus meaning for domestic events you have assets in place that can respond quickly and locally.   While not the Army Reserve, there ARE multiple division formations which are entirely formed from multiple state's National Guard units.

For a total of 8 Infantry Divisions currently. The 28th, 29th, 34th, 35th, 36th, 38th, 40th, and 42nd are all made up of Brigades from one or multiple states which would function as one if activated and federalized. The states involved being: Pennsylvania, Ohio, Maryland, irginia, Maryland, North Carolina, Florida, Minnesota, Wisconsin, Iowa, Idaho, Kansas, Missouri, Illinois, Georgia, Arkansas, Texas, Oklahoma, Louisiana, Mississippi, California, Oregon, Washington, Hawaii, New York, New Jersey, Vermont, Indiana, Michigan and Ohio.

As for rank. No a service member's rank and rate carrier from Guard, to Reserve, to Active Duty. In fact a large portion of new officers each year are commissioned directly into the reserve and are then just brought onto active duty for the length of their initial required contract before being sent back to reserves, and eventually IRR.

Its where the R in ROTC comes from, Reserve Officer Training Corps. The team was founded BEFORE the modern NFL. Back in the early 1900's "pro football" was concentrated in the Midwest and tons of towns like GB or Duluth had teams, GB is just the one that survived till the sport got big. You need to pay rent, buy food and clothes dont you?

Part of the reason most take out any sort of loans is the inability of families to contribute, and while some probably could work, why do we want our young people to focus on anything but getting the best education they can? Same reason people blame the President for high gas prices. 

One single highly visible executive figure is easy to go after as opposed to an underling or member of a team. Well youve got another chance to possibly see him on Friday now!And then said player sees writing on the wall and transferred. You mentioned the UN down below. 

NOTHING will ever occur or happen from the UN Security Council, the body you need to agree to have things like Peacekeepers or force happen. That is because the US has a Permanent Veto on the UNSC along with France, Britain, China, and Russia.  

Fair, not one fucking bit, but why should international politics be fair? Not all countries are equal. Those 5 countries, being the Allies from WW2, purposefully set the system up to benefit themselves most, but everyone else enough to accept the 2 tiers and still roll with it. And we are still not at a point of dissatisfaction with the UN status quo that nations are serious about building True alternatives outside of small regional bodies of limited world reach like the EU or ASEAN. 

As for our NATO or other Allies holding the US "accountable" why? NATO is a full partner in Afghanistan and on a larger note it is again all about cost benefits.

NATO nations enjoy the benefits, namely knowledge of their existential security, ability to reduce defense budgets because each nation can operate as part of an alliance, and the fact that a team of nations can often accomplish much more than any one could. 

So the benefits of being a NATO member and US ally to serve as a credible counter balance to real or perceived threats is still greater than any ill will or resentment that might exist. 

If states like Germany, France, or Italy  truly thought that being friends with the US was more trouble than it was worth, or that they could no longer go along with it, then a good first step would be withdrawal from NATO, but the opposite is happening, hell France REJOINED the alliance in 2009 after decades on their own.

So in summation it wont happen due to a combination of a world order set up to protect and favor the victors of WW2 but which everyone benefits enough from to not want to change too much, and that our allies recognize that having the friendship and backing of the US is more valuable then trying coercive actions in response to US policy.  If you are France, Britain, China, Russia, or the US you have nothing to dear from the UN, that permanent Veto works wonders. Its part of why IJN ships have SO MANY toprs. 

Due to being limited to 60% of the tonnage of the US and UK by the Naval Treaties in the 20's, Japan needed each of her ships to be best equipped to even the odds. 
Excellent post again!

Only addition I would mention is that on your second point, the converse is equally True. 

Light squadrons and divisions of DD's and CL's were also seen as a key escape tactic for heavy fleet units to give them breathing room to escape or maneuver. 

At Dogger Bank the turn of the German light ships towards the RN BC's meaningfully contributed towards Beatty's turn which would leave his ships out of position once he was unable to communicate further, along with potentially spotting a torpedo fired at max range and running out as a periscope. 

And of course at Jutland the movements of the German light units in between the first battle Turn and the return of the German BC's and again after they were key to preventing either RN light units or the battle line from pressing home. 

So as of course you mention that DD's were key to finishing off a wounded foe, they could also be the only thing keeping a stricken ally from sinking or making good an escape. I think you are underestimating just how freakin big they are. During WW2 the Iowa's had displacement more than 3X's that of the South Carolina's Which is a shame, at the time getting Ford was a big deal, Player of the Year for Pa his senior year, and an Elite 11 participant. Its the continuation of the idea that "The bomber will always get through"

To build a perfect missile defense system is vastly more expensive than maintaining a credible nuclear deterrent.

It is much harder to defeat every incoming missile, most with multiple warheads, than it is to make sure you have enough to know some will get through. 

While there are some systems for short to medium range threats, such as the SM-3 aboard AEGIS equipped warships, there is much more work to be done for it to be effective for all threats. 

So it is a choice between trying to develop a perfect defense, or having an offensively credible enough threat. What happens then when you have multiple partly Govt owned institutions competing in the same field, do you allow one to go out of business? Do you regulate and force both to share?

What if there is a size limit and a new smaller company that isn't govt owned at all develops something new that hurts the performance of a larger govt invested one? Should the govt take action to protect its investment, to the detriment of the new company and its employees? 

While you could have it as some sort of nonvoting stock, these are some of the issues and concerns you have with govt corporations and nationalizing even in part of companies. They could also afford ships with shorter legs and range as it were. 

A ship based in Norfolk or England had to be a very economical steamer should it need to get to either nations far flung possessions, and being able to do so with minimal fuel burn was a big consideration. Bigger question, how big of an underdog would the Longhorns be against the Argentine Navy?Appreciate Truex and Kurt going for the Capt Morgan stance, and once again Menard looks thrilled out of his mind to be there. Annihilation, Thanos Imperative, basically anything Cosmic. 

Fuck it, let him do a Nova movie, and make it pissed off cocky Richard ala Brad Pitt in Inglorious Bastards. Fucking Gold, every oneSo the giveaway ISN'T that important to you then? But man you have admit those Exocets have a hell of a pass rush!Not really Hawkeye from the "Ultimate" Universe 1610 was the basis, married with kids and along with original Black Fury was where the MCU drew inspiration, as compared to 616 Clint who bought a whole apartment building from the Russian mob and hangs out with a young girl who also calls herself Hawkeye. And 616 Clint is actually sort of an asshole and really bad at forming meaningful relationships with any woman. 

Actually Matt Fractions Hawkeye runs was one of the highlights of Marvel's lineup the past 2 years, super recommend. That could easily be the face of a simple minded farm hand who kills small animals and chains up passing tourists to the radiator.

Should have been Trapper John, just to mess with people. You wont catch me!

Not when I shit into.. MAXIMUM OVERDRIVE!If the MCU has established anything, its that Heimdall needs to see an Optometrist ASAP.At the end of the day though I just dont see the danger, the Whedon's are not particularly shy about their plot armor.

Across Buffy and Angel you can basically count on 1 hand the number of original main cast members which died permanently. 

That said, Ward as terrorist is the best version of Ward we have seen yet, and a good grounded villain for COulson that doesnt have powers and isnt from space. Just a man with a talent for violence. The Whedon's arent particularly known for killing guys off permanently though. 

How many times does Angel die? And then they just gave him his own show! Hell lets do that with Ward. Exactly, across 7 seasons of Buffy and 5 of Angel, not exactly a high attrition rate, and its sort of a cheap count to use one of them when its the last scene of the last episode. At the same time though SHIELD has already fallen into the typical Whedon archetype of introducing characters who seem central and are for a season and an arc while being featured in those episodes, and then killed, to make it seem like they were main cast, without touching the original main cast. 

Of the "Main" Cast of SHIELD, Trip last 1/2 a season, just 25% of the show run so far and getting smaller as the show goes. Gonzales and Jaiying fall into the same category, featured heavily while present, but in the end were really only aboard the show for a few passing arcs. Raina as well as she was the only now dead character to span both seasons, and that is still just one.

Look at Buffy/Angel of the cast that was there in S1E1, Wes makes it all the way to the end of Angel, Giles makes it, Buffy obviously, Willow makes it, Angel makes it, and Cordelia makes it all the way to the final season of Angel. 

Thats a pretty good way to see how the Whedons view main cast.

And so far of the team we met in S1E1 they are all still kicking, hell we even still have the antagonist still since Mike shows up occasionally, mirroring just how long Darla lasted on Angel. 

So to have Ward die this season, or May, would be a major departure for the pattern they have shown to work with mostly. I would watch the ever loving fuck out of such a show. Do you mean arms control as in domestic US gun ownership legislation, or international military arms treaties? https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=S9RVS8cjNN0Yes EVERY name he mentions is a class, damn man even 30 seconds on wiki could make that clear, both fleets got into the habit of ordering new classes of BC's and BB's each year.

And even if we go every other class to give sufficient separation between the tiers, that is still 5-6 tiers right there, just 1 tier shy of the current BB tree and the same length as the CV tree.  As an aside, who wants Blucher as a tier 4/5 premium proto BC for the Germans? 12X 8.3in and 8X 5.9in as a main and secondary battery. 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/SMS_Bl%C3%BCcherYes, British AP shells were thoroughly rubbish, with the main problem being the explosive used which was called Lyddite, basically it was a proprietery mixture which detonated prematurely compared to the simple TNT used by the Germans. 

While it was suspected from testing and the Admiralty had been working on it since before the war no reliable alternative was yet available, nor was there till late in the war, the need for land shells was just so overwhelming. 

The facts were even confirmed when a Swedish officer visited with Beatty and Jellicoe after Jutland having earlier been in Germany and heard first hand the accounts of German officers, who had first been tipped off about the issue at Dogger Bank. 

Interesting enough there is also evidence that US shells were just as bad as the Dunnite or "Explosive D" used in them was found to basically be a pirated and slightly altered version of Lyditte, and very soon after the war the USN quietly switched to TNT for shells. While slightly more stable then its original formulation the compound then either wouldnt detonate at all, would breakdown while being stored, or would still detonate to early. So we have separate trees from tiers 3 on to 8 when it recombines with the early fast battleships since they not only represent a major departure from the dreadnought and super dreadnought generation, but a synthesis with design philosophies of the BC era. 

In a lot of ways the lines for the Germans and British could look like the German Panzer II and IV to Panther/Tiger line. No im glad you took the time!

Ok yep did get my numbers off to a degree, and when you treat Angel as its own show the mortality and cast turnover does increase as opposed to counting them as one lump meta series.

But their other series also aren't that statistically different. Dollhouse keeps for all intents the same main cast for both seasons. Tahmoh (who absolutely NEEDS a role on SHIELD btw) makes it all the way to the finale, and the other two main cast deaths occur in the finale or the penultimate episode as well.

And while Firefly of course was even shorter than any of them nobody dies until the movie. Very True, though from what I recall that was based on the assumption that Port Stanley's air field could base jets, and that the Argentines would actively use the CV, both of which turned out to be False. Is it because the unvaccinated also happen to overlap with the illiterate and thus don't respond to surveys? Can I just say the idea of young Spurrier and young Mack Brown coaching against each other in the ACC is pretty funny. That's actually legit, how long has it been on the books? &gt; to show the US how strong they are militarily.

By showing that they've reached the 1980's with respect to power projection? 

Most first world nations have this ability with modern cruise missiles.

Possibly using 3M-54 Klub, essentially the Russian version of the Tomahawk used by US and allies. &gt; this really shows how powerful Russia is

By doing things the West has been able to do since the 1980's?

If they can go a month without an air force jet crashing, or a naval ship breaking down at sea then it will be concerning. I mean 1980's as this is the first time that Russia has conducted a coordinated air strike campaign using both air and sea assets, with GPS guided munitions, NOT in a country that borders them.

This is new ground for them, but while aspects of their military have evolved and are of a kind with anyone one earth others are stuck in an even worse development hell(PAK-Fa), or have been troubled with such poor maintenance as to be so limited. The Russian Air Force flies fewer hours be man, and still has a higher crash rate, until they can get a handle on that they are still structurally and organizationally unsound. Were they time travelling draft dodgers?

Had to have been since the Selective Service Act setting up the Draft for WW1 was only signed in 1917...The fight against ignorance and darkness is never ending. 

I would ask you list me as a Crusader for knowledge, destroying your poor heathen stupidity. Doesn't help when the state governments aren't exactly forthcoming with funding for so called PUBLIC schools, the University of Virginia gets less than 11% of their academic budget from the state, and on a per student basis has seen state funding drop 50% since 1990.

https://www.washingtonpost.com/local/education/how-much-state-funding-does-the-university-of-virginia-receive/2013/09/12/fb999782-1baf-11e3-82ef-a059e54c49d0_story.htmlPUBLIC universities would love to provide as much education as possible, for as many people as possible, but when every year the state cuts a bit more of your funding, while more and more people every year are trying to get in, with expectations of nice dorms, nice food, a good career counseling department, small class sizes, IT connected dorms and classes, and all the extra curriculars they could want, the money needs to come from somewhere.

US students have established that they want a robust, and expensive college experience, and the schools which dotn offer that suffer.

But when you are a public school, like UVA, and you get less than 11% of your academic budget from the state of Virginia where do you make up the shortfall, cutting programs means students begin looking elsewhere for college making it all the harder to stay open. https://www.washingtonpost.com/local/education/how-much-state-funding-does-the-university-of-virginia-receive/2013/09/12/fb999782-1baf-11e3-82ef-a059e54c49d0_story.htmlI mean they certainly do, but if you check down below, very few of them are ones that began main cast in the shows pilots, they are usually pretty damn safe until a shows final season. While that number DOES include many things like research labs funded by federal grants, and private donations funding research, the very concerning number is that adjusted for inflation in 1990 Virginia gave UVA about 17k per student per year, in 2013 it was down to 8k, that is a real change in where the school is able to fund programs that students have come to expect, and which a school like UVA's reputation relies upon. You shouldn't, we suck, but it is the main game for ESPN on Friday night, NCST is an ok team, and Brewer could possibly be back for it. Nope I like it better this wayThen dont play them...

The fact remains that they are already a part of the game, and played a major part in naval combat int he time represented. For SOME nations sure. 

But why do we want all the nations ot have symettry.

Word is that the IJN and USN will be getting 2nd carrier lines, so give them 2nd carrier lines and give the Germans and RN a BC line instead. None of them. Sure maybe they will extract some sort of vengeance. Maybe he gets hurts and badly, but dead? Doubtful.

But he is basically SHIELDs version of Angel or Spike. The plot armor is all sorts of thick up in here.Very True, and I agree, especially in the case of Firefly.

But one thing we can draw is that all the Whedons tend to have to different levels of plot armor, series long and season/arc long. We can pretty safely say that while Trip had arc long armor and Jaiying as well, Ward is a step above them as original main cast, and is likely in it for the series. 

At 1.5mil per cruise missile, 500k for a smart bomb, and all that fuel, maintenance, and man power hours that it takes, go ahead Russia, have a literal blast as much as you want. Perhaps not up front, but the maintenance costs to sustain the current operational tempo is going to be increasing dramatically.

While there are elements of the Russian Navy and AF that are thoroughly modern and well equipped, the majority are still fighting off decades of lax upkeep and training. 

Hell not 2 months ago they had a ship fired anti submarine missile fail upon launch, and another fail to launch at all at a demonstration attended by Putin: http://www.popularmechanics.com/military/navy-ships/a16623/failure-to-launch-watch-a-russian-anti-submarine-missile-not-do-its-job/

It happens to everyone occasionally, including the USN this summer, but rarely in such high profile situations. And what do we expect when they are launching strikes daily, and placing additional wear on components. The Corvettes they have down there are relatively new, but also spent extensive time on the stocks incomplete, not being maintained, and the larger frigates were some of the last ships ordered from the old Soviet fleet, and spent most of the 90's incomplete, and was only finished in the 00's with a 2nd coming in 2012, with little attention given since, and the only foreign customer for them being Vietnam.

In short though, we don't know how many of the launches failed, if any more will, or how long the ships can continue to operate before breaking. The Russian Navy simply isn't used to or set right now for continual combat operations, even if its in their own private lake essentially. They are suing some of their more modern warships for it, but they only have a handful, minimal institutional experience, and a pattern of safety and operational failures, which adds immensely to the cost. I NEED YALLS HELP YOU WONDERFUL DUMB BASTARDS. 

IM JUST NOT FEELING THE HATE AND FIRE ANYMORE, THE TEAM IS LOST, DEFENSE IS A MASSIVE LET DOWN, A BOWL LOOKS UNLIKELY. I JUST CANT TAKE IT ANYMORE. 

WHY HAVE YOU FORESAKEN US FOOTBALL GODS? AND VIRGINIA!TAKE MY UPVOTE YOU WONDERFUL MARVELOUS MANI MEAN DO YOU HATE CLEAN COUNTRY AIR, AND FRESH FOOD?

HAS ALL THAT HOT PEACH THEMED GARBAGE FINALLY GONE TO YOUR HEAD? KINDLY EAT A BIG OLD BAG OF DICKS SIR. For good hard sources I would HIGLY recommend /r/AskHistorians maybe even check out their FAQ's to see if tis included in there. In 2013 there was also discovered the ruins of the harbor facility on the Red Sea and was part of the shipping network for the project.

Amongst them was also found papyrus remains from an overseer and supply manager, talking about having to travel back and forth to the quarry to keep the stones coming for the great Pyramid ordered by Cheops. 

https://www.reddit.com/r/AskHistorians/comments/1df9h1/do_we_know_the_name_ancient_egyptians_gave_the/c9pw5ad

http://cosmiclog.nbcnews.com/_news/2013/04/15/17767610-4500-year-old-harbor-structures-and-papyrus-texts-unearthed-in-egypt?liteOr just a statement of facts, the Russian Air Force cant go a month without an aircraft falling out of the sky due to their own negligence, and they cant even throw a naval review without a missile failure.

Aspects of the Russian Armed Forces are fully modern, but unless you want to run them into the ground, they need to use other formations or dubious quality and maintenance levels, which will lead to casualties. 

Hell between June and July alone Russia had 6! aircraft crashes and multiple fatalities, that level of non combat attrition does not bode well for units deploying and running combat operations. 

And lets see how long they can keep their ships operating, when you cant even get a missile to work, and another doesn't even launch when parading in front of Putin, that is not a good sign for the state of the force. 

http://www.defensenews.com/story/defense/2015/07/14/russia-tu-95-crash/30130517/

https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/checkpoint/wp/2015/07/14/for-russia-another-bomber-crash/

http://www.popularmechanics.com/military/navy-ships/a16623/failure-to-launch-watch-a-russian-anti-submarine-missile-not-do-its-job/In that I agree. But if we look at just what he is saying. Yes Russia is likely to incur casualties from their intervention. But they are as likely to be from mechanical failure as hostile action. I mean. I wouldn't. 

Regardless of design merits. Planes dont work unless you actually pay and train people in upkeep. Russia has had problems with this, to put it nicely,  since the fall of the USSR.

The problem additionally with trusting old designs is that they are just that. Old. Plenty of biplanes worked just fine when WW2 rolled around. But you didnt see everyone trusting their 20 year old designs.Meh it is easy to call it a shit show until we look at the PAK-FA program for Russia.  While the US now has two gen 5 aircraft in operation Russia has finally built a third working prototype of their first and are at least a decade behind.

I like the C carrier variant as a compliment to the Hornet and the A is a good eventual successor to the F-16.  But the B VSTOL variant was never going to be an easy proposition. How do you drive in a car for so far and maintain your position and course? GPS has revolutionized how humans map and navigate. 

The missile has a GPS unit in it and surprisingly advanced computers. It knows where it is launched from, and the system works basically just like the navigation unit in your car. You then can have it compare the terrain and things like elevation that it is seeing to what it should be seeing to be doubly sure that it is on course.

All modern nations have weapons capable of feats like this, the ubiquitous US Tomahawk cruise missile being probably the most well known. Me this morning 

&gt; While there are elements of the Russian Navy and AF that are thoroughly modern and well equipped, the majority are still fighting off decades of lax upkeep and training. 

&gt;Hell not 2 months ago they had a ship fired anti submarine missile fail upon launch, and another fail to launch at all at a demonstration attended by Putin: http://www.popularmechanics.com/military/navy-ships/a16623/failure-to-launch-watch-a-russian-anti-submarine-missile-not-do-its-job/

&gt;It happens to everyone occasionally, including the USN this summer, but rarely in such high profile situations. And what do we expect when they are launching strikes daily, and placing additional wear on components. The Corvettes they have down there are relatively new, but also spent extensive time on the stocks incomplete, not being maintained, and the larger frigates were some of the last ships ordered from the old Soviet fleet, and spent most of the 90's incomplete, and was only finished in the 00's with a 2nd coming in 2012, with little attention given since, and the only foreign customer for them being Vietnam.

&gt;In short though, we don't know how many of the launches failed, if any more will, or how long the ships can continue to operate before breaking. The Russian Navy simply isn't used to or set right now for continual combat operations, even if its in their own private lake essentially. They are suing some of their more modern warships for it, but they only have a handful, minimal institutional experience, and a pattern of safety and operational failures, which adds immensely to the cost. 


Well now we know how many. 

Also surfside that no planes have crashed yet. the Russian Air Force is falling out of the sky, hell just from June 1 to the middle of July they had 6 different crashes, 3 of them fatal. The larger thing is that it is another sign that Russia has not yet gotten out of the poorly maintained, unsafe funk they have been dealing with for 20 years.

Some formations are up to snuff, but these were launched by some of their newest warships and still couldn't get it sorted out. I mean, when your naval weapons malfunction ON PARADE, in front of Putin, twice in one day, it tends not to bode well for operational usage.

http://www.popularmechanics.com/military/navy-ships/a16623/failure-to-launch-watch-a-russian-anti-submarine-missile-not-do-its-job/Russia just continues to have a military of "Varying" maintenance levels and quality.

Probably good it was over the back country, but continues the trend. These were launched by some of their newest ships and still malfunctioned. 
If having weapon failures and having them come out is propaganda, what was the value here?

http://www.popularmechanics.com/military/navy-ships/a16623/failure-to-launch-watch-a-russian-anti-submarine-missile-not-do-its-job/

EDIT: Sorry misread your comment in relation to the article, thought you meant it would be of value for RUSSIA to eventually say they failed. It does work for them, but at a certain point, when pilots cant trust that the plane wont crash, or a Captain that the missile wont explode his ship when he goes to launch, it impacts the morale, effectiveness, and willingness to engage of your forces. So this should let you know which.

Russia recently held a naval demonstration to show off their rejuvenated fleet, for the 21st century. 

First they had a missile fail and break apart on launch, then later in the same day, with Putin watching, another ship failed to launch their missiles at all due to electrical failures. 

http://www.popularmechanics.com/military/navy-ships/a16623/failure-to-launch-watch-a-russian-anti-submarine-missile-not-do-its-job/More reliable than this.

4 out of 26, or a nearly 1 in 6 failure rate is not very good, nor is the rate of accidents within the Russian air force much better, from June 1to July 15 of this year for instance they lost 6 aircraft to mechanical accidents or failures, that is unsustainable. 

By comparison just 7 of the 65 Tomahawks fired during the first 48 hours of the 2003 invasion of Iraq malfunctioned. While rare when Standard Missiles fail for the US they make pretty pictures too. It looks like cool fireworks!

http://news.usni.org/2015/07/22/destroyer-uss-the-sullivans-damaged-after-missile-explodes-after-launch-no-injuries-reportedIt would?

We already HAVE the domers for Olympic sports, and the 5 football games help boost our OOC profile, more than throwing them in a division would help. 

We have a Pa school, we have 2 New England Schools, what is the draw? Why? The ACC is not going to lose the East Coast any more than the B1G is going to lock it up.

Hell there are going to be years when BOTH conferences will be having their hoops tourneys in NYC at the same time, one at Barclays one at the Garden. 

No conference is going to be able to make it into their backyard, so what would adding Temple do to change that balance?Yes, there have been a total of 3 fatal crashes of US military aircraft in 2015.

Russia had 6 in June and July of this year. They have had serious maintenance and upkeep issues ever since the fall of the USSR, and it does not appear that the Russian military has completely shaken that yet. As is proper, after the Kursk sank itself, Russian military personnel learned real fast not to complain too loudly. At the end of the day the difference between say 18-20% failure and 10-12% isn't that large when you are working with the numbers we have. 

And it is perfectly likely the Russian Navy picked their newest stocks to mitigate the risk of failure, frankly they just have fewer ships to stock with weapons. 

But it does get interesting when we look at the stats from the first Gulf War.

Of the 307 attempted TLAM launches: 

19 had a prelaunch fault which disrupted the mission. 10 of which were resolved and launched.

So then of the 288 that launched as normal, only 6 then had booster issues which prevented them from reaching the target. 

So of 307 targets which were ordered hit by a TLAM from a USN ship or sub 282 were successfully sent on the first try. So a +90% success rate. http://www.globalsecurity.org/military/systems/munitions/bgm-109-operation.htm

It is possible that the Russian Navy has that level of sustained strike capability in them, but it would break the trend of their capabilities since 1990, and would be a MASSIVE strain on the small Caspian Flotilla, and it is doubtful that the Black Sea of their Squadron in the Med would get involved. Seriously. 

A TLAM is about 1.5mil USD, even if the Russians are getting their at 2/3 the price, which is pretty reasonable.

That is still 1mil a USD a pop, for hardened, or defended targets like we had in 03 Iraq, yes a cruise missile is a nice weapon to use, but to hit jeeps, or unfortified positions? Even a dumb bomb works fine. That Russian strike missiles are at this point have a 50% higher failure rate than the US equivalent. 

That they have in simple gross numbers had more than 1/2 the total number of failure while firing just over 1/3 of the missiles in a similar amount of time. 

Are you trying to refute that the Russian Air Force and Navy DOESNT have a 2 decade long record of equipment failure and accidents due to lagging maintenance and slashed budgets?

Because that dog just wont hunt...That is certainly an option. Though I suspect much of it has been recycled, or used up, or sold to allies.

I wonder though how many they have in region. There was a major fire and explosion back in 09 at the main depot for the Caspian Flotilla, so it might impact stocks. the fleet also certainly isn't top priority, the Gepards were basically built to let other nations kick the tires to buy their own.

The USN has had its own issues with firing off old missile stocks, this is what happened over the summer when a DDG shot off one of the oldest left over stocks of SM-3's. http://news.usni.org/2015/07/22/destroyer-uss-the-sullivans-damaged-after-missile-explodes-after-launch-no-injuries-reportedIt depends if you think the difference between a 10% failure rate and a 16% failure rate is meaningful.

If you fire 10 shots and only 1 or 2 don't work, ok. 

When you fire 100, 1000? When does the increased unreliable nature of one system become meaningful.

And in gross number the Russians have fire just over 1/3 of the shots through the first 48hours of 2003, but have over 1/2 the number of failures. that isn't good for them. Yes, but they did hit what they were aimed at...Very True, the USN had an older SM-3 missile explode upon launch over the summer, and has had 3 fatal crashes of aircraft this year.

But for a while Russia was averaging a crash a week over the summer, that is a direct result of their funding situation for 25 years and not something that should be written off as normal dangers of the job that every country deals with. What about the fact that characters central to her personality and early tragedies aren't allowed in the MCU? I am pretty sure the real question here is "What's her vulnerability since Mystique and Rogue are off the table?"&gt; How about you relying on "unnamed" officials?

I am going to trust that multiple, international, privately owned companies felt the information was reliable enough to report it. Not perfect, but if it were just one newspaper that felt it was reliable maybe not, but when it is papers which do not often see eye to eye with the DoD it earns some credibility points.  

&gt; Soyuz launches

Why? Cruise missiles aren't based on ICBM's. If anything the Naval Demonstration missile failures over the summer are plenty germane here. 

And I think you are wrong about at scale more misses past a point not making any difference. Every miss means either another asset has to be tasked to that target, or another missile sued, both of which retard timelines, and mean that whatever target was of sufficient value is still operational. These are also weapon which are not easily reloaded quickly, and are of limited stocks in general, and are slow and pricey to manufacture. 

So yes every miss matters. Those extra 25 misses could be 1 more intact armored battalion in play, which if it was time critical either means some planes need to be tasked to deal with them, taking them off other targets, or perhaps they survive to make contact worth my forces in a bloodier fight then. Yes the USN also fired a few more than 26. Neither weapons system is perfect of failure free, but since the first Gulf War the TLAM has consistently had a +90% success rate. I mean, we knew Russia has had long term and ongoing maintenance and upkeep issues long before this. or were the 6 crashes in 6 weeks over the summer not a sign? http://www.defensenews.com/story/defense/air-space/2015/07/12/russian-fleets-crashing-ukraine-nato-fighter-bomber/29962399/So we have Iranian state news as a reputable source?  That's where we are?Yes. At this point nobody is particularly credible. So the safe thing is to assume some is True from both. Some probably had problems based on previous Russian operational issues.  But who knows if it was 4 and Russia probably got thier targets. BUT YOU GUYS ARE BASICALLY US!! AND WHO CAN HATE A SCHOOL WITH THE ARMY SONG AS THEIR FIGHT SONG.Then how do we know Russia even launched missiles in the first place. One ship at sea looks like another and a training launch like a wartime one.Very rarely is there any negative backlash.

It has become ingrained in the student body after +20 years of doing them, they are the high point of the year for VT football most years.

It is the night FOR the students, and most treat it that way, sure some deal with class issues, but for the most part the VT student body has embraced our affinity with Thursday/weeknight games. The nice thing about Fisk in S1 is that he almost takes a Shakespearean tragic hero path. 

He is essentially Richard III, whom after deciding he could never be truly loved, decides its more important to be powerful, until he meets someone who loves him BECAUSE of that choice. But apparently VT-NCst only rates a Friday this year.

Luckily the Techmo Bowl is @GT on a Thursday this year. I mean are we sure this wasnt done by some undercover bitter Redskins fans? You dont invent the future, or at least a GOOD future overnight. Or you could buy from literally any other first world nation, that is par for the course for modern cruise missiles. 

http://www.janes.com/article/52962/russian-bear-bombers-set-to-be-grounded-again-following-far-east-crash

So 6 crashes in 6 weeks is just bad luck for Russia? So congrats to Russia, they have reached reliability levels the TLAM had in the early 90's. Nope VT and GT are tied for the most Thursday Night appearances since ESPN started it int he 90's at 24 each, last GT took a 1 game lead in most wins as well when Miami boat raced us, luckily we can even it up this year. Russia built their own GPS network for EXACTLY that reason, the GLONASS constellation, while suffering declines in the 90's was restored under Putin. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/GLONASS

In peace time it works with the GPS constellation and both benefit, but the idea is that both dont need each other.  Cruise missiles in West and East have had 1k mi.1600km range since the mid 80's. 

While it is a signal that Russia has managed to unfuck their Navy enough for some handpicked ships that have never seen hard usage can do this, it is still only the first step for them to develop credible power projection. 

Step 2 is seeing if they can continue the strikes at a high tempo. Yea you dont get more "encountered" than this: http://theaviationist.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/06/f22s-intercept-Bear.jpgWhen we were actually good: Mike Vick

All time: could make the argument for Bruce Smith225 yards through the air and another 97 on the ground.Why do you assume that they would be reliant on the GPS constellation, even today they use GLONASS, and China has a stated intention of completing their own constellation. Negative ghostrider. 

GLASNOSS was started late in the Cold War, the Chinese system was first tested in the early 00's, with regional coverage in 2010.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/BeiDou_Navigation_Satellite_SystemI think it is pretty comparable to mainland native people's pride, and desire to maintain their cultural heritage. So certainly something there. Which is weird because Quill still has his solo still called Star-Lord, which seems to be dealing with him still being elected president of Spartax after causing the revolt that toppled his dad from power. Can we stop having Earth characters randomly attach to the GotG.

Tony, Carol, Flash, Kitty, now Ben. Enough is enough, these are supposed to be the Galaxy's storm troopers that show up and fuck up your day with violence and murder when you open one too many doors you shouldn't. 

They aren't there to be a fun vacation for tired Earth heroes. Hmm, interesting possibility. or maybe its just the dumb jacket, I bet its the jacket. 

But if that means we get THIS Quill back, well thatd be just all right with me: http://blog.accredible.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/08/Guardians-of-the-Galaxy.jpgClap...Clap...ClapThey do some random stuff on each year's rings.

2 years ago they had our giant new scoreboard featured, last year I want to say it was a picture of the cranes building the new indoor facility. They have included some cool stuff on the rings over the years, like SEZ when it was built, an evolution of the Hokie Bird, the Flaming VT, this was not one of them.

http://www.class.alumni.vt.edu/2013/ring.png
http://ww2.balfour.com/ORP/va107440/img/classSide.jpg
One of the fun things that the VTCC does is they cut us a deal for our two rings. Buy a gold or silver dress ring and your titanium battle ring of however large you want is only 75 bucks. That's why there are 4 different airports within 20 miles of the WH. Dulles, Regan, BWI, Andrews AFB, any one of them could be used. 

You also have the fact that noting is getting near DC without traveling over major military bases. 

You have Norfolk, the largest naval base on earth at the mouth of the Chesapeake, along with the dozens of military installations in Md, and Virginia.  You also have the fact that to get to DC you would have to go up the Potomac, which means going into the Chesapeake, which means dealing with Norfolk, the largest naval base on earth, and home to for all intents 50% of the USN. There is no provision for any sort of nationwide referendum in the Constitution, and most certainly not one that would cause the 2nd Amendment to be repealed. 

The only thing that can even alter the language or application of an Amendment is another Amendment, which is why you have one outlawing booze, and another invalidating that Amendment. 

So the short of it is that the plan of government specifically doesn't provide for what you are suggesting because debating it and coming up with a solution is the entire purpose of legislatures at the federal and state levels. I think it is plenty justifiable on the New Mex, especially if it becomes one of OP's usual ships to go back and play with. Neat story, after the ship was wrecked the XO and about 50 men made it all the way to Padang in the Dutch East Indies, and from there managed to get passage and return to Germany. With a harrowing journey up through Arabia and eventually to Mecca and later Constantinople. 

Also remarkable as that party became for all intents the only men of the German Navy stationed overseas at the start of the war to actually make it back to Germany. Yep built on Baltimore hulls rather than the Cleveland's of the Independence class. Nope, there were for all intents no major fleet units left there at the start of the war. Just a garrison of Marines.

The rest of the East Asia Squadron under Graff Spee had sortied days before and were in the South pacific and would eventually rendezvous with the Nuremberg off the coast of Chile where they would annihilate the British Squadron under Cradock sent to meet them at Coronel. They would then be destroyed themselves weeks later off Port Stanley in the Falklands when they ran into the 2 RN Battlecruisers sent after them.

The Emden had joined Spee for a time but at the suggestion of Capt Muller was detached to operate in the Indian Ocean to harass British Shipping, along with the steamer Cormoran, a Russian ship captured and converted at Tsingtao before Japan joined the Allies. I mean its unlikely it would have been any different, or if anything more lopsided.

Armored cruisers just did not do well when up against the very class of ships designed to defeat them. 

So it was 2 Armored and 3 Light Cruisers for Spee against BC's no matter who he fought. And even a single BC would have been able to dictate the distance and terms of the engagement. 
I mean 4 minutes IS a delay!For China there s a long trend of the US SEEKING better relations with China than with Russia, gong back to Nixon's desire to drive a wedge between the two.

And Germany was built from the ground up to be a US/NATO ally, at least West Germany was, along with Japan.so leave and dont come back. simple enoughthey opened the giant basketball arena next door for themI mean the 201 Pro Combats are some of the greatest alternates ever designed so there is that...dadi I mean,. if anyone should know what one looks like Id expect a bug to!Its not actually anything, the word was made up for a cheer cause it rhymed.

But our mascot the Hokie Bord evolved from the live turkey we used to have on the sideline trained to gobble on command by a local boy. They have averaged 1.5 conference wins a year since 2012...meh, sucks for Motley, but Brewer is on the mend and practiced all week and is back for Miami.&gt; ELI5 isn't a guessing game; if you aren't confident in your explanation, please don't speculate.

Or a basketball game on an Aircraft Carrier? No RV Lot, Since Bristol is so small its basically where all the team's haulers are parked in the pits. 

They are doing a major renovation after the August race next year hence room for the field. 

http://www.bristolmotorspeedway.com/images//1654919_sm_600x300.jpg

http://bloximages.newyork1.vip.townnews.com/heraldcourier.com/content/tncms/assets/v3/editorial/2/1a/21aa7be8-d7e4-11e4-8832-db18211231b0/551b02d282fae.image.jpg?resize=300%2C203Yep, in case it isnt clear, those are the 2 straightaways of the track itself which are having seating areas installed on them. Just means the NEZ and Corps gets to have some more fun!Fuck that, fire the guy who coaches 2 rarely used backers. Then shift Shane to ST Coordinator like all his previous experience in the SEC was in. 

It wasnt bad to hire him, he has bonafied SEC Def, ST, and Recruiting credentials, it was bad to force him to coach RB's.Sam Rogers care NOT for your weak unmanly tackling. Yep, the ex walkon, and the guy with the long TD vs tOSU.Vs tOSU we had our first set of 3 brothers playing at once when all 3 Edmunds bros were on a kickoff together. 

And of course all 4 Fullers. When your gene pool isnt built on cousin fucking wonderful things happen!And Narduzzi isnt a slouch, some good fresh blood in the ACC coaching ranks. Thanks, looking forward to renewing the rivalry in 2017!We are now 3-7 in our last 10 home games vs P5 teams, its an improvement! Correction. not as bad but we are 2-6 since the Pitt win in 2013 at home vs P5. 4-66 since the stat of 2013 in home P5 games.And only 8-7 since the start of 2012 at home vs P5 teams. Its the planes, modern carriers rarely carry anything more than self defense armaments, and even then it is the purpose of their escort ships to really protect them. 

But 75-100 aircraft for a USN super carrier is larger than many nations entire air force, and even a few dozen is a major factor for smaller carriers. SO when you can be anywhere in the world with that striking power in 24 hours it forces nations and groups to factor that response in when weighing actions. http://www.globalfirepower.com/aircraft-total.asp

Going off this a single Nimitz class depending on the mission would sit somewhere between Denmark and Norway. 

Consider also that jet fighters and combat aircraft will make up just a part of that total, while except for a handful (&lt;12) of supply and support/electronic warfare aircraft on a carrier, the vast majority will be jet attack aircraft, currently the F/A-19 Super Hornet. Norfolk, when you combine both the naval station proper and the shipyards, is far and away the largest naval base in the history of man. And home port to just about 1/2 of the Navy's surface ships. 

Which means besides truly hellish traffic you get some cool shots like this from time to time: https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/2/27/Fleet-003-US-VA-Norfolk-20121220-N-ZN152-189.jpgBecause that line of thinking worked so well for the Confederacy right? Tell that to the Bushwhackers in Kansas and Missouri, they still lost there too. Hard to call what happened in Kansas, Arkansas, and Missouri conventional warfare, it was very much roving bands of partisans, and still the South had the worst of it. I thought Rocket's solo had established that the whole Halfworld place DID actually exist?I mean, the teams are NOT in the same divisions...

State is Atlantic, VT is Coastal. Meh its hard enough for most casual ACC fans to keep them straight, especially since the Divisions arent geographical. Tons went to allied navies, which then ran them into the ground and then sold them back to US companies ta a loss for scrap. 

In fact of the 4 preserved, 3 are in the US, and the last one in Greece!https://www.aei.org/publication/us-military-enlistment-rates-by-state-a-texas-sized-difference/

Not really gonna be making much of a difference, if we are considering diffused military experience in the population an asset, when most recruits still come from the South. A game between Dabo and PJ huh?

Consider me thoroughly on team asteroid hitting the stadium! He is and I dont think he is a bad guy. But he has established himself as one of the 3 best coaches in the ACC. Enough reason to resent him there.Is this thread fuckbaylor friendly?  What about "thats not a real instrument" friendly?Honestly I dont think VT has ever played Baylor, so lets schedule a Home and Home and find out!You guys and TTU are both high on my list f OOC schools I hope VT will look at.It was NOT a new movement. Many of the schools had attempted or flirted with doing so long before WW2.

The Harvard Faculty and President Charles Elliot had campaigned for years to ban the playing of football in the 1890s, and had also tried to ban the curve ball pitch when he learned it was based on deceiving the batter. 

Columbia and Cornell had both dropped the sport at times before the 1905 formation of the NCAA. 

Then with the explosion of numbers in colleges on the GI Bill, it meant that in the era before scholarship limits the big boys could simply pay for larger teams than anyone else to help them win. 

Thus many schools not just the Ivies shied away from the expanding costs, and thus you have NCAA reforms for limited roster numbers and expenses, and then in 1976 the split between NCAA Division IA and IAA in football. 

But it is also not fair to say the league "Abandoned" athletics, they still play a total of 33 sports as a conference and indeed was only formalized as a conference in the mid 50's, play outside schools, and award conference championships, and even still participats in many NCAA championships such as the Men's and Women's Basketball tourneys. 

They are also not the only schools to no longer offer direct athletic scholarships, Georgetown for instance also does not for its football team. 

So in short you have the traditional concern at many of the Ivies dating back to the start of college sports about the potential commercialization and corrupting influence, and the looming spending competition and differences between the haves and have nots meant the Ivies decided almost to head it off and take themselves out of the fight amongst themselves to avoid a runaway arms race nobody would win. Should note that NASA's predecessor, NACA predates the USAF, the original funding bill for NACA was actually passed in 1915, and had as a general mission to study all problems associated with aeronautics. 

This also meant they were up and running even before the Army Air Service really got off the ground. So you have this body that for 40 years by the 50's had been tasked with studying aeronautical exploration, and thus trying to go higher and faster for science. 

The Air Force is tasked with a combat oriented goal, it is in general a different task and not all together a smart move to put your military in control of your scientific exploration, tends to skew results and goals. When that booty too good. 

- Dadi Nicolas, 2015Well between Beamer, Stoops, Spurrier, and Snyder, at least ONE of the long timer old coaches is doing well this year. I mean in our defense we eventually scored on WF. Since most the time it only counts business days that gives you 2 full weeks to get shit done, that is a long enough time where courts and agencies can say that you had ample opportunity to comply. Scott pulling out a gun to just "murder" illusion Hellfire Club members while telling Peter that he has just had a hell of a day and decided to say fuck it, may be the peak Cyclops moment for me.

Or the moment during Messiah Complex when he tells Xavier to stop telling him how to do the job he trained him to do. Its precisely about what DOESNT change, the traditions, the institutions, the history of the school, the rivalries. 

Its about being a fan because you CHOSE to be, and you picked going there or following them, not because you were born into it for the most part. 

Its about having the agency as a fan to select which small tribe in the larger landscape to be a apart of, because just like the institutions, that instantly connects you to all the fans and classes of years past. 

So screw it, take the names off the jerseys, but all I need to know is that those kids on the field and in the stands still decided to come to the same school I did and try to embody the same values i did an that is all I need to know to cheer them on. Settling for all time who was the better shot, gimpy Kaiser Wilhelm or Lucky Luciano. Week 3 of this year @Purdue VT had a blocked punt for a TD, sack and strip for a TD, and then multiple offensive TD's. And we helped!Fox and CBS have locked down the NFL game market, meaning you are only going to get 1 game on each per timeslot. 

They LIKE having it that way (both NFL and networks) as if people want more they have to buy the pricey subscriptions from the NFL. 

For college ESPN jumped in int he 90's and is basically king. Meaning that they can put a game on their 5 different channels. Then you do have Fox with a few of the conferences on their 2 channels, NBC has their Notre Dame deal, and the SEC with CBS. 

TL'DR, ESPN saw the value in saturating the market with CFB due to so many games and jumped in. While the NFL likes keeping it exclusive to also drive subscribers for out of market games. You can becomes Chief of Staff without being elected, why would you risk losing when you can just build a career as a staffer. 

As a senior staff member it isnt your name being dragged through the mud even if the guy wins, it isnt your past being looked at, and win or lose if you are good you can get a job in someones office, while a losing elected official might be shit out of luck. 

To say nothing of the different job skills, such as being able to actually manage a staff being required for a career staffer. Because it is easy to go with the most recent one that everyone remembers more. 

In the early 2000's it was Columbine, then it was Virginia Tech (still the most deadly school shooting), then it was Sandy Hook, now it is the Oregon College. like this: https://usatthebiglead.files.wordpress.com/2014/11/b3esvencqaafwdn.jpg?w=295&amp;h=231&amp;crop=1I mean I guess he has a point Ive never seen Galactus end up like this: http://goodcomics.comicbookresources.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/06/thanosofftojail.JPGNope post AvX, the Cuckoo's have discovered hair dye and Emma forgot how clothes work, again. IDK in the last run of Secret Avengers Wade meets up with Hawkeye while leading an AIM posse. 

They have a grand old time, 3 legged races, pie eating contests, karaoke, and then blow up an oil platform together. He didnt last week either. 

You mean over 600 Billion. 

Either way it accounts for less than 1/5th of ever tax dollar so like any other federal program reducing it some would help, but there are plenty of other larger shares that could be looked at for bigger returns. http://www.cbpp.org/research/policy-basics-where-do-our-federal-tax-dollars-goOct 25, 2007, Thursday night.

 Then #2 BC led by Matty Ice scored 2 TD's in the last  minutes of regulation to beat #7 VT in Blacksburg 14-10. I suspect that side could be the flags that Groton has built ships for. Since you also have the "Dont Tread on me old style jack" the original Grand Union flag, and a few others. It sure sucked, but getting them back and winning the ACCCG was nice. So one thing that absolutely isnt appreciated for it as much as it should be is how the field itself is different.

The Hash marks(so the farthest towards either side the ball can be snapped) are less than 20 ft apart in the NFL, and 40ft in the NCAA.

That means there is a much larger Field side for pitch and option plays to the outside to develop and for holes or out of position defenders to be exploited. I mean, Georgia Tech DID win the Orange Bowl last year and beat an SEC team in Mississippi State.Well it is also perfectly possible that over the decades and centuries the motion used changed. 

Just like the way the armed forces or uniformed forces salute has changed greatly. As an Eagles fan it makes our loss to them much more palatable. But you figured out Reddit? I can SORT of get Nova, he did get made an Avenger afterall,

But he is fucking Nova, he needs to be out there doing Nova things in the galaxy, maybe he should be with the Guardans instead of the damn Thing. Pakistan is in Asia.You remember Jane, Thor's sometimes Lady friend?

Well she cut out the middleman and now just IS Thor, also it gives her cancer or something. I want to say De Casta cut him and Black Wido a bigger singing bonus. The Avengers: turns out Sunspot could outspend Tony!And are you some sort of Reddit Idiot Savant?You prefer your Tokens Yellow not Tan/medium Brown. Valid desire.The Avengers: No not the cool ones you know from the movies!Too much of an idiot to work the rest of the internet but somehow Reddit clicks.

Like the mentally handicapped who cant dress themselves but can play Beethoven. 

I'd tell you to Google it but we know how well that would go.BULLSHIT.

The SAME OLD ACC story would have been: Oh Look, VT won the ACC again but it doesnt matter cause they only beat 1 or 2 low ranked teams, and have 1 meh ACC loss and one rough OOC loss. I mean when you start 0-4 in conference play you cant expect good things to happen. Yep. His team wasnt big, fast, or strong enough, unfortunately it appears to be genetic. FUCK YOU CHAOS!! YOU STAY AWAY FROM BEAMER FOR AT LEAST 3 MORE MONTHS!Rivalry trophy will be incoming. Do we get included?

I mean we basically got our governor to break up the original Miami, Syracuse, BC deal. I would accept this, especially if we get Major Victory, and the baller as fuck, olor coordinated, space storm troopers version of the GotG, not Bendis's poor interpretation of the movie team. Thats a motherfucker who knocks. In between the wars, and even really once WW1 began the move was to strip up wood decks VERY quickly. 

One less thing to either burn or worse cause splinters, and in peace to maintain.

For the US BB's for instance its why you see it disappear after their first hull upgrades. 

Replaced with an anti rust paint cover, and a surface layer usually in a version the now universal Haze/Battleship Gray. The Soviet and now Russian Navy were less uniform about the top coat, and in many cases simply left the anti rust paint open for multiple reasons including ease of upkeep, which exposed its red color. Not very "Actiony" but if you want just about the most honest movie about the USN in WW2 you sit yourself down and watch the Caine Mutiny. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CaWOi5lfwyII mea, you get anything hot enough and it will burn, and there are plenty of things aboard a ship that can contribute and help, like ammunition, and fuel(especially if there are aviation facilities aboard), being the most common. 

Besides if it wasn't at least of some concern, why don't they get used anymore? Fuck Miami, Fuck them and their shitty fans, fuck them and their coke'd up fans, fuck them and their convict fans, fuck their shitty school that has had perpetual performance anxiety ever since joining the All Canes Conference. 

Frank's 13-9 record vs those fuck bois is one of the best things about his tenure. I mean if you can name me one good thing that school has ever done I would be shocked and amazed. 

In all seriousness it is probabaly the most underrated rivalry in the ACC. 

We do not like each other, all the way back to the pre Big East days. We were also the team to ruin their 2003 season, while they got us in 2005, and in 2001 we were the absolutely closest game they played squeaking out 26-24 when we dropped a 2pt conversion on a late TD. 

There has been some great football over the years and its continued when both schools jumped ship in 2004 together. Exactly it was big until 2005ish, then one or the other school just wasn't great the same time as the other. 

But if you want further proof we have our own rivalry wiki page and are listed on each other's wiki pages as rivals! 

So ya know, the internet says we are. Its a start, I can respect that!

Scar fans, how would you feel about Shane Beamer applying for the HC gig?

Frank is odds on done this year too, and while his coaching RB's has been up and down, his Def and ST credentials dating back to his early days remain unquestioned. Shane has also been linked to interviewing for gigs even before this at Ark State most notably. 

What say you?Well good to hear. He got a VERY raw deal in Blacksburg.  And did his best which was actually good for a few games a year. 

I would love to see him come back to Tech at some point. But really just be successful and appreciated wherever.And none when you lost to VT, so clearly we are the ultimate thing standing between Miami and greatness.

And ya know what is a really sad number...

ACCCG Appearances:

Duke: 1

WAKE FOREST: 1

Miami: 0

ACC Titles Won:

WAKE FOREST: 1

Miami: 0Why?

One school has shown an ability to develop talent, the other has a coaching staff that does nothing but make good local talent regress. With that reasoning, when you toss out the coach who ahs shown now ability to rebound, then yes I can see you reasoning of who has the higher ceiling. So sorry to revive a dead thread but one run I don't see listed here is Yost and Kyle's New X-Men run, it is about 30 issues and is basically the warm up to their X-Force run which you got part of in Messiah War. 

It serves as the main introduction of X-23 into the universe, after the two created her when working on the X-Men Evolution show. 

Also features primarily the remaining students of the Xavier school post M-Day, and their struggle to survive in the wake of attacks from within and without. 

High point is probably the Mercury Arc, and when Skottie Young is brought on for an arc dealing with Hell and Belasco, and then a nice interlude where we see the school actually try to function.  Its being written and produced by the guys who blew up a bus full of children to prove a point (Yost and Kyle) I am fairly certain we will get some meaningful impactful death in it. I suspect the huge advantage the USN gained through better radars is why we wont see night battles for a very long time. I think it would be interesting, and much more national personalities in ships.

The IJN would be much more reliant on searchlights and optical tools, while the USN could track targets on their better radar.

So maybe the IJN can see better when zoomed in, but the USN has better detection range in general or something to give the fleets some personality. 

Night surface actions are also why IJN DD's and CL's have so many torps, rush in and do damage and rush out. Yep, which means it will likely be the same as normal, with just reduced ranges for detection and some upgrades that cost too much and already exist on the ships, maybe replace the scout planes with star shells. There is a famous quote by the German Military thinker Von Clausewitz. 

"War is the continuation of politics by other means"

So war is a tool you can use when you feel strongly enough as a government about an issue. It could be a simple as you feel strongly enough to fight to defend your territory and existence as a nation from others, or that you feel some grievance that was not addressed through civil, non violent coercion, or any other means, must be entrusted to force of arms. A Bachelor degree granting institution will of course have higher costs than one that normally only grants associates degrees. 

You need double the course work essentially, meaning either double the teachers, or pay them to teach double the classes. You will also likely need larger libraries, or teaching facilities to deal with the more advanced topics a bachelors will cover. 

Plus its not like States themselves are helping much. For instance Virginia in 2013 provided only 13%  of UVA's budget. Man its gonna be hard to beat us when we are already playing Miami this week...

Duke is having their bye week then plays @VT on the 24th. 

And if lets say Vt beats Miami that would leave them 4-3 (with a 2-1 ACC record) while Duke would be 5-1 (with a 2-1 ACC record), now both had tough OOC losses, VT to ECU and Duke to NW. 

But VT will also have Brewer back by then, you might remember him from leading the offense to lead over #1 tOSU back on Labor Day. 

Duke's wins also come over a terrible Army team, a middling Tulane, and a bad GT team, and a great defense and terrible offense in BC.

Duke has yet to beat a team with a winning record. I would pump the breaks on how good they really are and if they should be favored, but th VT game will be an excellent litmus test for them,. Really I don't think it would be a bad loss for either team, we don't know a ton about either team, they have each had inconsistent play all year so far. 

But the biggest stat I think is we cant beat Duke till they beat a team with a winning record, if VT beats Miami on Sat it will be their chance. The Sea Lords are the professional heads of the Royal Navy, they will be serving officers. 

The First Lord is a political appointment and will not be a serving officer.

Same way that in the US the CNO- Chief of Naval Operations is the professional head and an admiral, and the Secretary of the Navy is a civilian political appointee. Can you source that? Everything ive read indicated that while they had passable search radar, their FC systems were not able to offer the same data, offering only bearing not necessarily an accurate distance, hence having to rely on visual, and creating problem such as at the Denmark Straight when both ships' range finders were impacted by salt spray. It should be noted that even before, and indeed back to the founding of the NCAA schools often attempted to limit player compensation. 

For instance Harvard held out a football player when it was found he had a deal with a cigarette company and in return for endorsing them he got a cut of all packs sold to fans on gameday. 

Though conversely Wisconsin helped fund their program by having players sell ads for the programs and got a small cut of it. But what about 5 minutes of Hunter beating men to death a la Russel Crowe "Fightin Round the World"?It was just cover so Lincoln could raid your booze cabinet. Or what if one of their cars gets in a fender bender and they team up to just murder the entire family of whoever did it?I mean if she just avoids him and never talks to him again then they cant technically break up right? And Brand DID do some really shitty douche moves especially to the X-Men early on. or just how many of them have actual rabies...I mean sure when used correctly, or with a well drilled crew the heavy units of the USN did just fine at night and were dominant by 1944. 

But it also glosses over how little training many of the crews had together, and how it was in many cases rushed with the massive expansion of the Navy. And that heavy ships were prioritized in getting the better search and FC radars than light units, leaving CL's and DD's shit out of luck until there was an opportunity for them. 

Tassaforanga offers a good example, while the USN task force of  4 CA's 1 CL and 5 DD's was able to become aware of the IJN ships at 23k yards a firing solution was not achieved until 7k. And due to bad luck and poor positioning the USN got the worst of it in the battle and lost a cruiser sunk and 3 more mauled to 1 DD sunk.

Honestly since the game models and makes actual fire control automated for the player the best thing we can do is just give USN ships WHEN the appropriate upgrades for radar and FC are researched, a boost to night detection, or leave it similar to their daytime values, while ships without it, namely low tiers and most IJN ships with much reduced values, but perhaps a way to use spotlights, maybe to see farther only when zoomed in but it gives away that ships position? Fine but that means the IJN team gets a bunch of battleships and low tier CV's and the USN team gets nothing but Cleveland's and Essex's. this is gold Jerry, GOLDIDK Hunter is getting himself into some pretty scary situations...Can I just say I see Hunter as basically the young version of Gotham's version of Alfred. 

Former SAS Operators (or did they make Alfred SBS?) who left under mysterious circumstances, and who took injured and hurting younger men under their wings and tried to help out, at least Hunter tried at times with Fitz, and Bruce. 

Both have had problems maintaining stable domestic lives, and its implied both have had problems with the bottle at times. 

And both are thoroughly wonderful of course. 100 Fitz and Simmons, 100 years, forever and ever Fitz and Simmons.

WWW.FitzandSimmons.com, Fitz and Simmons ever and ever.comThat we know of, but lets face it, that is probably not the worst thing either has done, nor the youngest person either has probably had to use violence on. 

From what I recall its implied that Hunter got out and into business for himself after a few too many problems with his seniors, he was a LT so he likely would have been leading at least a platoon sized team, and he mentions having been to Africa, maybe killing some child soldiers was enough to make him change careers? I hope we do get it, would likely be one of the fast CV's in game, would be neat to have a CV tailored to staying close to the main thrust for quick turnaround, could be a flavor of Soviet CV's however many they actually have.

There are about 5-6 different design studies and partially built or ordered ships they can throw in too, also they got a RN ship on loan, and Italian BB's as spoils of war. Yes and half of them are not even modeled in game so of limited value.

Additionally do we want nations to stick to only indigenous designs or are we going to be ok with lend lease ships, would be helpful in filling out the Russian tree. Ahem this image has some issues. 

First Saint Frank was born in Mount Airy, NC.

Second the image is now an outdated version, please see the new, remarkably terrible Wake Forest Victory celebration image below: http://media.cmgdigital.com/shared/lt/lt_cache/thumbnail/960/img/photos/2015/10/10/8f/a2/bb39f1b0c29b40ef9cb4d26be04fa707-7949d71c7fd142dea86ba141fefa5869-2.jpgGlancing at it looks like all the ones on that list are either for Search, AAA usage,  or Air Warning, and no discussion on performance or comparative usage. 

Navweps has some great articles, but is that really it on Britsh systems?

This one: http://www.navweaps.com/index_tech/tech-052.htm

Seems to take a dim view of British Radar usage and quality, while it was effective for search, it was underused for actual FC, and thus they relied upon the antiquated range finders mounted for each individual turret, which as mentioned were hampered by conditions at Denmark Straight. 

So while yes they did have systems as warning and eventually everyone got on board late and post war for FC purposes the USN remains the only ones to dive in from the get go with automated and radar based fire control. Consider this. 

There was an IS before they took over any oil fields, do you think that there will be an IS if they lost them? The answer is a resounding YES. 

While as part of a coordinated strategy it could cut off an income stream it isn't some sort of death knell.

Extremist movements, besides the belief factor, are easy to keep going because they can be run CHEAPLY, like really cheaply. 

Old artillery shells are easy to get and you can get an old AK for a few dollars, so while more cash helps, a lack of cash is not going to suddenly stop the IS, terror movements can inflict a great deal of suffering with very little overhead. 

Well the Chinese Coast Guard is experiencing a rapid expansion and militarization alongside the PLAN, so we could see something like an expansion of the current water hose games or collisions we see between fishing, enforcement, and CG vessels in the SCS between China, and the Philippines. 

What if a Chinese CG vessel sinks a Filipino fishing boat or a Filipino CG ships gets fired on for trying to enforce their claims?

Now likely this would be stopped before it went further, or heaven forbid a USN ships is fired on, but it would certainly not be a peaceful assertion of China's power. Welp now I feel dumb for forgetting its in there, I hate that damn ship so much, so many poor SCAR's have fallen to it. A fun twist would also to give the US the USS Robin, the codename for HMS Victorious when the US used her for a few months in the South Pacific in the summer of 1943, and actually received modifications to operate Wildcats ( she hadn't had Martlets aboard yet) and Avengers, and worked alongside the Saratoga for a time. I mean there is the one awkward panel in the one SHIELD comic where Bobbi calls him Clint in bed. Seriously, the duo has earned some credit to see what they can do.

They were fine with blowing up a bus full of kids to prove mutants were still hated, your point isn't being upvoted enough. By having to bring in another writer to balance out what Yost wrote Im actually a little bummed. 

Go back and check out some of Yost and his partner Craig Kyle (who is producing the film) and their work on X-Men Evolution, or better X-Force or the X-23 min series. They can do apocalyptic and violently blunt as befits the end of the world. 

I am willing to give them the benefit of the doubt that they can do, at least until Marvel orders yet more rewrites. if you have ever seen a town do beach replenishment after a storm where they bring in sand once it is washed away this is the same principal, they are just starting from scratch. I thought it was good, also marked the point when they finally realized nobody liked the New Mutants squad and the Hellions where the one positive of the run to that point.

My favorite remains the 6 issues when Skottie Young was doing the art when they go to Hell and then all get counseling.  Agreed, though he even did pretty good when he was in full control of the Rocket Raccoon solo too, so he can write too. I don't but I really think I need to start dropping "What were you thinking Shipmate" some more in chat.

Just a nice classy way of asking "what the fucking hell you were thinking you dumb fuck monkey shit?" Nah I mean I don't think there is a single person in today's Navy who DOESNT use "Shipmate" ironically. Don't worry Shipmate will get you through plenty of situations where dumbfuckery is involved.

People think millennia's are the most ironic group around? Negative, it is PO's in the United States Navy when confronted with an idiot Ensign they are forced to attempt to correct respectfully. It began as an attempt to emphasize unity in the fleet by calling everyone shipmates.  Now its just "you jacked up BIG TIME but I cant yell at you right now"Meh, Some Officers are big on it, but its mostly the Petty Officers and Chief's which propagate it. Its a good clear shot across the bow that whoever you are talking too is not in the right, and had best correct themselves, at least thats what it has become, very handy for situations where profanity might not be appropriate, or if say you cant really curse out an Officer as a Chief, even if they are in the wrong, unless the relationship is there, so it works.

There are also plenty of CO's that get hard about taking kids to Mast (basically a ship board disciplinary board where the Capt is Judge, and Jury), lets them turn around to the Squadron and say "look how hard I am being on disicipline" regardless of BS reasoning, or actual problems aboard the ship. Especially amongst the Surface Warfare community there is a terrible culture and low retention leading to many shitty officers getting commands, the Navy has already relieved over 20 members of the command triad (CO, XO, Command Master Chief) aboard different Destroyers and Cruisers this year, for everything from using military email to set up meetings with Thai whores on port calls, to hooking up with a female Department Head and not leaving your cabin for days at a time when she moved in and leaving your Junior Officers and the rest of the Ward Room to run the ship. Its the same difference as a German referring to their nation as Deutschland and us as Germany... So Laura is with a rich, young, mutant from Cali, whose power allows him to amongst other things fly?

While Julian is dating a girl who turns into a shark and literally turns people into chum?

But thanks to Liu we are not likely to ever see them get back together, baring Yost and Kyle writing a book with them in it again.  Yea, entire island of women heroes, AND Bucky...And Dust got a panel! So Kitty cant tell the difference between promiscuity and borderline sexual assault? Good for her. 

Also Im let her keep finish, BUT PETER QUILL "YOU DA REAL STAR-LORD"We DO have 4 year Bachelor's Degree granting schools designed to be cheaper options for people that live near them.

Thats the entire point of State/Public Schools. So University of BLANK STATE, or BLANK State University, or BLANK Tech, or BLANK A&amp;M, were all founded for that purpose, and many states like Texas, PA, NC, and Cali have extensive campuses all across the state for that exact purpose. They receive at least some funding from the state legislature and thus charge in state tuition less than out of state. 

In general a booster is somebody who donates to a school, and to an Athletic Dept in particular. Many schools require a yearly donation in order to purchase things like Season Tickets. Many high dollar donors become very close to the Athletic Department as their money does talk, and the school does want to make them feel appreciated. 

However the NCAA has strict rules about interactions between boosters and players themselves, in particular a player basically cant receive gifts from someone just because they are an athlete, so they couldnt for instance get a car and never be asked to pay for it, or be given a house to use because they play football. And they certainly cant receive money from supporters either to bribe them to attend that school, or to do certain things like make appearances, sign stuff. 

That is the sort of stuff that went on, along with more than a few coke and hooker fueled boat parties. Because on of the many bodies that is more powerful than even city wide corruption (if anything so sinister exists and it isn't just a bunch of people self interested and who don't care) is the federal court system.

As I understand it the trial for the shooting has now become a federal trial, which means many much more powerful actors are involved, including the judge. Fuck that.

Can you tell me how having a MAC and C-USA team square off in Boca Raton the week before Christmas takes away from the prestige of the Rose Bowl? How rewarding the efforts of kids whoa re never going to play football at the next level somehow cheapens the Playoff/NY6 games?

Hell I wish we had 70 of them and every team played an extra OOC game at the end of the year. Its December there isn't exactly much good on to take up dead time this time of year.

I would watch Kansas play UCF if it killed 3 hours on a Tuesday night, and you know what it would still mean something because those kids would all play their hearts out to get at least one win on the year. Is there a return policy?

I think my Scott Loeffler might be defective :(Not if Scott Loeffler gets hire first! Except the 'Media" isn't the whole World.

I think probably making it Al-Baghdadi would have been better, use it as another spot to ram home how terrible he is and the need to defeat him. Between his leadership and his supporters I don't think anyone can downplay his impact on the entire year, not just the 2nd half like Trump once his campaign began. Not to mention Hitler, Stalin (both before and during WW2), and the Ayatollah Khamenei have all been named it too. Brandt in 1970 and Adenauer in 53. 

Though if we want to be perfectly technical they were both only Chancellors of West Germany. The more you know!Brandt in 1970, then Adenauer in 53, then Hitler in 38. And after he gobbled up the Sudetenland.And being an All American doesn't give his opinion more weight than you or I. Ill be watching!And we are saying that we haven't reached the point of it being too much. 

If you hold that the lower tier bowls are too diluted to be enjoyable, why do we allow the Sun Belt or Mountain West to play football at all if it isn't a sufficiently good product? Its the Whedons, they really dotn like killing of characters permanently. 

Exhibit 1, Angel and Spike from Buffy/ Angel then getting his own show. And you know Coulson is gonna flip shit when he figures out he fucked up in leaving Ward's body there.

True enough, and do not mean to mischaracterize your point.

But that team bond isn't the only form of relationship that grows around football. It is the generational bond of a dad surprising his son with a trip to the bowl. Or the alumni who hasn't seen the team live in 20 years going to the bowl by him, or the extended family of a player finally seeing him play that also are deeply in twined in the sport.

And all of those can be deeply impacted by having just that one more game in a unique location. Marvel's Agents of WHACKY WAVING INFLATTIBLE ARM FLAILING TUBE MAN. But did take a gag underwear gift literally!Also a very subtly deep character, between the hints at his SAS past, and his lashing out with anger after kinda accidentally killing one of the few old time friends he had. Wave Ryder/US Navy Ensign.Except SHIELD has sufficiently strayed from plenty of other comic tropes that we can treat it as it sown thing. And that own things has all the other tropes and trappings of every other Whedon project that either of them have worked on. 

Besides Spider-Verse undid that one too if we count alternate versions which also mean jean grey and Wolverine are back. have you seen a previous Whedon show, mind control, body snatching/ possession is literally in every single one.

yes its a trope, and one they do a lot, but they do it well. hell Dollhouse was literally nothing but mind control and worked out alright. Indeed.Stargate/ SG-1 a Goa'uld, little worm that controls a human and gives it powers, ruled ancient earth and have a space empire. And Ros tried getting Coulson to go to a meeting at Cheyenne Mountain! Another interesting trend is of those characters, the ones that appear on the Pilot as "main" cast that die, come back, or don't die until the very end of the show.

So we basically take everyone on that list off but Darla and Cordelia, and that one dick lawyer from Angel, Tahmoh Penkiett's guy from Dollhouse, and yes Wash. Since they provide the most direct comparison to Ward.

But hell even in SHIELD we have had lots of similar turnover for arc based or season based characters: Hand, Garrett, Trip, Raina, Cal (ish), Jaiying, Not Admiral Adama, Whitehall. Nah, in all honesty every speech on the floor of the House and Senate, this was the House, are mostly for show to toe party loyalty, generate sound bites and look good. You will notice how empty the chamber is, there is actual work being done, on the budget for instance since the deadline is Friday, but not much that is actually up for debate or vote on the floor right now, so lots of Reps do stuff like this during slow times. 

The real work is done in Committee. very nice to see. 

And what this means is that being read as part of the minutes of the House of Representatives this is now going to be preserved and copies made for posterity.

Even if we have a nuclear holocaust, there will be a record of how great Coach Beamer was. At this point I think he decided that for a few years:

Winning a title in Blacksburg &gt; than trying his hand as a HC

He has only ever worked at 1 P5 school so for all intents and purposes he is a local, ahs been for 30 years, and is as invested as Beamer ever was. So winning our first title means something to him deeply. 

So it seems Fuente has won him over to at least give it a shot to see if he can deliver the offense to match Bud's defense to win a  title. Less so about Coulson being knocked out for so long, super bad for you. No Coulson, Mayonnaise is not an instrument.The relationship between both France and the UK with the US could fill books.

But suffice to say that the outbreak of the French Revolution so soon after the US, became a major political divide, especially once it turned violent in the Reign of Terror. And the Revolutionary Government and the US found themselves butting heads so much so that each nation deployed ships to the Caribbean and a few small battles erupted during the Quasi War. 

Then several decades and a few governments later the French this time under Napoleon III land in Mexico and put his relative Maximilian on the throne (who would later be assassinated after an uprising), and while nothing was done at the time because the US was fighting the Civil War it was noticed. 

Just as the war ends major Union forces are deployed to the Texas border and ready to invade of France doesnt scale down their forces in the US enforcing the Monroe Doctrine. 

And while the US and France find themselves allies again decades later in WW1 by then France had become firmly entrenched as the #2 global power behind Britain and the US/UK relationship had grown much closer. Both were also doing pretty dick things to their neighbors too, in the name of establishing a protective cushion and regional solidarity/stability.

Japan= Manchuria, Korea, China

Russia= Georgia, Ukraine/CrimeaKind of hard to invade your own territory. Either way that whole sequence especially the ending was the closest weve had to amoral jerk Quill in years, that short monologue was speaking closer to the heart of DNA Quill than joking Bendis Quill and it was glorious. Bendis can be great?

Really.

Are you sure?

Sometimes.I mean, He WAS Right.also.

"Ive had some problems in the past"

Yes Wanda, that is one way of putting. Can we also agree this is probably the most interesting Matt Murdock weve had in years?Yeah all I remember before was her ending up mind controlled by AIM and fighting it during Quake's disastrous tenure as Director during Secret Avengers.

Then I maybe remember her laying low with Bucky for a bit?For Tech at least it is probably Marcus Vick. If the team could just stay off earth and move to knowhere and be the new grade a cosmic book thatd be fine. hell just stick her in an X-Men book, because as Bobby says it isnt X-Men without some bullshit dimension or time hopping. Well I mean the Zeppelin fits if its supposed to be the 1930's it was on the transit route, like the Hindenburg flew past on its way to land in NJ. So im sure everyone also noticed the dirigible. 

But instead of a passenger Zeppelin I suspect it is supposed to be a USN Airship like the USS Macon. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/USS_Macon_%28ZRS-5%29

Used for coastal patrol and scouting for the fleet they also served as test beds for parasite fighter and flying carrier concepts!Do you mean in the 30s or now? Well the government of Russia firmly falls into the group of aggressively expansionist powers for both, between the Winter War, their multiple invasions of Poland, and gobbling up the Baltic states.

If we are talking 30's we can actually then put the US pretty squarely in the group of states that weren't looking for a fight. They were reducing their presence in the Philippines in order to let them runt heir own affairs, had hosted the talks for the Naval treaties to prevent another arms race, and of course choosing not to aid the economy of an aggressively expansionist empire in Japan. Nor can we put the likes of Britain and France in the looking for a fight category, they were willing to accept the absorption of Austria and stealing of the Sudetenland if it meant peace. Not exactly moves of asshole countries spoiling for a fight. 

And if you cant even decide which it is you are asking im impressed you were able to figure out how to use a computer let alone Reddit!Mike Vick just running circles around dudes.Dammit Daisy, would you forget about the stupid Pioneers! They ate Coral, rode rocks and went through Terringeensis, and do you see any of them around today? No! They are all dead. Indeed.As the other response said yes many ships were built on the West Coast, but many of the heavy capitol ships (battleships and carriers) were still from the great shipyards of the North East and Mid Atlantic.

And that was fine and the USN had no problems with it, you point out the Yamato's, and part of the reason they are so crazy is that they were the first ever Post Panamax ships, and thus the only ships afloat during WW2 that couldn't fit through the canal, and the same s True for many years after and it really isn't until the mid 60's when more and more super carriers come on line that it becomes an issue.

Also while the Montanas would have been too big, in 1940 SECNAV Knox approved a plan to expand the locks meaning they would have been able to fit. And just now almost a century later we are finally in the process of actually building new larger locks for the canal.

But on a larger note the USN was ok with being limited by the Canal, as proven by Essex class and Iowa class ships  you could have the most effective warships of the time ( compared to the sluggish, over built and bloated Yamato) and still use it. the USN was built upon being an effective 2 ocean navy and that meant being able to rapidly shift forces between coasts as needed. While less flashy the inter-service conflicts between the branches of the armed services have been with us since the founding of the nation.

Though perhaps got no more heated than in 1949 with the "Revolt of the Admirals". Essentially when an anti Navy and Marine Corps SECDEF took charge the tensions between the Navy and the Air Force over unification as the DoD and the future structure of the military boiled over. 

The cancellation of the first large postwar carrier, the USS AMERICA, caused outrage in the fleet and led the SECNAV to resign. In very public hearings before Congress the Admirals questioned the ability of the Air Force to effectively protect the nation through nukes alone, while the Truman Administration saw this as disloyalty.

While Congressional hearings found no outright wrongdoing they rebuked Secretary Johnson fro not including Congress in the decision to can the ship and for his ham fisted handling of balancing the services budgets. 

The Navy would in large part be vindicated less than a year later when the Korean War broke out. Due to the budget cuts Army and marine formations were woefully under prepared for combat, and the Navy was so short of ships that they couldn't even enforce a blockade of the limited coastline of Korea. They were not crazy about it to be sure. And in large part resisted "over unification" and a major point of contention was a move to turnover all USMC Aviation to the Air Force that was quickly and quietly dropped. 

But what mollified them to a degree was that the Secretaries of the other services weren't any better off. All 3 of them answered to the SECDEF, as opposed to earlier plans such as initially suggested by Marshall which the Navy saw as potentially being made subordinate.  Agree with most of the findings, but find fault with I.

Congress is also not the body which can decide if the Executive's arguments are sufficient. They can say it violates the Constitution all they want but to assume that ability themselves is an equally great violation of the separation of powers. Not likely since the ACLU organized Latif v. Holder, the primary challenge currently to the list, which in November won in the Circuit level, the court agreeing with the plaintiffs that they could challenge placement on the list in local Districts and not DC as the govt wanted. There absolutely are recourses. the first is kinda dumb but it is to ask the TSA to take you off.

if you say no then the courts are open, Mokdad v Lynch is currently the benchmark case to see how it goes and the plaintiffs won their most recent round to try the case in District courts in early November. 

And Latif v Holder run by the ACLU already got the previous methods of redress and process ruled Unconstitutional. FYI for everyone interested in the evolving Jurisprudence on the NFL.

The last main challenge, organized by the ACLU is Latif v. Holder. The plaintiffs won and the redress process was ordered changed as it was unconstitutional but no hard timeline was set. But now essentially the TSA has to tell a person if they are on the list.https://www.aclu.org/cases/latif-et-al-v-holder-et-al-aclu-challenge-government-no-fly-list

Currently it is being followed up by Mokdad v Lynch, which the Circuit court rejected the govt's assertion that the case must be heard in DC, which is a victory in and of itself and the case was dismissed without prejudice so the TSA itself could be made party to the suit. https://www.lawfareblog.com/government-bid-shut-down-challenge-no-fly-list-grounded

But make no mistake the Courts in the past 18 months have been taking a more and more dim view of some of DHS's actions. I think in the next year we will continue to see that trend that after a decade of being more hands off the courts are again asserting their considerable weight of judicial review even in areas concerned with national security. I can see that, but we use the Courts to cut to the heart of issues and force summary decisions and judgments on a huge range of issues. Football of all codes, along with rugby more or less all branched off from a 'Proto Football" in the mid 1800's in England.

Gridiron football then came about because the various college and universities in the US changed the rules of Rugby to what they wanted. And at the time kicking the ball on the ground was legal, so the football name was not as weird at the time. The early codes of Gridiron, such as played between Princeton and Rutgers in 1869, DID also allow the ball to be kicked and advanced that way. Even if backed by gold what reason would the rest of the world habe to trust US new dollars or their word after pulling that stunt? Should also note that the VA predates the DoD. The Dept of Veterans Affairs as we know it was created in 1930. 

Back then the War Dept and Navy Dept were both also separate Cabinet level posts. They were not combined until after WW2 when the modern defense establishment came into existence. 

So it made sense to combine the post service care into one dept instead of having a Navy VA and Army VA. &gt;Mockingbird in her new winged costume!

A gift from Parker Industries!

Also I am excited for more 616 Phil, loved him in Secret Avengers, a lot more hard edged than MCU and it is wonderful. Then it becomes a matter of cost and efficiency.

If the DoD is going to provide and staff the healthcare, which is the case in some facilities (on base facilities, Walter Reed) that means youve had to invest the cost of training them to be soldiers/sailors/air men/marines AND to be medical personnel. When in the end which one do you really need?

Then if you are going to put it under DoD, you are going to have to put it in the chain of command, meaning staffs reporting all the way up to the Joint Chiefs, and every regional commander or head is going to have a staff, and all of them as military are going to represent a MUCH larger investment than civilian side would be. To give an idea of the cost you incur by using military personnel to staff things, ti costs about 150K just to send a soldier through Recruit Training for 8-12 weeks, and at that point he is still basically useless but can salute when needed and dress himself.

It would frankly cost even more and take even more of the budget away from actual healthcare to be under the DoD.  That is very True. And is how much of the DoD's and VA's medical and support structure is billeted, precisely because it costs so much more have someone in uniform in the spot. And placing them inside the DoD means there WILL be more persons in uniform in the system.

Another rather compelling argument which has been more or less aid is again the different purposes of the agencies. We WANT the DoD to be good at breaking things and people when we want them too, and acknowledge that it is hard enough to be good at that, and it is even harder to then be expected to be good at fixing things and people, Lord knows some of our efforts at nation building over the years attest to that. 

So by placing the VA under its own Secretary and Cabinet level leader the whole Vet support network gets something out of it. A specific and accountable advocate. Someone and a Dept whose ENTIRE mission is based around them, not just as a sideshow tacked on to the rest of the DoD. Never buy another bond again, refuse to trade with the US, pressure their governments to sanction the US. You cant use the threat of nuclear annihilation to try to force trade, at that point it becomes tribute and even the US doesnt have a large enough DoD to enforce that.

Look at Argentina to see what happens when eve a regionally powerful country has everyone lose faith in its ability to pay. 

To say nothing of the fact that most of the major US Bond holders are other US agencies, and US citizens or organizations. SO why would the US Govt essentially destroy the wealth or savings, or business of its own people. It wouldnt if it wanted to stay around very long. And you know the nice thing about all those "invasions" they left every time! Can you name a time the Russian state left an area of their own volition. 

And yes France and Britain were already in hard core De Colonizing mode. Look at their Empires before WW1 and then at the start of WW2. Each one let go massive chunks without a fuss. 

Sure nobody is perfect but in the end ill take the one that didn't sign a deal with BOTH main Axis powers then and is just a bit less repressive today. &gt; Just compare the map of the US in 18-th century and today.

Changing the point, you pointed towards interventions in Latin America as demonstrations of Imperial intent. I pointed out simply that if the intent was really to colonize they would not have left. hell it was during this time that the eventual handover of the Canal to Panama was even decided. You could make the argument that the Philippines were a colony, but by the 30's they were pretty damn independent for being under an imperial thumb. 

&gt; Because of the Great Depression and not because they suddenly became good.

Or because a new generation of politicians were coming to power, Churchill was notable simply because he was the last of the imperialists in power. hell the only real new territory Britain ended up with in the 20's was the Palestinian mandate and even there they made no bones about wanting to get out ASAP. 

&gt; I am not sure that I can understand you correctly. 

Happy to clarify! My point was that the USSR was the only state to sign Pacts with both Japan and Germany during the war. Sure you can make the argument that it was basic self interest behind them, and that is a compelling argument. But as we saw Both Axis powers benefited greatly from the arrangements prolonging the war.

And then I dont think anyone is going to argue that the USSR is the 30's and 40's was a particularly open society, and that they have only marginally improved today still lagging behind their peer states. 

&gt; And I am 100% sure that th US still controls the channal in some way.

Sure that's why they pay tolls out the ass to use the damn thing. 

&gt; 2.Which 'pact' signed USSR and Japan during the war?

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Soviet%E2%80%93Japanese_Neutrality_Pact

One assumes the USSR was worried about losing back to back wars against Japan and doing no better than the Czar, hence waiting until the Pacific War was won by others before getting involved. 

&gt; USSR maid as much as it can to finsih WW2 as soon as possible.

That's why they were the only Allied power to not be fighting Japan and Germany together?

&gt; In some questions USSR was much more 'open society' than any one else.

Im sure all those nice officers who got purged would agree. When having an unpopular opinion gets you dead you dotn qualify as an open society. The US had its problems to be sure and still does but rarely have people been killed for it or for backing the wrong horse in a governmental dispute. &gt; Pacific War was 10 times less than war in Europe.

Patently un True. It involved an equivalent number of men and women, and equivalent number of deaths, and was waged over a larger area. 

&gt; 5.Why the US did not really fight with Germany in 1940, 1941, 1942, 1943 and joined only when Germany was almost finished?

Yes those bombings (something the USSR had no really ability to conduct) and killing or capture of 100ks of thousands and then millions of Axis troops through Africa and Italy really weren't doing much. 

And in the 30's the GOVERNMENT could kill you in the USSR because you didn't clap enough. 
Sorry but Park's response is correct. If anything Air Power played a MORE important role in holding CACTUS than the Marines or Surface forces.

When the IJN made the neutralization of the Lunga Point Field (their name for Henderson and the later Fighter 1 strip) a perquisite for their being able to retake the island they were not wrong.

The presence initially of 3 USN Fleet carriers in August to yes at points just 1 (Hornet and later Enterprise) was not the whole story. The air groups of those lost carriers served ashore. In particular Fighting 5 and part of Fighting 71 joined the CACTUS Air Force for a month in Sept and October, while a detachment of SBD's grew to several dozen, while rear bases at Efrite and Espiritu Santo were guarded by the other left overs from the air groups. 

So Air Power was in large part the reason the IJN was forced into night fighting. Yes they knew they were good at it, but around Guadalcanal it greatly hamstrung their efforts, it limited the time ships could remain in the area, and forced their supply runs (which then had to be guarded by the limited number of Zeros from Rabaul and the limited number of DD's at hand).

You also under count the number of carriers the Kido Butai could still command in late 1942. After the reorganization in July and August she still had functional air wings for all her ships. meaning 4 was the more accurate number, and she brought 2 large 1 small to the Eastern Solomon's, and 3 large 1 small to Santa Cruz. 

You also imply that USN surface forces operated unimpeded by attack during the day, this is unTrue as many times in October bith sides attacked enemy shipping in daylight, the USN/USMC/USAAF team spoiling multiple OJN attempts to land large conventional transports to the island. While sometimes the daily raid of Zeros and Type 1 Bettys or sometimes D3A1 Vals would attack shipping of Lunga, in one incident even blowing off the stern of the DM that was being used as  a transport to evacuate the enlisted men of Fighting 5 after their rotation as done. 

Hornfischer's book is a wonderful narrative of the Surface Navy at CACTUS, but it is not a perfect narrative of the total campaign. 

I would recommend "The First team at Guadalcanal" by Lundstrum as a good companion. Except there comes a point where if you haven't addressed long term processes you cant stop them at all.

To say nothing of the fact that it will be MUCH more expansive to deal with say Miami, Manhattan, and New Orleans being below sea level when it happens than to stave it off and prevent it now.

A vast majority of the people in the US live and thus economic activity takes place within 100 miles of the sea, if even the small percentage that lives within a few feat of sea level are forced to become refugees within our own country that will be a major crisis and damage the economy. 

EDIT: Forgot a word.I would assume there are at least clips up on CSPAN but their website is kinda slow and bad. The turnaround being that said employees wouldn't be getting the same wages. So you take a job which could help support a family, a good thing, and reduce it to a bit above poverty by making it just another retail gig. So Johnny was getting hosed just like everyone who hasn't been their own boss is. 

The system works! Man that's a shame. Host Gameday.  Then lose 2 straight. 

JMU to SEC East Confirmed. While she carried an inch thicker in sections, and slightly thinner in others compared to the uniform 3in deck armor on the Pennsylvania Class. With a 2 in splinter line below it, while Tirpitz had the thinner plate above the main line. The Germans also placed that deck lower in the ships, meaning some important spaces would be above it. 

In many ways the "All or Nothing" scheme on the Standard Type BB's of the USN was what the Bismarck's represented a small move towards, but the Germans having not built capital ships for 20 years lacked the institutional evolution, despite having seen the danger of plunging fire first hand at Jutland, while the US was moving in the direction even before 1914. 

For instance the Tirpitz had an armor belt which was at points thicker, and never got quite as thin as on say the Arizona, which made her basically an evolution of a design to refight the ranges seen during WW1 for the most part (where plunging fire is a danger but it is not quite vertical and where most of the fire is coming horizontally). So by using up more weight on armor to fight at closer rages she would have been excellent in 1918 or 1920, but by 1941 she was not ready for anything more than lucking out in a knife fight range in the North Sea, while the RN, USN, and IJN had all built with an eye towards the ever expanding ranges of engagements. While German ships could engage at extreme range like other navies, they were not designed for it, and in general were overbuilt in efficient designs. The Tirpitz was much bigger, without heavier guns, more armor, or higher speed, than her contemporaries, so for the same end result she was just a bigger target. 

Though at the end of the day both Arizona and Tirpitz would have been sunk by the bomb that hit either.  

The bombs used against Battleship Row were not normal aerial bombs, but modified 16.1in battleship shells. They were carried not by dive bombers but by Kate Torpedo Bombers flying at several thousand feet as level bombers, essentially creating perfectly vertical, plunging main battery fire. The Tirpitz would not have been able to deflect that bomb any more than Arizona a Tall Boy. This will mean that now Stoops and Ferentz are the longest tenured HC's, at 17 years, compared to now Beamer having ended it with 29. 

The impact the man has had on a out of the way Land Grant College in SW Virginia CANNOT be understated, we won our first ever bowl 6 weeks before hiring him, and now have gone to 22 straight including the 99 Championship game.

We are also the all time winningest program in the ACC currently, both that number and the fact that we are even in the ACC doesnt happen without him.

Lets get the 60 foot tall statue started boys. While obviously outside SW Virginia, and the obvious RichRod to VT tie for the leak there is one other possibility. 

Bruce Arians(former Hokie QB) and Frank are pretty close too, if he told him and Bruce mentions it, that is one other possible way it leaks to an Arizona guy. As of right now it has been 3990 days since UVA last beat Tech. I think we can probably beat GT, and mightve dropped UNC, but if its Frank's last home game I dont think the teams lets anything stop them.

That means it will have been over 4000 days and 12 years since the last UVA win, that would be huge to end with one more win over them before a send off bowl. It does suck, but with what he is responsible for, MUCH bigger stadium, baller brand new indoor facility, 2 conference moves, and name branding, a coach can 100% win a national title in Blacksburg.

That is his legcacy. That and with our win over BC we now have 715 all time wins, most of any school in the ACC. Easier recruiting(closer to more recruits like the 757), more money in the program, and RichRod knows the area from his time at WVU. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_college_football_coaches_with_200_wins

He has more wins than Spurrier at the very least. 

Id say being #6 in all time wins in Division I is pretty big. Just way way more wins. #6 all time amongst Division I coaches. 

Between Edwards at BYU and Stagg from Chicago. Youd best be careful, the gap is now down 722-715. One bad season and it switches!Today starts our bye week. O it very well could be then by calendar date, I guess it does mean they are tied for full seasons coached. fixed!Yep. Show up to big events, we will build your giant statue, and enjoy your family Frank, you put in 30 years of hard work it wasnt gonna last forever.  I thought 2010 and 2011 were pretty fun all in all though. Not even percentage. Just by pure number of wins each school has...

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_NCAA_football_teams_by_wins

GT and VT began the year tied at 711 all time wins. But us beating BC and you guys beating GT let us slip ahead to 715-714

Syracuse is next at 711 currently. Only 2 years till the next game though, it is finally getting close. I would LOVE to see Torrian Gray the DB coach get a serious look as a DC somewhere, he is a big reason for Foster's success since joining the staff. Yep in 99 if we hadnt beaten WVU on a last second FG it very well could have been KSU in the Sugar Bowl. \#6 all time in FBS or equivalent, between Edwards at BYU and Stagg from Chicago. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vDX5dnSeFEA&amp;feature=youtu.be

in coming feels trip, buckle up. Consider how long he has been a part of football. The year before he enrolled they finally ended the mandatory 2 years in the Corps. And his Sophomore year was the last All White team in VT history. 

The amount of change and growth he has even just been around is staggering. He was ON THE PLANE to UNC after 2001, but decided against it at the airport, and his only request to stay was a pay raise to his staff. That is the kind of man he is, he is loyal to the ends of the earth for the right people and the places that matter to him. 

Now that has hurt us in the past with certain coaches being over promoted. But as an example to his players I dont think we could ask for more. &gt;Before Beamer arrived in 1987, inheriting from Bill Dooley a NCAA infractions mess, Tech\u2019s postseason resume included one bowl victory. He has won 10 bowls.

&gt;Before Beamer, the Hokies had never played in a major bowl. Since, they\u2019ve played in eight, four Sugar and four Orange.

&gt;Before Beamer, Tech had defeated six opponents ranked in the Associated Press poll. Since, the Hokies have defeated 44.

&gt;Before Beamer, the weekly AP poll ranked Tech 13 times. Since, 261 times.

&gt;Before Beamer, the Hokies were included in the final AP poll twice. Since, 16 times.

&gt; By season\u2019s end, the list of Bowl Subdivision head coaches who worked more games than Beamer will include Amos Alonzo Stagg, Joe Paterno, Bobby Bowden and Pop Warner. That's all. 

Thats why he is a first ballot HOFer and without a doubt top all time coach championship or not. Why because it turns out forcing a DB coach to coach RB's isnt a good idea? 

I contend Shane's excellent performance at SCAR is more indicative of his abilities (ST's, DB's and recruiting including landing Clowney) than the square peg round hole he found here. I agree with that. But I think being 6th all time in wins at least qualify him as top 15ish all time.

There are plenty of guys who had a great short stretch and flamed out, like most Miami coaches. 

Frank's ability to remain steadfast is as much a positive for him as anything. I mean, we did rename the street that stadium is on Beamer Way already!If we hired Herman away, and then Shane got the Houston gig, well thatd be just all right with me. More than anything I just want an Offensively minded Coach.

Weve had 30 years of the defensively oriented guys, and it wasnt enough to win a championship, probably time to give another direction a  go. Nah we went pretty nice, built it with 100ft ceilings so we could practice punting inside when it rains. Amos Alonzo Stagg and Joe Paterno are the only B1G coaches ahead of him. Along with Bowden, Bryant and Pop Warner. The most famous one that the other response doesnt mention is the Defense of Wake Island in the opening weeks of the Pacific War. 

With about 500 Marines, 4 functional Wildcat fighters (after 8 others were destroyed in a dawn air raid on Dec 8th, and just 6 5in guns and 12 3in guns the Battalion held out for 2 weeks. 

On Dec 11 a first invasion convoy of IJN ships was actually beaten back with 2 DD's and 2 transports sunk. But then on 23 December a much larger force built around 2 of the carriers diverted from returning from Pearl Harbor, landed over 2000 troops on Wake, in a battle lasting several hours and costing the Japanese somewhere in the area of 700 casualties before the remaining American surrendered to prevent a slaughter of the numerous remaining civilians on the island (from the pre war PanAm sea plane facilities). 

The USN was about 12 hours from launching a rescue operation to either run in more supplies and fly in Marine fighter plans from the carriers Lexington and Saratoga and supporting ships. But when it was learned that the landings had already begun and Japanese carriers were int he vicinity(as opposed to extreme range land based planes from the Marshalls) the plan was called off. 

The bridge aboard the Lexington at that moment was probably the closest the USN came to having an outright organized mutiny to ignore orders from a commander, with Admiral Fletcher having to actually leave the bridge so he could say he didnt hear the talk amongst his staff. Meanwhile the CO of the Marine Fighter Squadron that was close to in range to fly to the island had to be restrained when he pulled a gun to try to force his way to a plane to takeoff. Yep, saw how fast the prices went up on StubHub and bought my UCN ones tonight. There is now amount of money I would be unhappy spending if either Bud or Torrian agreed to stay and run the same D, and work for RichRod who would agree to lay off the damn 3-3-5 he likes. I feel like Mike London has been given more leeway than just about anyone could want or ask for. Because the ACC places greater value on the collective series of fuck ups, and their individual contribution to a break down in game management than YOU do. 

&gt; this clearly does not warrant a suspension

For example, no that is not a fact, it is your opinion, and you are not in control of the ACC Officials, the league felt differently. 

They got embarrassed by mismanagement, the collective shit show that was the summation of all the errors. THAT is why they are suspended. What if then Bud Foster then went to work for Saban? I mean, if Foster got the job its not like it would have been an easier of a defense.

The two of them along with Muschamp and Chav are easily the top 4 DC's today. Meh. Never was official in any way, and he has intervened and never got a HC gig before, including the Pitt job a few years back.

His less than intense approach to recruiting is likely one big thing holding him back. Yes lets bring the psychotic space murder man home, spectacular idea. 2004 to 2011 10 or 11 wins each year with 4 ACC Titles and 3 Orange and 2 Sugar Bowl trips in there.

Since then 7-6, 8-5, 7-6, 4-5.

It was clear that while not regressing to the point of losing seasons or ending the 22 straight bowls yet, he had hit the terminal phase of his career. That Grim Reaper is one Hell of a Coach. Small programming note, after Beamer speaks Sam Rogers will come up and have some time at the mike.

\#45 and the starting Fullback is a local kid and former walk-on who is very much one of the leaders on the team. He is probably most well known to non Hokies for his long wheel route TD vs tOSU. 
I cant bare to turn to the stream, listening is too bad all by itself. Why, sure there are lots of schools looking, but that only hurts if you aren't at the front of the line.

Southern Cal is the only job that is indisputably above VT.

SCAR, Miami, and VT are all at worst equal to each other with different things to attract coaches. 

That means for the best candidate there are at most 3 major competitors. Miami has shit facilities, seriously they don't even have an indoor field and lost part of 30 practices last year to weather. 

An Admin that has talked about support but has yet to show it, and unknown finances, while VT is one of the 25ish schools operating in the Black.

And at most the Swagger and Da U are footnotes to most kids growing up today. Sure it has been a few years since VT won the ACC, but while our last BCS Bowl was 2012, they last won a conference or even played in the BCS in 2003.  

The one advantage they have is the location, its not like the argument about the ACC Coastal being winnable can apply to one and not the other both schools are in the same division. At this point outside of Texas or ND I don't think Whit leaves for another school, the bigger jobs don't come open often.

What I could see him looking for would be a P5 Commissioner's gig or a post with the NCAA.I don't hate him, I like him as a character. 

but come on, all the signs are there that he took a more active and perhaps intentional role in his team's deaths and the mission's failure than he is leading on. like every planet in Guardians?after saying the guy went crazy and it was self defense. 

But from a pure statistical point of view which is more likely, that 3 separate people went crazy, of the 1 head of security did? &gt; BC's on defense down 23-3 (well within striking distance)

Well you see there is your problem right there. Even if we add that TD, and the FG later, why do you think BC would have been able to find another 2 Scores somewhere. Even if VT only got the FG later, that is still a 9pt 26-17 game.It doesn't help, but with a historically abd offense, where should the spotlight be directed first, internally or externally?

I honestly haven't followed BC much outside our game and the FSU game, so I dotn know what the mood has been, I would assume there is some discontent about the failings on one side of the ball?

The ACC Refs had a bad week, but they don't lose team's games all by themselves, Duke let a pretty mediocre Miami team hang around and put themselves in position for disaster with then sloppy ST's play. I will say the overarching theme of "one was Life, one was Death" was one of the best run long threads in a long time for Marvel, right up there with the Cyclops/Wolverine debate. 

And really in the lead up to Secret Wars there is no clear answer in who was which, sure the finale sort of gives us an answer, but in the end we sort of have to decide who we agreed with. Gotcha, that makes a lot of sense, and is uncomfortably familiar.

&gt; I've never seen an offense so inept.

Do you remember that 07 game, Jesus if we could have scored any more than 10 fucking points. I think at worst Miami and VT are equal jobs. 

VT has the more well respected AD, FAR better facilities(seriously Miami had 30 practices affected last year because the lack an indoor facility), and more recent success. 

Miami has a bunch of unengaged alumni and 12 years since their last conference title. Their big draw is location, but the proliferation of FBS programs in Florida mean that the U has now just become another school in south Florida. I mean, if you guys are just giving him away...Why would he leave after winning the NFC East for the 2nd time in 3 years? I think he meant Southern Cal, which in that case I agree, they are the one current job that is indisputably better than VT. And I dont think the Eagles are actually going to get it turned around this year. never underestimate the Coloraderp. 

Though for real which hull do you have, the C Hull is no joke and the B isnt too bad either. Another reason to lament how badly AvX was, Cap and Cyclops are perfect for each other and would have been as mirrors of each other.

And while it gets a bad rep and doesnt really impact much outside the direct run "The Last Will of Charles Xavier" has plenty of shades of that when the chips are down what is more important, living by compromise, or dieing for your ideals. O certainly, the hardening of feelings and the Cyclops as either savior or terrorist made him the most interesting he's ever been. 

It is eternally frustrating that Cyclops has far and away the more interesting character arc while Wolverine's team gets 3 more books than the NXS crew. 

For real, would have been nice to have an internal monolouge of Scott slowly realizing that he didnt want to really bring about another war, didnt want to get more mutants killed no matter how they hated him, but knew he had to talk tough to serve as a credible threat. Instead of just throwing that at us in one issue, o ya know have him and Havoc meet at some point too before the end. And IDK it seems like in that last issue when Alex comes to visit he doesnt seem particularly "Inverted" hell he is even the one afraid Scott is gonna go do something stupid, but instead they just chill and talk. The worst part was somebody asked Frank about that game in the press conference yesterday:/The Falklands are any easy issue that the Argentines can bluster and posture over since now the world has been shown they are not a credible enough threat to be able to hold them. 

But the idea of being mad about being attacked outside an arbitrary circle that was put in place by the British to help avoid civilian losses, in a shooting war is pretty petulant.

The Argentines come off as the guy who gets mad when people call him for riding the map edge. That's what you get when you ride the map edge. We did our part ACC, what is the excuse for the rest of yall?Which was mostly just a rehash of the precedents established in the First World War. E.G. the Lusitania being sunk without warning or aid offered. 

While roundly condemned nations stopped short of fully outlawing unconditional submarine warfare in the Naval Treaties of the 20's and 30's. It is in a lot of ways unfair to call the Roman State Religion "Roman" it was by the 1st Century AD an amalgamation and basically a patchwork collection. 

From its animalistic roots in pre Greek colonization Italy, to the Ancestor worship possibly picked up from the Etruscans, to the pantheon any mythos picked up from the Greeks. 

One major aspect unique to the Romans was how they saw spirits and "Gods" in everything, every pool, every stand of trees, and every home had a god or spirit which could be appealed to for benefit, or offended for misfortune. 

That is a hold over from the ancient and primitive and animalisitic origins of Roman religion. 

Each Roman family would have a Lares or household God, and its small token or totem would have a place of honor and reverence in the home, these were the spirits or anscetors which would atch over and protect the family itself. then you had the Penates, which were much the same but for the actual house resided within, and an original link to the food storeroom itself and a link to the Goddess Vesta (who was of home, hearth, and fire, along with the prosperity of the Roman State). 

So in that sense the Roman "Religion" in a broad sense was much more superstitious in part than the Greeks, in that their traditions taught that there were spirits for almost all things and in all places that should be respected. 

EDIT: There were also Gods which simply did not have a Greek counterpart. The most notable probably being Janus. The two faced god of beginnings, endings, transition, and passageways. He was held to be very important to both individual Romans and the Roman State. His Temple in the Roman Forum was said to have been first built by Numa Pompilius himself, the second and most religious king of Rome. It was ritually opened when the Roman state was at war and sacrifices held within, and shut to mark the ending of another conflict. So let me warn you it is going to be crowded. the 21st is our last home game of the year vs UNC. So unless you are coming for that specifically, definitely be prepared for an additional 60k people in town and everywhere. 

It should actually be a great time if it is your first visit as it will in large ways be a celebration of all Frank Beamer has meant to the University over 29 years as he announced yesterday he will be retiring at the end of the year. Man that's a shame. Host Gameday.  Then lose 2 straight. 

JMU to SEC East Confirmed. While she carried an inch thicker in sections, and slightly thinner in others compared to the uniform 3in deck armor on the Pennsylvania Class. With a 2 in splinter line below it, while Tirpitz had the thinner plate above the main line. The Germans also placed that deck lower in the ships, meaning some important spaces would be above it. 

In many ways the "All or Nothing" scheme on the Standard Type BB's of the USN was what the Bismarck's represented a small move towards, but the Germans having not built capital ships for 20 years lacked the institutional evolution, despite having seen the danger of plunging fire first hand at Jutland, while the US was moving in the direction even before 1914. 

For instance the Tirpitz had an armor belt which was at points thicker, and never got quite as thin as on say the Arizona, which made her basically an evolution of a design to refight the ranges seen during WW1 for the most part (where plunging fire is a danger but it is not quite vertical and where most of the fire is coming horizontally). So by using up more weight on armor to fight at closer rages she would have been excellent in 1918 or 1920, but by 1941 she was not ready for anything more than lucking out in a knife fight range in the North Sea, while the RN, USN, and IJN had all built with an eye towards the ever expanding ranges of engagements. While German ships could engage at extreme range like other navies, they were not designed for it, and in general were overbuilt in efficient designs. The Tirpitz was much bigger, without heavier guns, more armor, or higher speed, than her contemporaries, so for the same end result she was just a bigger target. 

Though at the end of the day both Arizona and Tirpitz would have been sunk by the bomb that hit either.  

The bombs used against Battleship Row were not normal aerial bombs, but modified 16.1in battleship shells. They were carried not by dive bombers but by Kate Torpedo Bombers flying at several thousand feet as level bombers, essentially creating perfectly vertical, plunging main battery fire. The Tirpitz would not have been able to deflect that bomb any more than Arizona a Tall Boy. This will mean that now Stoops and Ferentz are the longest tenured HC's, at 17 years, compared to now Beamer having ended it with 29. 

The impact the man has had on a out of the way Land Grant College in SW Virginia CANNOT be understated, we won our first ever bowl 6 weeks before hiring him, and now have gone to 22 straight including the 99 Championship game.

We are also the all time winningest program in the ACC currently, both that number and the fact that we are even in the ACC doesnt happen without him.

Lets get the 60 foot tall statue started boys. While obviously outside SW Virginia, and the obvious RichRod to VT tie for the leak there is one other possibility. 

Bruce Arians(former Hokie QB) and Frank are pretty close too, if he told him and Bruce mentions it, that is one other possible way it leaks to an Arizona guy. As of right now it has been 3990 days since UVA last beat Tech. I think we can probably beat GT, and mightve dropped UNC, but if its Frank's last home game I dont think the teams lets anything stop them.

That means it will have been over 4000 days and 12 years since the last UVA win, that would be huge to end with one more win over them before a send off bowl. It does suck, but with what he is responsible for, MUCH bigger stadium, baller brand new indoor facility, 2 conference moves, and name branding, a coach can 100% win a national title in Blacksburg.

That is his legcacy. That and with our win over BC we now have 715 all time wins, most of any school in the ACC. Easier recruiting(closer to more recruits like the 757), more money in the program, and RichRod knows the area from his time at WVU. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_college_football_coaches_with_200_wins

He has more wins than Spurrier at the very least. 

Id say being #6 in all time wins in Division I is pretty big. Just way way more wins. #6 all time amongst Division I coaches. 

Between Edwards at BYU and Stagg from Chicago. Youd best be careful, the gap is now down 722-715. One bad season and it switches!Today starts our bye week. O it very well could be then by calendar date, I guess it does mean they are tied for full seasons coached. fixed!Yep. Show up to big events, we will build your giant statue, and enjoy your family Frank, you put in 30 years of hard work it wasnt gonna last forever.  I thought 2010 and 2011 were pretty fun all in all though. Not even percentage. Just by pure number of wins each school has...

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_NCAA_football_teams_by_wins

GT and VT began the year tied at 711 all time wins. But us beating BC and you guys beating GT let us slip ahead to 715-714

Syracuse is next at 711 currently. Only 2 years till the next game though, it is finally getting close. I would LOVE to see Torrian Gray the DB coach get a serious look as a DC somewhere, he is a big reason for Foster's success since joining the staff. Yep in 99 if we hadnt beaten WVU on a last second FG it very well could have been KSU in the Sugar Bowl. \#6 all time in FBS or equivalent, between Edwards at BYU and Stagg from Chicago. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vDX5dnSeFEA&amp;feature=youtu.be

in coming feels trip, buckle up. Consider how long he has been a part of football. The year before he enrolled they finally ended the mandatory 2 years in the Corps. And his Sophomore year was the last All White team in VT history. 

The amount of change and growth he has even just been around is staggering. He was ON THE PLANE to UNC after 2001, but decided against it at the airport, and his only request to stay was a pay raise to his staff. That is the kind of man he is, he is loyal to the ends of the earth for the right people and the places that matter to him. 

Now that has hurt us in the past with certain coaches being over promoted. But as an example to his players I dont think we could ask for more. &gt;Before Beamer arrived in 1987, inheriting from Bill Dooley a NCAA infractions mess, Tech\u2019s postseason resume included one bowl victory. He has won 10 bowls.

&gt;Before Beamer, the Hokies had never played in a major bowl. Since, they\u2019ve played in eight, four Sugar and four Orange.

&gt;Before Beamer, Tech had defeated six opponents ranked in the Associated Press poll. Since, the Hokies have defeated 44.

&gt;Before Beamer, the weekly AP poll ranked Tech 13 times. Since, 261 times.

&gt;Before Beamer, the Hokies were included in the final AP poll twice. Since, 16 times.

&gt; By season\u2019s end, the list of Bowl Subdivision head coaches who worked more games than Beamer will include Amos Alonzo Stagg, Joe Paterno, Bobby Bowden and Pop Warner. That's all. 

Thats why he is a first ballot HOFer and without a doubt top all time coach championship or not. Why because it turns out forcing a DB coach to coach RB's isnt a good idea? 

I contend Shane's excellent performance at SCAR is more indicative of his abilities (ST's, DB's and recruiting including landing Clowney) than the square peg round hole he found here. I agree with that. But I think being 6th all time in wins at least qualify him as top 15ish all time.

There are plenty of guys who had a great short stretch and flamed out, like most Miami coaches. 

Frank's ability to remain steadfast is as much a positive for him as anything. I mean, we did rename the street that stadium is on Beamer Way already!If we hired Herman away, and then Shane got the Houston gig, well thatd be just all right with me. More than anything I just want an Offensively minded Coach.

Weve had 30 years of the defensively oriented guys, and it wasnt enough to win a championship, probably time to give another direction a  go. Nah we went pretty nice, built it with 100ft ceilings so we could practice punting inside when it rains. Amos Alonzo Stagg and Joe Paterno are the only B1G coaches ahead of him. Along with Bowden, Bryant and Pop Warner. The most famous one that the other response doesnt mention is the Defense of Wake Island in the opening weeks of the Pacific War. 

With about 500 Marines, 4 functional Wildcat fighters (after 8 others were destroyed in a dawn air raid on Dec 8th, and just 6 5in guns and 12 3in guns the Battalion held out for 2 weeks. 

On Dec 11 a first invasion convoy of IJN ships was actually beaten back with 2 DD's and 2 transports sunk. But then on 23 December a much larger force built around 2 of the carriers diverted from returning from Pearl Harbor, landed over 2000 troops on Wake, in a battle lasting several hours and costing the Japanese somewhere in the area of 700 casualties before the remaining American surrendered to prevent a slaughter of the numerous remaining civilians on the island (from the pre war PanAm sea plane facilities). 

The USN was about 12 hours from launching a rescue operation to either run in more supplies and fly in Marine fighter plans from the carriers Lexington and Saratoga and supporting ships. But when it was learned that the landings had already begun and Japanese carriers were int he vicinity(as opposed to extreme range land based planes from the Marshalls) the plan was called off. 

The bridge aboard the Lexington at that moment was probably the closest the USN came to having an outright organized mutiny to ignore orders from a commander, with Admiral Fletcher having to actually leave the bridge so he could say he didnt hear the talk amongst his staff. Meanwhile the CO of the Marine Fighter Squadron that was close to in range to fly to the island had to be restrained when he pulled a gun to try to force his way to a plane to takeoff. Yep, saw how fast the prices went up on StubHub and bought my UCN ones tonight. There is now amount of money I would be unhappy spending if either Bud or Torrian agreed to stay and run the same D, and work for RichRod who would agree to lay off the damn 3-3-5 he likes. I feel like Mike London has been given more leeway than just about anyone could want or ask for. Because the ACC places greater value on the collective series of fuck ups, and their individual contribution to a break down in game management than YOU do. 

&gt; this clearly does not warrant a suspension

For example, no that is not a fact, it is your opinion, and you are not in control of the ACC Officials, the league felt differently. 

They got embarrassed by mismanagement, the collective shit show that was the summation of all the errors. THAT is why they are suspended. What if then Bud Foster then went to work for Saban? I mean, if Foster got the job its not like it would have been an easier of a defense.

The two of them along with Muschamp and Chav are easily the top 4 DC's today. Meh. Never was official in any way, and he has intervened and never got a HC gig before, including the Pitt job a few years back.

His less than intense approach to recruiting is likely one big thing holding him back. Yes lets bring the psychotic space murder man home, spectacular idea. 2004 to 2011 10 or 11 wins each year with 4 ACC Titles and 3 Orange and 2 Sugar Bowl trips in there.

Since then 7-6, 8-5, 7-6, 4-5.

It was clear that while not regressing to the point of losing seasons or ending the 22 straight bowls yet, he had hit the terminal phase of his career. That Grim Reaper is one Hell of a Coach. Small programming note, after Beamer speaks Sam Rogers will come up and have some time at the mike.

\#45 and the starting Fullback is a local kid and former walk-on who is very much one of the leaders on the team. He is probably most well known to non Hokies for his long wheel route TD vs tOSU. 
I cant bare to turn to the stream, listening is too bad all by itself. Why, sure there are lots of schools looking, but that only hurts if you aren't at the front of the line.

Southern Cal is the only job that is indisputably above VT.

SCAR, Miami, and VT are all at worst equal to each other with different things to attract coaches. 

That means for the best candidate there are at most 3 major competitors. Miami has shit facilities, seriously they don't even have an indoor field and lost part of 30 practices last year to weather. 

An Admin that has talked about support but has yet to show it, and unknown finances, while VT is one of the 25ish schools operating in the Black.

And at most the Swagger and Da U are footnotes to most kids growing up today. Sure it has been a few years since VT won the ACC, but while our last BCS Bowl was 2012, they last won a conference or even played in the BCS in 2003.  

The one advantage they have is the location, its not like the argument about the ACC Coastal being winnable can apply to one and not the other both schools are in the same division. At this point outside of Texas or ND I don't think Whit leaves for another school, the bigger jobs don't come open often.

What I could see him looking for would be a P5 Commissioner's gig or a post with the NCAA.I don't hate him, I like him as a character. 

but come on, all the signs are there that he took a more active and perhaps intentional role in his team's deaths and the mission's failure than he is leading on. like every planet in Guardians?after saying the guy went crazy and it was self defense. 

But from a pure statistical point of view which is more likely, that 3 separate people went crazy, of the 1 head of security did? &gt; BC's on defense down 23-3 (well within striking distance)

Well you see there is your problem right there. Even if we add that TD, and the FG later, why do you think BC would have been able to find another 2 Scores somewhere. Even if VT only got the FG later, that is still a 9pt 26-17 game.It doesn't help, but with a historically abd offense, where should the spotlight be directed first, internally or externally?

I honestly haven't followed BC much outside our game and the FSU game, so I dotn know what the mood has been, I would assume there is some discontent about the failings on one side of the ball?

The ACC Refs had a bad week, but they don't lose team's games all by themselves, Duke let a pretty mediocre Miami team hang around and put themselves in position for disaster with then sloppy ST's play. I will say the overarching theme of "one was Life, one was Death" was one of the best run long threads in a long time for Marvel, right up there with the Cyclops/Wolverine debate. 

And really in the lead up to Secret Wars there is no clear answer in who was which, sure the finale sort of gives us an answer, but in the end we sort of have to decide who we agreed with. Gotcha, that makes a lot of sense, and is uncomfortably familiar.

&gt; I've never seen an offense so inept.

Do you remember that 07 game, Jesus if we could have scored any more than 10 fucking points. I think at worst Miami and VT are equal jobs. 

VT has the more well respected AD, FAR better facilities(seriously Miami had 30 practices affected last year because the lack an indoor facility), and more recent success. 

Miami has a bunch of unengaged alumni and 12 years since their last conference title. Their big draw is location, but the proliferation of FBS programs in Florida mean that the U has now just become another school in south Florida. I mean, if you guys are just giving him away...Why would he leave after winning the NFC East for the 2nd time in 3 years? I think he meant Southern Cal, which in that case I agree, they are the one current job that is indisputably better than VT. And I dont think the Eagles are actually going to get it turned around this year. never underestimate the Coloraderp. 

Though for real which hull do you have, the C Hull is no joke and the B isnt too bad either. Another reason to lament how badly AvX was, Cap and Cyclops are perfect for each other and would have been as mirrors of each other.

And while it gets a bad rep and doesnt really impact much outside the direct run "The Last Will of Charles Xavier" has plenty of shades of that when the chips are down what is more important, living by compromise, or dieing for your ideals. O certainly, the hardening of feelings and the Cyclops as either savior or terrorist made him the most interesting he's ever been. 

It is eternally frustrating that Cyclops has far and away the more interesting character arc while Wolverine's team gets 3 more books than the NXS crew. 

For real, would have been nice to have an internal monolouge of Scott slowly realizing that he didnt want to really bring about another war, didnt want to get more mutants killed no matter how they hated him, but knew he had to talk tough to serve as a credible threat. Instead of just throwing that at us in one issue, o ya know have him and Havoc meet at some point too before the end. And IDK it seems like in that last issue when Alex comes to visit he doesnt seem particularly "Inverted" hell he is even the one afraid Scott is gonna go do something stupid, but instead they just chill and talk. The worst part was somebody asked Frank about that game in the press conference yesterday:/The Falklands are any easy issue that the Argentines can bluster and posture over since now the world has been shown they are not a credible enough threat to be able to hold them. 

But the idea of being mad about being attacked outside an arbitrary circle that was put in place by the British to help avoid civilian losses, in a shooting war is pretty petulant.

The Argentines come off as the guy who gets mad when people call him for riding the map edge. That's what you get when you ride the map edge. We did our part ACC, what is the excuse for the rest of yall?Which was mostly just a rehash of the precedents established in the First World War. E.G. the Lusitania being sunk without warning or aid offered. 

While roundly condemned nations stopped short of fully outlawing unconditional submarine warfare in the Naval Treaties of the 20's and 30's. It is in a lot of ways unfair to call the Roman State Religion "Roman" it was by the 1st Century AD an amalgamation and basically a patchwork collection. 

From its animalistic roots in pre Greek colonization Italy, to the Ancestor worship possibly picked up from the Etruscans, to the pantheon any mythos picked up from the Greeks. 

One major aspect unique to the Romans was how they saw spirits and "Gods" in everything, every pool, every stand of trees, and every home had a god or spirit which could be appealed to for benefit, or offended for misfortune. 

That is a hold over from the ancient and primitive and animalisitic origins of Roman religion. 

Each Roman family would have a Lares or household God, and its small token or totem would have a place of honor and reverence in the home, these were the spirits or anscetors which would atch over and protect the family itself. then you had the Penates, which were much the same but for the actual house resided within, and an original link to the food storeroom itself and a link to the Goddess Vesta (who was of home, hearth, and fire, along with the prosperity of the Roman State). 

So in that sense the Roman "Religion" in a broad sense was much more superstitious in part than the Greeks, in that their traditions taught that there were spirits for almost all things and in all places that should be respected. 

EDIT: There were also Gods which simply did not have a Greek counterpart. The most notable probably being Janus. The two faced god of beginnings, endings, transition, and passageways. He was held to be very important to both individual Romans and the Roman State. His Temple in the Roman Forum was said to have been first built by Numa Pompilius himself, the second and most religious king of Rome. It was ritually opened when the Roman state was at war and sacrifices held within, and shut to mark the ending of another conflict. So let me warn you it is going to be crowded. the 21st is our last home game of the year vs UNC. So unless you are coming for that specifically, definitely be prepared for an additional 60k people in town and everywhere. 

It should actually be a great time if it is your first visit as it will in large ways be a celebration of all Frank Beamer has meant to the University over 29 years as he announced yesterday he will be retiring at the end of the year. No, we can go deeperhttp://www.nytimes.com/2015/11/04/world/asia/china-burns-much-more-coal-than-reported-complicating-climate-talks.html?action=click&amp;contentCollection=Asia%20Pacific&amp;module=MostPopularFB&amp;version=Full&amp;region=Marginalia&amp;src=me&amp;pgtype=article

Yep thats why they just revised UPWARDS by 17% their annual national coal usage...Thanks, after the 4th ACC title it was getting sort of hard to keep carrying everyone. A LOT of bad blood from the older donors which matter, from his time at WVU. That is the general consensus amongst fans in favor of the potential hire.I would take exception with you question being the relative contributions of the various nations in "WW2" in your title and then limiting it to the fight against Germany in the actual question. 

Even your saying "European/Asian" is very limited. Is China not in Asia? Is India, Korea? 

It is a very limited and narrow view to consider the great fight against racial extremism to have occurred only against the Germans, ignoring the fact that it also counts out Italy and the minor Axis states. 

The scale of the Pacific cannot be under stated, the distance of about 1400 miles from London to Moscow is barely more than half that from California to Hawaii, with another 3800 miles to Japan. The war against Japan spanned over 50% of the Earth's surface from India to California, from Alaska to Australia. Involving on the Asian mainland numbers of troops to rival the fighting in Eastern Europe, and at sea over 50% of the extant shipping in existence. Gotta say I take exception to the instant dumbing down of Hunter as a character. 

In S2 he is shown a probably burnt-out, and cynical, but smart, aware of Fitz's problems for instance, and in general of the ability to make intelligent choices for himself while not being overly rash. 

The man was a Lieutenant in the SAS for fuck's sake, we know he could at least graduate from college and pass some serious training classes and handle leadership under fire.

But know he is just the moron who only knows how to punch his way to a solution. 

I will say he was noticeably the only one who kept his head when Coulson popped up, being aware of the need to keep cover, not be discovered, and not jump to conclusions. The man was a commissioned officer and served in the SAS, at least that is how they establish his back story, but know all he can do is punch his problems away, dude must have had some pretty nasty concussions along the way. 

He was though the one who best kept his head when they saw Coulson though, being the most concerned with not being discovered, recovering the drone, and not jumping to conclusions. Clemson and Pitt are two that we know he went after, he has stated he wants to start with a P5 school first so that limits his options to a degree. Seriously, between all the shit young Jean has been pulling with her team im not so sure that Xorn Jean wasn't in the right in trying to force her back.

Maybe a few brushes with the Phoenix might be needed for Jean to really see how much damage she can cause. Xorn-Jean Was Right?Because it is eternally easier to just write Scott as a dick and Beast as the "ethical" scientist than to portray Scott as the man who actually internalized what Xavier was teaching and took to heart that it isn't easy to lead Mutant kind. So long as you define it as a "Scholarship" you cannot compel the student to remain, the scholarship itself is the incentive to remain and that is pretty much it. 

I could get a giant scholarship for being great at math, or any other subject but it couldn't and shouldn't compel me to be forced to stay, I could leave any time for any reason. 

So, so long as it is defined as a scholarship, with the school easing the burden of attendance in return for the student's enrollment than they cant "force" them not to leave if they are ok with walking away from the scholarship. Cant imagine it isn't Texas or California just based on number of programs. Well consider the "most total" war man has yet seen. 

Germany still had a clear chain of succession from Hitler to Dornitz so he signed the official instrument of surrender. Japan still had a functioning government to sign their instrument of surrender, and Italy's govt switched sides to fight for the Allies. 

So it is very rare that there wont be ANY part of one side's govt to deal with. literally cant answer that on any sort of national level. And of course individual teaches are allowed in large part to construct their grading and examination schedule for individual classes however they see fit within reason. 

It is mostly a function of your location. Local communities and the individual states have major control over curriculum. 

But say maybe 1 statewide competency test for 1 or 2 days a year. Then in high school (9-12th grades) you might take your SAT's 1 or 2 times and that involves coming in on a Saturday or Sunday for 6 hours or so. 

And of course in College you might have a class with just 2 sources of your grade a mid term exam and a final. And it isn't like there are no US Govt approved and supported religious structures. 

There is indeed a "National Cathedral" in Washington DC which was approved and named as such by Congress and has been sued for such events as the state funeral for Presidents Ford and Reagan. 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Washington_National_Cathedral#HistoryWhy would you qualify them as any sort of total war? 

And how do you define "legit" the legitimacy of a national govt is a fluid thing at best, if an organization is able to control the exercise of violence in their territory, and is recognized by outside actors, what doesn't make it legitimate? 

Another reason why as opposed to a True spinoff I would love the two of them to be in a prequel.

Imagine Hunter the fresh faced SAS Lieutenant progressively becoming the burnt-out, angry, cynical merc we meet. 

What caused him to lose his trust in large organizations, what caused him to stop trusting anyone but himself? Assume it probably involved him losing men under his command? 

And where in the field did he meet the mysterious American spy lady? They literally just showed off the secret US Government run internment camp. Id say we are already pretty morally gray and dirty. Nope in Battle of the Atom the future version of the Jean who came direct from the past shows up. 

But as her powers have expanded she basically has to wear Xorn's gear to keep them from burning her mind out. She also turns out to be pretty unhinged anyway and willing to go to pretty drastic ends to force the O5 back to the past but ends up being killed in the process. Yea that would be terrible, civil society would tear itself apart!but then you would only have to deal with one of either Richt or Bud, not both. 

Though Richt tried to hire Bud before, my God what if Bud stayd for Richt?

It would be an entire staff built around going 6-2 in conference play and beating GT every year. We would go 6-2 in ACC play every year and never lose to the bumblebees again, I could live with that. Just put Hypnotoad there and call it a day. &gt; It's not like revolutionized the game or did anything super noteworthy.

You are aware that he has his own exhibit in the CFB Hall of Fame for doing exactly that right?

Of course you weren't though, youre a Seminole. I mean O'Leary pretty much actually got fire, Spurrier just quit and tapped out, Frank had a team actually perform well enough to ride them to the end of the year. Gameday is just a show though, it can mean whatever they want it to mean. 

Or the Executive stop assigning missions beyond capabilities.  These are giant complex ships and I wouldn't want to be the guy rushing a midlife refueling of a nuclear reactor. And yet again we find basic knowledge of the sport lacking in a Seminole! Stop the presses!

Its in Atlanta to actually answer you. And is actually really sweet, Chick-Fil-A is a big sponsor and ties it in to the Kickoff Game and Peach Bowl since they are all right there in Atlanta. Pretty much loved it, except when it became obvious that the creative team didnt even try to look at a map of the DC area. 

Arlington is literally directly across the Potomac from downtown DC, not miles west.

And while 66 and the Lee highway ARE 2 of the main corridors into the are/around the Beltway, it was so frustrating to know they could have just picked any other town. Not the one im in and that I know im not 15 miles west of DC.

End petty minor nitpicking. Then what is your excuse for not knowing basic information about the sport?

Any semi engaged NFL or MLB fan could tell you where their HoF's are. So why should CFB get a pass? Do B- coaches beat Saban, Meyer, Fisher, Bowden, and Mack Brown at points in their careers?I mean at least the did explain why the dad has the regular helmet. Since Sam has his Black one they somehow got his old stock one. 2 Nova's and neither is who we want.

Give me Dick Rider or give me death!So what then is your definition or "special" National title or bust? Are Conference titles not "special" are BCS trips or top 10 finishes not special? If Bachalo could illustrate the entire Marvel universe, well thatd be just alright by me. Or maybe split the duties with Skottie. Running count of the New X-Men that we have seen so far and know are still alive.

Glob 

Rockslide

Anole

Dust

Ruth

Blindfold

Indra

Loa

So still no sign of:

Hellion (Dear sweet Jesus he needs to show back up)

Surge

Elixir

And we know X-23 is now Wolverine and gets her own ongoing. You would have thought him having Emma Frost confront him with all his insecurities about leadership. 

Or having to assert himself over Xavier in Messiah Complex

Or having to choose to fight the Unreasonable Avengers

Or having to prove he was right (the status quo being unsustainable) when Logan split

would have been enough evolution for him. Yes you can right him both rough at times and principled, but we dont need every series to be a lead up to him either getting pissed off again, or being forced to compromise. About half are in dry dock/training up stateside at any one time. The ships are coming due for their midlife refueling and complex overhauls which can be a 2 year process. They literally cut a hole in the side to get to the reactor.

Then you factor in that it isnt good for equipment and mor important the morale and welfare of crews to be deploying all the time. 

Ideally you would have 3 carriers for every 1 on deployment. 1 on station, 1 in the yards and being repaired, and 1 training and working up to go on deployment. fuck they couldve had her tow a giant barge with solar panels on. I think all our previous HC's are dead...I mean Ward doesnt need to be "redeemed" for this to happen. 

Coulson is currently in bed with a group running an InHuman Internment Camp. 

With the Civil War build up SHIELD finds itself in increasingly murky moral waters. How about we just get the original Dirty Dozen, Donald Duck down at the crossroads with a machine gun and all and all: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8Oc4ninxeUk

Seriously if youve never seen the movie its 100% worth it just for Lee Marvin and Charles Bronson going on a suicide mission dressed up as Nazi's: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ff1V6ywnWcYYes. He is being bashed and his character altered for plot efficiency.

May had to get brought back on board, Ward's threats made credible, and the Lash plot advanced.

Unfortunately they decided to do it with the same chain of events. 

Hunter was established as angry, cynical, and not truly interested in trusting big organizations, but he has never been portrayed as treating deadly force lightly or callous to others, nor was he in the past two episodes. 

Coulson sent him on what was rapidly turning into a suicide mission, and then shy's away from the choice HIS man made when given the option of eliminating Ward. 

Hunter served as an officer in the SAS, he is anything but selfish/stupid when it comes to making the world a place with one less violent extremist in it. At the end of the day if Coulson is TRULY the head of a spy agency then he needs to accept that the head of terrorist cell dead is more important than a psychiatrist he likes. 

That was a good deal every day of the week. I didnt make the connection to the Eagles until now. 

I initially thought it was to bash the Owls, because ya know they are birds too. except he still knows anyway because Eva brought him to the present to fix his own fuck up and then took him back. Jesus I had been dong a Dr House sort of vibe for him but looks like Ill be doing Dr. O going forward!Also shameless plug for Vaughn but if you havent checked out Saga you are wrong and ought to correct yourself. Ruth is the old lady looking one that puts the blanket on the mom Magik rescues. 

Blinfold is sitting on the ground to the right in the background behind Anole with Indra standing next to her. Loa is on the same spread behind Magik's hip, you can always spot her because of the weird face tattoos she has going on. 

Dust was carrying a box or something when Storm and Bobby walk out of her office. https://www.google.com/maps/dir/Washington,+DC/Arlington+County,+VA/@38.8863624,-77.0964528,13z/data=!3m1!4b1!4m14!4m13!1m5!1m1!1s0x89b7c6de5af6e45b:0xc2524522d4885d2a!2m2!1d-77.0368707!2d38.9071923!1m5!1m1!1s0x89b7b69d7ba7a70f:0xe08603603385be34!2m2!1d-77.0909809!2d38.8816208!3e0

(the large green section is Arlington National Cemetery which counts too)

Realistically the only thing he exaggerated was the distance and direction, so in large part it can be forgiven, along with how suburban Arlington actually is. The rest of it, like the school and all were pretty sot on. 1 is just coming out of midlife refueling, 1 is going into midlife refueling, the process takes almost 3 years. 

The other 4 in stages of either being finished construction or workup/work down in the yards.And since the kid is from Philly I 100% assumed he would just want to poke the bear a little as it were. BRING IT BYE WEEK, YOU AINT PLAYED NOBODYAt this point it would likely take force of arms or a MASSIVE economic sanction program for them to change it. 

And other countries just don't care enough about it. the numbers aren't very large and every nation just about allows foreign nationals to perform military service in return for citizenship, or allow immigrants to serve. 

Additionally there isn't anything the UN can do, France is a permanent member of the UNSC. Im sure the minute they release the RN capital ship line itll be there, probably the Admiral Class with Hood as premium. 

Hell half the IJN line is made of BC's real or paper. An unlimited power source that works part of the time and takes you some of the places you want to go?

WHY HASNT ANYONE TRIED THIS YET! A mother fucking shit show of an Orange Bowl I don't like to think about.So for naval aviation it was particularly harsh. 

Mitsuo Fuchida, who commanded the strike on pearl Harbor relates some of his experiences while in flight training.

For instance as a new cadet when he first entered barracks an older senior cadet punched him in the gut, then kicked him for doubling over in pain because he "failed to remain at the position of attention before a senior cadet" 

They also had a drill where all the men in the class would have to wrestle each other, and only the winner of a match would be allowed to stop. The loser had to keep going no matter what condition he was in until he won, being revived with water and a slap as needed. if he failed to best anyone in the class he was kicked out in shame. BYE WEEK THINKS HOT DOGS ARE A SANDWHICH

BYE WEEK PUTS KETCHUP ON HIS PIZZA

BYE WEEK IS A TOUGHER MATCHUP THAN UVAI DO NOT CARE FOR AUBURNThis is her in the 80's by then she had the vast majority of her light AA batteries removed and 4 of her dual 5in turrets removed. 

This was her in WW2: http://en.valka.cz/files/bb_62_uss_new_jersey___1943.09.07_a_richelieu_.jpgIndeed. It was very much a self imposed to a degree level of violence. 

Scenes similar to the blanket party in Full Metal Jacket (where the fellow students hold down a beat an underperformer at night) were apparently not all together uncommon. 

It was at the end of the day just a very violent form of hazing, and when you have gone through it your focus is on visiting it upon the next class, not if it should continue. 

Instructors would use the norm of corporal punishment to a degree, a slap here for a wrong answer, another for a poorly prepared uniform, and of course in running the draconian drills themselves, but the True cruelty came from other cadets. 

Fuchida and his friend Genda (who was the chief planner of the attack) graduated from training in the mid and late 20's, during which time the IJN had committed itself to building the most physically tough and resilient corps of pilots they could. And thanks to brutal (not just physical but high standards and high drop rates) they did. 

But when war came there was a good deal of resistance to dropping this unforgiving, protracted, and inefficient model as the thought was that by letting in weaker men they would be courting defeat. 

That then contributed to the difficulty in keeping enough formations active following the staggering losses of 1942 at the Coral Sea, Midway and the Solomons. Its not like the ACC was much of anything besides FSU until the 04 realignment. 

And then thanks to the divisional format when VT was actually good we met just 4 times between 2004 and 2014. Its not like we had many opportunities, from 2004 to 2014 VT and FSU met just 4 going 2-2 against each other. The kidnapping was probably the worst way to go about it.

What now he is supposed to think he just got randomly jumped in DC? And then they were kind enough to place him back in the driver's seat and not take anything? 

Because everyone pretty much agreed that it really really sucked, and there were more efficient easier to sue ways of killing large numbers of people and as area denial weapons.

In WW2 the Western Allies and Germany both DID have large stocks in storage, but communicated to each other that as long as the other side didn't use them they wouldn't either. 

However as the Allies progressed up Italy the Germans made statements about potentially using gas. That in turn led the Allies to ship mustrard gas bombs to Italy for potential use. 

They were on the cargo ship SS John Harvey in December of 1943 when the Germans bombed the port of Bari sinking 28 ships including the Harvey causing explosions and a release of at least some of the gas. 

Because of the secret nature of her cargo it was several days before doctors realized what was causing patients to die and for them to save the rest. The entire incident was kept hushed up for several months until Allied high command even admitted that Mustard gas was in the theater and years before the full story came out. Yes it tips SHIELD's hand that they were following him, and that his phone was compromised. No worse than a man would. 

The idea isn't to charge headlong at emplaced troops. It is that those men on horseback can move much faster than the man on foot. They can seize that key ridge and get some horse drawn artillery and machine guns up there, or dig in at the key crossroads for follow on formations or to cut off the enemy's retreat. 

Renew is right up there with Civil War (which also features an older mature Peter as Cap's #2) and 1872 as the top tie in. He's not your friend, guy!For all intents and purposes both sports simply developed at the same time more or less. 

While Association Football was becoming standardized in the 1860's and 1870's. Gridiron football was taking off starting in the 1870's. Then you consider the class of people playing sports in the US, particularly that all major sports found their earliest homes at the Collegiate Level. The Ivy League took a leadership role in developing Gridiron Football, particularly Yale, Harvard, and Princeton. Everyone wanted to be like the elite WASP men of the day to show off how refined and great they were, so naturally everyone was game to play the same sport as they were. 

Then you also factor in that US-UK relations remained less than stellar for much of the 1860's and 70's and it is understandable that the sport did not import quickly. The largest thing I see missing is no indoor facility. 

In a place with as high a chance or things like major storms as South Florida, I have to imagine not having an indoor field is a major cause of lost practice time. Probably similar to how Al Capone and the rest of the Chicago underworld were brought to heel during Prohibition. 

You don't trust the city or locals to clean it up, you use the power and heavy hand of the federal government. The minute any of those criminal enterprises transported anything across a state line, or impacted a business that is present in multiple states they began committing Federal crimes. 

So you can send in somebody like Eliot Ness and his "Untouchables" to run investigations you know wont be compromised, and at the end of the day the FBI, DEA, ATF, and ICE have far more resources, patience, and capability than a criminal enterprise no matter how well connected. And since the 2004 expansion will be in 2nd place while FSU and VT are tied at 4 each. 

Followed by WF and GT with 1 or 1* each. For the record that was also one of the most batshit crazy games Ive ever seen. 

Featured 5 different blocked kicks between both teams, and went to 3OT before VT got the win. After we had the block 6 on Marshall's first punt I really thought we were setting up for a massacre, but the weather and Cato had other ideas. 

But when people say Logan Thomas was no good or a hack, I point to that game, he 100% won us that game virtually by himself. One I COULD see happening is ND included on the Labor Day game. 

The ACC has the contract with ESPN for the LD Game. Hence why you saw VT play tOSU on it this year. VT has also played Boise on LD in 2010 so they are not shy about doing OOC Labor Day games. 

Seems like that would be more likely than a Thursday Night if both schools agree to ti.  Schools like Georgia tech and Virginia tech (Most appearances and most wins on ESPN Thurs Night respectively) are good examples of how a school can successfully raise its profile by agreeing to play a lot on ThursdayAnd that is part of the ACC's problem, while some schools don't like doing Thursday Nights (Clemson/FSU/GT) others enjoy and push for them (VT/NCST) so it basically comes down to the ACC having to balance the quota they have in the contract with ESPN and try to give each school equal exposure. You are dumb. Thursday Night games are absolutely fucking fantastic. 

An entire day you can not care about class, drink all day during the week, watch night football, have the stadium extra packed with students for a better atmosphere, and still have your Saturday free. Nope VT trying to get the Metro to do football was what led to Lville and their cronies voting us out of the conference. The idea was basically that it was more important to keep the men in order and easily within range of the officer in local command than for them to get across no man's land as fast as possible. And that the artillery barrage would buy them enough time to do so by destroying or throwing the German's into sufficient confusion. 

Thus the order would be to walk in loose order at a stately pace across the space as opposed to just rushing it. That way the Officers and Sergeants could issue orders and keep control of their men. Speak for yourself!  I really do like when we get to play you guys 2011 was my Soph year and 2013 my senior. 

I also know Beamer really appreciated it, there is a great shot of him at the crash memorial in . He was great friends with Frank Loria the DB coach who was killed, he had been a year ahead of Beamer and they were both starting DB's together with Loria being Tech's first ever Consensus All American.

Beamer actually said that back when he was just starting out coaching down at The Citadel his dream was to get on Loria's staff as DC when he cam back to Blacksburg because he knew Loria wanted the job and Beamer just wanted to be part of it. http://www.hokiesports.com/football/recaps/20110923aaa.html

This is a really cool article I just dug up that was quite the tearjerker. Apparently Loria's wife was pregnant at the time, and it talks about her going back for the first time since the crash with her now grown son. 

Apparently, and I didn't know, but the HC Tolley was actually a Hokie too.

This really is an incredible quote from Frank, he repeats it and expands it in the book he wrote later on "let me be Frank" but for the guy that is #6 in all time wins to say he would probably have been working for your dad is some incredible praise. 

&gt; "\u201cI\u2019ve often said this and I said it in my book [Turn Up The Wick], but I\u2019d probably be coaching for him,\u201d Beamer said. \u201cIt\u2019s just a shame that such a smart, talented guy had his life end so early. He had a bright future in coaching. I could see him becoming a great head coach.\u201d"O ok yea that makes sense I just never made the connection! Dates all the way back to the wars in the 60's and 70's. 

The Arab states turned towards the Soviets as allies and Sugar Daddies so we turned to Israel, and the Great power politics of the Cold War in part played out in the Levant. That is the source of the close relationship between Syria and Russia today for instance. 

Israel was an attractive ally, and mostly remains so as a stable democratic state in a region that is not exactly full of them, and was willing to work with us and turn away from the USSR. 

Then in 1978 with the Camp David Accords in order to help secure the peace between Israel and Egypt the US basically agreed to pay off both states with military aid (training, equipment, and cash), which continued for Egypt all the way to the present as well. Im all for one of the teams to win out that is for sure.

Also: The Techmo Bowl is next Thursday, prepare accordingly. VT's is the longest NCAA recognized, but FSU's game DID happen, so take your pick. Tough Cookies. We got our Governor to straight up threaten UVA's funding if VT to the ACC didn't happen. After WW2 with the flux of young men going to school on the GI Bill collegiate Athletics experienced an arms race of epic proportions.

Without scholarship limits schools could spend huge amounts of money and just stash tons of players to keep rivals from getting them. The Ivies had the money if they really wanted, but the schools themselves had long before seen the way the winds were blowing and had no interest in trying to keep up with the big state schools.  

The Ivy league had even in the 1800's agreed to not offer sport scholarships, so they were ALWAYS at disadvantage, and they only fell behind more in the 50's and thus took themselves out of the game when the I-A/AA split was made official. 

You also REALLY should not underestimate how unemphasized sports could be at times. For instance the President of Harvard once tried to BAN the Curve Ball pitch because it was based on deceiving the batter and thus was not up to the high standings of honesty and integrity of a Harvard Man.  There was a massive rise in the number of men going to school in the 40's and 50's thanks in large part to the GI Bill, that kicked off a spending spree and arms race that was the death knell for the Ivy league as competitive as they had even decades before made decisions to de-emphasize sports at times.  It really is CRAZY how fast the rise and fall of Chicago was. 

Their first president was the first major admin to see football as a way to promote the school, and Amos Alonzo Stagg was the first employee he hired!

Then the next guy comes in and within a decade they are done. It wasnt even the worst game of 2014!Is that from the 05 ACCCG?https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Charles_William_Eliot#Opposition_to_football_and_other_sports

Yea President Eliot was quite the interesting character, and was essentially overruled by powerful alumni who loved sports, amongst them Teddy Roosevelt whilst he was sitting President. Dates all the way back to the wars in the 60's and 70's.

The Arab states turned towards the Soviets as allies and Sugar Daddies so we turned to Israel, and the Great power politics of the Cold War in part played out in the Levant. That is the source of the close relationship between Syria and Russia today for instance.

Israel was an attractive ally, and mostly remains so as a stable democratic state in a region that is not exactly full of them, and was willing to work with us and turn away from the USSR.

Then in 1978 with the Camp David Accords in order to help secure the peace between Israel and Egypt the US basically agreed to pay off both states with military aid (training, equipment, and cash), which continued for Egypt all the way to the present as well.
Pat O'Dea, literally any punt he ever made for Wisconsin. 

The Original Aussie Kicker 1898-89, in one game had a 62 yard FG and a 116yd!!!!!! punt. 

He was thus the very first western player ever named to Walter Camp's All American team. Its how the Power 5 got the Cost of Attendance thing through. 

They basically made the new rule that a scholarship for the power 5 includes that extra value. All Power 5 schools have to offer the scholarship, so if they want to remain in the Power 5 they have to offer the additional value too. Otherwise they can join the G5 or FCS where the scholarship is defined differently. Bullshit, weve had a 116 yard punt occur, this was amateur hour. Against NW O'Dea is credited with kicking it from within his own endzone all the way to the other endzone. Just to be clear we actually are dealing with TWO skips. 

Uncanny 600 takes place 8 months before Secret Wars, and Extraordinary takes place another 6 months after SW. Before the wars ships often were quite colorful. In fact one of the major remaining bits of academic debate about Pearl Harbor is what color were the Battleships? 

Admiral Kimmel had ordered the turret tops painted in accordance with this scheme to ease spotting and identification issues: http://www.researcheratlarge.com/Ships/S19-7/PearlHarborBatDivMarkings.html

But there is no proof really about which ships were done with the job, and if the plan was followed as laid out or changed for some reason. 

Meanwhile the actual shade used for the majority of the ships themselves has been lost too. With limited photos being the best we can do to piece together what they looked like. 

http://mikeashey.com/ship%20article%20pdf%20files/article-battleship-colors-at-pearl-harbor.pdfI like this chart, it is a nice chart. Yep, except we didnt have to pull an NCAA violation to do it!Do you mean whilst sitting?

If not President Eisenhower as Supreme Allied Commander, Europe during the 2nd World War is a likely candidate, though it was obviously before he was elected. Technically from within an endzone to a touch back would be longer. 

But this was also in the days or deeper endzones (15 or 20yds). I think he might mean 2011. The computers REALLY liked our wins over GT and UVA and for some reason forgave the first Clemson loss. Some of the computers had us above OKST at #3 should LSU or Bama fall out and we win the ACC. Well that was a 3rd alternative, but the most fantasy and least plausible one. 

It would basically have required the USN and RN/RAN to carry the Soviets there on the ships meant for the invasion anyway. Russian shipping and power projection simply didnt exist in the Pacific in 1945. So much so that in the minor landings they did try in the northern islands their plan was to run old destroyers full of troops onto the beach and hope enough survived to get a pier or beach intact. 

It also, while shocking, will never be possible to say which was the catalyst for final surrender, the invasion of Manchuria or the 2nd bomb. 

The Japanese War Council got the new of the Soviet attack WHILE MEETING to learn about Nagasaki. So the 2 are permanently linked since they found out about them at the same time. 2004 was great. #11 VT comes to the Orange Bowl and beats #9 Miami to win it in our first year together after switching in a defacto ACCCG. They havent even come close since. Meh, I dont think our COACHES have been pulling shit, mostly because half of them dont like to recruit anyway like you mention. 

But I dont doubt for a minute we have some bagmen and $100 handshakes all the live long day, just not as many and it is part of what hinders us. Our alumni base has only expanded in recent decades, we dont have as much old money to be throwing around.Im here to watch a Tech beat, or at least play WVU, just as the God of Man and Nature intended.

In other news only 1 year and 10 months until the next Black Diamond Game.  Quick somebody fly Brewer out to Morgantown, he would be an upgrade over Mahomes at least and he does technically still play for "Tech" I wonder if the Midway and other T10's gets the 50 star one still?Can we talk about how sad that Good Hands net looked? That was depressing. Weve hit 2 so far, so lets see where the game takes us. You have the good answers below but to expand. 

Public universities are not present so that every student can get the soda brand that everyone wants, they really arent even that interested in the comfort or happiness of every student beyond what the law requires. 

They are interested in being able to remain open and continue research and education. So if that is made easier by getting one large part of food service on the cheap by agreeing to be exclusive that is less money, less time, and less hassle that can now be used for other purposes. Because the vast majority of Americans DONT experience that. The average student will graduate with between 10k and 30k in student debt, will land a job which has health insurance, and get on with their lives and build up a savings. Why? Because im living it?

Graduated a top public school in Virginia Tech and landed a nice job paying in the low 40s outside DC where I can pay my loans, my rent, and have food with soem left over, while having an ok insurance plan.

FWIW I was class of 2014 and worked two other jobs for 6 months before landing my current one. Cant be afraid of failure, I applied and got a month of unemployment at one point, and used it to let me keep searching for my current job. 
Because by that point her allies in Austria-Hungary and the Ottomans were falling apart, Austria was bleeding the last of her strength away in the Balkans and Italy, the Ottomans were in a losing struggle in the Levant against the British and the Arab Revolt.

And most important the US was already having its presence felt by the Spring of 1918. By the summer almost 10k US troops were arriving PER DAY in France. That was a flow that nothing Germany could do would be overcome, and it was only getting worse with time. By the fall the AEF already numbered more than 600k men. Why would you want to live in downtown especially DC with crime as it is, or by yourself?

And dont pretend like every suburb everywhere is cheap either. 

Google Loudoun county Virginia its where I am now. https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/5/55/F4F-3_new_pitot_tube_of_later_model.jpg

That is pointy?

The real answer for planes is for turbo prop and older planes it is a function of if the have a rotary, inline, or V engine. It was about the politics of "State's Rights" 

Which means could the states do things and disregard the Federal Govt. What State Right were they concerned about above all others? The ability to protect slavery, it being vital to their economic model at the time. In addition, unlike the NFL there isnt a headset built into the QB's helmet on the field so that phone or a headset on the sidelines are the only way to talk to the coaches up in the box. Left out Spiderman and the X-Men, the time filler between Wolverine's death and Secret Wars. 

But it was fun to see Spidey teach the "Troubled" Class. And any book that can write Hellion properly is worth a read!It wasnt bad per se, and certainly was in line with the movie's portrayal which isnt in and of itself bad.

But compared to the much more epic scale of the DnA run before it, it felt like they took Star Lord for instance from the older grizzled Bobba Fett type space storm trooper looking to finally do something positive with his life after spending years in aimless violence, to now he was basically well, Chris Pratt in space. You know how your car sometimes is harder to handle when you are driving 75-80mph? And how you get uncomfortable with lots of cars around you at that speed?

Double and then some that speed. And do that for about 4 hours. 

The attention to detail required to drive a car with only marginally more aerodynamic efficiency as a street model at 180mph at a 20 degree bank, while 42 other guys do the same thing inches apart is astounding, and where plenty of the interest is from. 

Then you have the variety in the tracks, some are small and require excellent feel on braking and willingness to force your car into corners, some are large and wide and require the ability to be consistent in the line you drive the car lap after lap. 

Along with shifts that can be made to the car to help it turn better with adjusting the camber of the tire, the ride height, and in general how tight or loose it is for driver preference, and how the track goes (the heat of the surface for instance changes how much grip it has for the tires). 

Then you have the pit strategy. Do you change 2 tires to get done faster, 4 for better grip, stay out to get better track position? Is your driver good at conserving fuel and can go longer between stops? Is you crew particularly fast? Is your spotter good at keeping the driver and crew chief informed, there is a huge amount of communication going on during the race: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FbPKchlLOj4

And at the end of the day like any sport it is made up of personalities, there are heroes and villains, and underdogs, and corporate shills, its as much about the driver as it is the car. 

As for this 

&gt; Cars going around the SAME lap hundreds of time

That is no different than any other motor sport, F1, Indy, any series that runs circuits is by definition running the same lap, after lap, after lap. 

But at the end of the day it isnt for everyone, some people like ketchup, some people like mustard, some people like to be dicks about it, others just live their lives. I mean im honestly up there at about 50k between federal and some private. But I chose to go to an out of state school, and take on loans in my name. And then chose to move to the outskirts of one of the top job markets in the country and know I wanst gonna be living the high life, and have to hustle to get by for a few years. 

But I made the choice to get cheap beer for a few years to get the name on the degree I wanted, and to be able to move to the area where both jobs where and lots of fellow alumni were. Not even that MacArthur wasnt involved but that the islands of Tarawa and Iwo Jima, but they fell outside of his command area. 

They were in the South Pacific and Central Pacific Area's respectively, both of which came under Nimitz's Pacific Ocean Area command. 

MacArthur only commanded the SW Pacific Area, and while Marines did fight under him in the Bismarck Archipelago, Peleliu, and the Philippines, the majority of the island hopping did not occur under his watch.  

https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/f/f6/Pacific_Theater_Areas%3Bmap1.JPGOne of the main arguments you here goes like such: 

The UK was a major imperial and colonizing power, it shouldnt matter what the people the colonizer brought with them want, much like how decolonization went in Africa. (this argument is hurt by the lack of any native population with ties to Argentina in the Falklands).  

No, but for instance laws relating to land usage and development might vary in a state mostly made up of metro areas, and one of mostly agricultural areas. Or there might be separate rules about what you can do with waste water in the two, the urban state might require it to go to a special treatment facility, while farm runoff can go to a normal runoff pond to be filtered by the ground itself, so long as what pesticides and such are used is controlled. The guy who put everything together in 1915 was Anthony Fokker, a Belgian by birth who company built the majority of planes used by the German Military in WW1. Saving this because it is one of the best breakdowns outside of credible defense ive seen in a long time and plan on linking to it in the future. Well done!I assume it is young Angel she is talking to? Do we know if he kept his power boost from Black Vortex?Stupid Sexy Sorcerer Supreme...Assuming he is speaking about the Doctors Without Borders hospital that was struck either through grievous error or misleading intelligence in Kunduz Afghanistan. And we helped!ACCCG trip or bust. I kinda really hope that comes back to bite him in the ass at some point. Bullshit! Give me Dick Rider or Give me Death!Its also why the Thor movies become MILES more interesting when you stop caring about Thor as the main character and watch them as the "Tragedy of Loki" The absolute top moment in Secret Avengers has to be the moment Coulson locks up. When he realizes he is just a dude that wears a nice suit and has a pistol while trying to stop super villains. And then he works through it, not easily, but he comes to peace with it and decides to try to help however he can. Clearly the implication is that you cant be a fan of both America and Notre Dame!https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=c5lhfKUFNN8

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hHia1zu_YNI

Hiddleston as well. The real Carolina.https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alaska_Highway

There IS a highway, built by the US Army Corps of Engineers during World War 2. As for why the US then didnt want or demand the strip be made US sovereign soil a few reasons. 

1. It benefits Canada more than the US, it is MUCH more efficient to ship stuff by water than truck whenever possible. 

2. It is a hassle to maintain, why would the US want to take on that issue when Canada is perfectly willing to do so. 

3. Finally Canada and the US are good friends and allies, with at the end of the day very little that could truly end that relationship. It isnt worth it to haggle over one road to nowhere. That would imply anyone likes the Cocks...And completely misses the point of the Gunpowder Plot...

Its easy to like the Catholic Terrorist when the govt in the movie/comic is itself made up of Christian Extremists. 11 years? 

Thats a cute little streak there.That isn't to say that a scholarship doesn't include A LOT. 

Tuition, Room and Board, all their books, a computer, unlimited meal plans, nutritional counseling, free special academic counseling, and the physical therapy/physical training when not practicing, and it continues if they want a Master's degree. 

For playing a sport that is a pretty sweet deal. Hence why both nation's get very concerned when either one talks about building missile defense systems. 

The idea that both sides are fucked if one launched, Mutually Assured Destruction or MAD. That you couldn't stop the other side from getting enough launched to kill you too, is in part what kept the Cold War, Cold. Virginia Tech/Miami 2011. 

Miami goes up 35-31 with just under 3 left. 

The ensuing VT drive takes just over 2 minutes including a 20yd TD run by Logan Thomas on a 4th and 1 with 1:01 remaining to go up 38-35. 

And finally Miami's attempt to air it out to get to FG range with Jacory Harris, and the now famous "Enter Sandman" timeout just before the final play. 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RovY5ObtP0oIn general if the Soviet Union existed the last time you had a losing season, I think its safe to call that a streak. At this point it isn't even a sure fire thing, or even likely at this point of him being able to secure the nomination of the Democratic Party. 

One of the latest polls from Quinnipiac university (one of the premier polling sources for the US election process), released a new poll on November 4. http://www.quinnipiac.edu/news-and-events/quinnipiac-university-poll/national/release-detail?ReleaseID=2299

10, 11, 12, 13, and 14 are comparisons on if Sanders and various GOP nominees were all up for the election tomorrow. And Sanders loses out to both Ben Carson, Christie,Cruz and Marco Rubio, while beating Trump by just 2%.

But at the end of the day it is way to far out to say. So at the end of the day he seems to be competitive with GOP candidates, but his getting the nomination over Hilary Clinton is still an uphill battleI suspect he and Black Bolt may have had a bit of  fisticuffs over the Terrigen release. I want to say Medusa says something about it in InHumans #1. Seems like he may have done something to piss off Black Bolt enough to cause him to release so much Terrigen that it is now worldwide. How?

GT is an even bigger dumpster fire than we are while Beamer is 5-0 vs them on Thursday Nights, and we haven't lost to UVA since the Iraq War began. That's our last 2 wins to egt to 6 right thereno no no, that's how you guys got the games vacated to begin with!Because a fraternity doesn't need to have a membership conditioned and able to follow orders instantly, in high stress situations, which may get them injured or killed.

In the spectrum of things a soldier, sailor, air men, or marine could theoretically be faced with in the execution of their duties, being yelled at, or doing pushups is pretty far down the scale of "how much this sucks" and is a good way to build up some thicker skin, to be able to better focus, and to instill an ability to follow orders and procedures. 

I would give so much for this to happen. SMU's record is not on him, but their almost doubling offensive output is thanks to him. 
https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/736x/45/d7/99/45d799a69c5ee5c85c9c21fb2379acc5.jpg

From "Bud Foster's Most Dangerous Game Experience" that is not a mascot, it is something you seal an enemy in and then hunt for sport. 

http://www.hokiesports.com/hokiebird/images/three.jpg

Although the turkey/man/giraffe hybrid on the left is a strong contender. 

Though Corps of Cadets Hokie Bird will always have a special place in my heart too.

http://www.sarahmeadows.com/images/100_3478.JPGI  believe that qualifies as "Straight Hatin'" by the technical definition of course. Digging it a lot, it actually looks like a superhero suit for a Colonel in the United States Air Force.

Hair isnt crazy long, because it gets hot as balls wearing a helmet or cover all day, but feminine, because she doesnt feel the need to pretend she isnt a girl. 

Standup collar because Carol is classy like that. A belt that actually has uses and pouches, because why the fuck not, if it was good enough for the GI's fighting Hitler its good enough for her.

And while certainly not the original intent, a red sash has long been a signature staple of British, French and American commissioned officer's uniforms. And is still part of it today, for instance the Dress Uniforms of Seniors at West Point http://usarmy.vo.llnwd.net/e2/c/images/2012/10/19/268598/original.jpgNeat to hear! Hopefully it bodes well for 2017 and the bad eggs in both fan bases can be left at home and instead everyone else can just enjoy the renewal of a long overdue rivalry. The 2004 Sugar Bowl was a metric fuck ton more interesting and competitive than the National Championship that year. And definitely gave some credence to that year at least not having a consensus national champion. I mean at the end of the day he did run train on one of Foster's better teams, not once, but twice in 2011. 

That year is all the proof I need that he is qualified. One rumor is that he see's VT as a nice combination as high profile enough to build a resume should Texas open up, and also still easy to win big being in the Coastal.

He obviously thinks highly of the school and the current staff, or he would not have sent Mike Brewer, whom he coached in high school, to us. Ultimately the only people that the Navy HAS to tell everything to are the President and his secretaries (Secretary of Defense, Secretary of the Navy) and any relevant Congressional Committees. All of whom will have passed background checks and have security clearances.

A better question is why do you, the guy on the street, need to know what the Navy is testing, what they are hoping to achieve, and what the results were? 

As for telling beforehand, they reserved the airspace with the FAA, and issued a small craft advisory with a time range not to be under the flight path in case of failure. FWIW the statements and all appearances seem to confirm that it was a Trident II, SLBM which was launched, which has been the core of the Navy's submarine ballistic missile arsenal since the early 90's.

Now besides the benefit of simply going through the practice of launching from time to time, there is no saying what else was used. The Navy IS actively refining their Standard Missile 3 which along with the AEGIS radar/computer system is designed to shoot down short to medium ranged ballistic missiles or low satellites. Besides getting lots and lots of people killed, it was the large moment that washed away the Ancien Regime, while the monarchy would be restored it was never safe once the French people had tasted Republicanism.

It also paved the way for Napoleon's rise to power, and outside of Hitler it is arguable that he has been the most influential person on world history in the past 300 years. This isnt her first trip to NYC either. 

She was actually placed into commission, basically accepted into and made officially a US Navy warship in NYC back in 2009, and she visited for Fleet Week in 2011.

Part of her bow was cast from melted down and recycled steel from the World Trade Center, so she has an intentionally deep connection to the city. Fulfills the same role though. Supports getting marines to shore with both space for helicopters, and large well deck. 

This is what it sort of looks like inside: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/San_Antonio-class_amphibious_transport_dock#/media/File:San_Antonio_class_rendering.jpgThat time frAme literally covers half of Miami's titles. Who knows what is in the pouches to be honest. But it need not be mission gear. Maybe at some point flying around space she would like a snack bar?

And I do agree to an extent on the hair. The high and tight sides wouldn't have been choice. But how many current female heroes are rocking short hair? The additional variety is nice in itself. Im a better cheap imitation than you!

No way I am!

For the record Sam is definitely the better knockoff. And another failed Bobby Drake relationship! 

Did absolutely love her and her few arcs though.It gets worse. Since 1998 they have won just twice!To add some about the short lived but hard fighting Hornet. 

She was the 3rd Yorktown Class CV, but had not been part of the original order. Initially under the Naval Treaties of the 20's and 30's just Yorktown, Enterprise, and the scaled down (same # of planes but lighter armor and slower speed) Wasp, along with the massive Lexington's would be the fleet carriers of the navy.

But with the abandonment of the treaties there was going to be a delay until the new Essex class ships would be ready (Spring of 1943 at earliest), so it was decided to build a 3rd Yorktown in the meantime to help fill the gap. 

As shown in the video, her first mission in the war was the Doolittle Raid. 

She was then sent steaming south to attempt to Yorktown and Lexington at that time in the Coral Sea squaring off against the IJN's plans to isolate Australia, but the battle would be over before she got there, and all that Hornet could do would be to screen he damaged Yorktown's return to Pearl. 

And while the death ride of Torpedo 8 at Midway is a tale of daring and courage for the ages, it is also the result of stunning lacks in judgment, possible incompetence, and the USN still feeling out how carrier operations should work. 

The reason Torpedo 8 was alone was because the rest of Hornet's Air Wing had followed her CAG, LTCR Ring much farther North, as there was no hard sighting of the Japanese fleet at the time they took off, while LTCD Waldron felt they were likely farter South, and in the end he was right. 

Ring's error, and his refusal to shift course when it was obvious no Japanese fleet was in his path, it took the short legged F4F Wildcats to the very limit of their range, and most had to turn back early, meaning they now had to make their own way back in pairs or small groups. leading to 12 ditching at sea with 5 of the pilots never being found, while others made for Midway island or ditched off the shore. 

The whole incident was such an embarrassment that 1/3 of the Navy's carrier force had essentially taken no part in the battle that Ring did not even file an After Action Report, in direct violation of the Regulations, but it was never really pressed, so as to gloss over the entire incident. All told, for the result of shooting down just 2 enemy planes thanks to her fighters that remained on CAP over the fleet, Hornet suffered a 50% attrition rate in her air wing.

For the initial landings on Guadalcanal she was kept in reserve near Pearl to rain and screen while Enterprise, Saratoga, and Wasp screened the landings, but was soon sent South. 

By Mid September she was the only USN CV left, Wasp had been sunk by a sub, Saratoga damaged and withdrawn, and Enterprise was rapidly being repaired at Pearl, and she would rejoin Hornet just at the end of October 1942 in time for the Battle of the Santa Cruz islands. 

And while both sides suffered grievously it was the IJN that came out the worse. While Hornet was sunk and Enterprise damaged again, and screening ships from both sides sunk or damaged, the True great loss was in the Japanese Air Crews, more aircrew were lost at Santa Cruz than in any of the carrier battles so far. And by that point over 400 of the 750 aviators in action at Pearl Harbor had been killed, severely hampering Japan's ability to field a first rate carrier force. Well technically since they HELD it for a year after their victory it has been 4,365 days since they actually won a game over us. Yep. At a certain point hiring burned out ex HC's just isn't the way to babysit London. You've also had more success against VT than UVA has had. Its ok, when you can date your rivals last win to before the Iraq War, its safe to say its been a while. That is really fucking sweet. Its not like we don't also have some top notch Olympic teams. 

W. Soccer got into the field of 16 again this year and is right there with UVA and FSU as tops in the ACC. With a tie against FSU and for some reason VT and UVA didn't play which is a dumb move by the ACC.

And Wrestling is sitting pretty at #5 in the nation looking for another solid showing later this year at the NCAA tourney.

Though I will say congrats on the baseball title. 

Might have been nicer for you if you hadn't been SWEPT by VT in the season though!Meh, how nice can that baseball title really be when we swept them during the season? I always love seeing it linked at the bottom of techsideline articles, just to keep up to date. I honestly don't know that any school has had that many transitive titles in a long time. 

Simply because it isn't often you play that many #1's across different sports. 

DAMN near had basketball too!and cool avian mascots!Where is the * next to FSU's streak?

They should certainly get credit for a massively long streak, but the fact remains that they fucked up enough to get caught. if you cant even keep it on the down low enough to get by, or not do it in the first place, then you dont deserve the credit. Itd look nicer with an *.But you still fucked up enough to get caught. That's on the staff and happened just as much as the game. Isnt there also a significantly higher sales tax/VAT in Germany and most of the EU? 

Wiki seems to point to it being 19%, while in the US depending on the state it is pretty much between 4 and 7%. 

That is a pretty large difference, and can certainly add up over a population over a year. Ah, well there you go! Appreciate you breaking it down. Ah yes, the historic National Casket building!

But yes a very neat glimpse into the District's past. If we followed that logic it would lead us into some sort of Hobbesian State of Nature without law and order. 

Where as Macho Man Randy Savage once said, "Nothing means Nothing" 

Is that what you would have us go towards!?!?!?!?!?!?!?Well from now on whenever I watch Mad Max Im going to imagine somehow \#FSUTwitter was responsible for the end of the world. 

I think we can all agree it was one of the likely scenarios anyway. What if before the game it is announced that all those un used timeouts he has left will be awarded to him for that game?

Can you imagine what Timecop could do with 10,12,20! timeouts in one game? I do hope we both get some passionate Spurrier/Dabo level jibes. 

Beamer doesn't really have a mean bone in his body, and the comment about "Its not like we are going on a date" is probably the harshest he has ever been towards UVA. 

Shane Beamer on the other hand has had some excellent troll moments. I think you hit on all the relevant points and summarize the state of the Coastal nicely. 

The scariest thing for untapped historic or potential program out put is that when you add up each division the Atlantic has 6 claimed national titles, and the Coastal 18!!! half of them from Pitt alone. As far as ship class names there is honestly a list of at least 4 or 5 that in my mind probably stood ahead of Zumwalt. 

Honestly it might have been nice for the Navy to continue with naming Destroyer and Frigate classes after the early Captains. Of the big names from the Barbary Wars/1812 Bainbridge and Perry both got classes while Hull just got a few ships and the biggest of them all Decatur just got an Arleigh Burke named for him. 

Or hell Admiral King probably rated more than one single now struck destroyer named for hi. Which is interesting since he isnt even going to be an Aviator/NFO. Ive got it!

His will be a mural of Keenan, Staubach, and Admiral Halsey high fiving and beating the crap out of some caricatured IJN sailor. Welp gonna go watch the 95 Sugar Bowl again, fake 30 year old Latino Texas player and all. Oh come on, regardless of the outcome, that story may be the funniest thing to come out the 90's for college football!Meh, at this point in the year it doesnt even put him in the top 200 for receivers in college. http://espn.go.com/college-football/statistics/player/_/stat/receiving/sort/receivingYards/qualified/False/count/81Even better is that it is week 2! That means both schools get a tune up game!Though sounds like they are finally going to sort it out.

After the first flight both classes are getting up gunned, up armored and renumbered as FFG's and the whole "mission compartmentalization" idea is being scrapped, though the lack of any over the horizon or long ranged missiles is a limit (outside of tests and a test deployment to stick Harpoons on the current LCS's) , but there have been draft proposals to mount anywhere from an 8 to 32 cell VLS system on them which seems to be worth at least considering. 

http://news.usni.org/2014/12/11/gunned-lcs-hulls-picked-navys-next-small-surface-combatantCould just have been the actor/stunt double needing to pull the trigger for the blanks and then such a small thing not being edited out. I would argue that the Board of Navy Commissioners established after 1812, and then the much larger General Board established after 1898 were a clear forefather of the modern general staff that the JCS now represent. 

While lacking executive authority, the General Board's positioning as both being made up of the senior officers of the fleet, and as a brain trust to better prepare the navy to fight was a major shift in how the USN went about its business. So the central administrative leadership of the USN prior to 1900ish is actually quite the convoluted story.

Suffice to say that all orders did come from the SECNAV, but that the individual Commodores and Captains all more or less operated individually in their small commands unless ordered to operate jointly, with the senior Captain of the Navy being afforded additional respect, and preference for command, usually one of the big 44's of the Original 6 Frigates and out of Norfolk, New York, or Boston.

This was not an issue, there were never more than a score or so of men on the list, and rarely more than a dozen ships on deployment at a time even during the Quasi or Barbary War. 

This structure functioned much the same during 1812.

Afterwards though the Board of Navy Commissioners was established to ease the function of the growing Navy. With the SECNAV, a Secretary, and 3 Post Captains, the Board was authorized to oversee things such as the writing of regulations, and the construction and provisioning of ships, while the Secretary still controlled the manning, and deployment of vessels.

Many of the Navy's early leaders served as President of the Board, Rodgers, Bainbridge, and Chauncey all took turns, while Decatur served on ti till his death in the duel with Commodore Barron. 

Indeed SECNAV Paulding served for many years as the Board's Secretary. 

This was then dismissed in the 1840's and the Bureau System established, with the specific departments headed by senior officers and reporting directly to the SECNAV. The most important of which was the Bureau of Navigation which was essentially the Human Resources Department for the Navy. 

Then once again following the war with Spain in 1898 the General Board was established. Unlike the previous Board it held no authority but was essentially a brain trust of senior or forward thinking officers. It was from their staff that War Plan Orange first emerged for instance.  

Then in 1915 the post of CNO was established and everything related to peparing the ships for war was delegated to him. Warfighting though had always been the responsibility fot he actual officers in command and they answered only to the SECNAV. 

So the evolution from Board to Buraeu to CNO to JCS has been simply a streamlining of everything else. Whereas the Captains of the Original 6 Frigates were responsible even for their construction, now a Captain shows up with a ship fully built, a crew recruited and assigned to him, and can pull into port and not have to worry if he can get what is needed. Allowing him to better focus on the fighting efficiency and deployment of his ship. Not one bit. 

In the early days they were essentially the entire controlling force behind the Navy. And in response to the President deciding which of the few ships went where, under what Captain, and keeping the books balanced and corruption at bay.

That last part is a major reason for Civilian Control even today. It is a holdover from the Lords of the Admiralty where half were serving officers (Sea Lords) and the rest were politicians. If the Navy spent too much money, or was seen to be inefficient or unprepared it could very well have brought down the government, so having a part member in charge of the governance made constitutional, political, and business sense. The whole game was a shit show before hand, including Antonio Banks getting in trouble, and Beamer for the first time following through on his Bus ride home threat. 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/1995_Sugar_Bowl_%28December%29#Off-field_problems

But Texas had:

&gt; The biggest off-the-field incident was revealed on the final weekend before the Sugar Bowl. Texas reserve defensive back Ron McKelvey was revealed to be using an assumed name. In reality, he was a 30-year-old man named Ron Weaver who had played for a junior-college team and a small-college team under other assumed names. Weaver disappeared prior to the Sugar Bowl, but stated that he had used the assumed name in order to gather information for a book about the inner workings of Texas football. Weaver later pleaded guilty to a felony charge of misusing Social Security numbers, but he avoided jail and paid no fine.[62] Texas was not sanctioned by the NCAA, but Longhorns players later said the event was a severe distraction from pre-game preparations.You are very welcome. Not sure if you have read it but an absolute must for understanding the first 40 years of the USN is Ian W. Toll's 6 Frigates. http://www.amazon.com/Six-Frigates-Epic-History-Founding/dp/039333032X

And int he end by 1815 the USN just didnt have very many officers it could turn to for senior command.

Truxton and Dale had left prior to the war and were persona non grata. Prebble was dead along with Lawrence. 

That essentially left Perry, Bainbridge, Decatur, Hull, Chauncey, Stewart, Rodgers, and Macdonough as the cadre of experienced captains to virtually run the navy. Which explains how to even just fill out the ranks men like Barron and Porter were brought back into the fold. And how men like Elliott attained rank. For better or worse there were about 2 dozen men of any rank in the USN who had commanded a vessel in battle and they couldnt afford to let too many go for reasons of personality conflicts. 

Though when they started killing each other that was a different matter.   You wont regret it. probably the best single volume work on the subject. I make it a point to go through it once a year or so. A lot of good info even in the words of the founders about if the US should even have a navy and to what ends she might employ one.

To say nothing of its readability (which is great) or Toll's strong command of language and descriptiveness when it comes to the actual naval actions of the era. How could the war in Iraq have lasted for 10 years if the US took Baghdad in 6 weeks?

Its a giant freakin Galaxy, not everybody is gonna be on board with the new status quo, some people had it pretty good under the Empire.

Even with the reset of Canon we can at the very least assume plenty of True believers, or political hardliners wont be happy about how they would do under a Rebel victory and will have fought to hold on to what they had. No in other countries elected officials just assault each other physically. 

At the end of the day if government is supposed to be made up of adults a system where they use their words instead of their fists is a step in the right direction. And yet not universal, my Alma mater for instance experienced it largest ever incoming class this year, by almost 500 students.

http://wsls.com/2015/08/19/virginia-techs-largest-freshman-class-begins-move-in-wednesday/And yet not universal, my Alma mater for instance experienced it largest ever incoming class this year, by almost 500 students.

http://wsls.com/2015/08/19/virginia-techs-largest-freshman-class-begins-move-in-wednesday/
&gt; At the top is the Marine Expeditionary Force which consists of one Marine division, a Marine Air Wing, and a Marine Logistics Group. There are 3 Marine Expeditionary Forces, one for each of the 3 Marine divisions which makes up the Marine Corps
&gt; 
&gt; The basis for a lot of this can be traced back to the Battle of Guadalcanal, where Marines on the island were left alone without naval support when the Navy was chased away by the Japanese fleet. As thus, the Marines were cut off from supplies and sea-based aviation support - the Marines have thus fought fiercely for being capable of being self-sustained in such operations.

Two MAJOR caveats I will point out here.

1. Is that while today there are only 3 active MARDIV's the 4th is still on the books as the reserve component, and in WW2 the 5th and 6th were both active as well. Saying that because the USMC has an active force structure resembling a Corps is a poor forcing of the archaic usage and origin of the name to fit the modern force. 

2. Is that while Admiral Fletcher did order TF61 IN ACCORDANCE with his established plan to withdraw South on the night of D+1, it was Turner who at the last minute kept changing his plans and in the end even failed to inform Fletcher, his nominal commander, that the unloading was behind schedule. 

  Simply put the carriers were more valuable than the Marines, but even still Fletcher used them strenuously to defend CACTUS, as evidenced in the Easter Solomon's where the he bagged his 6th Japanese carrier and ENTERPRISE was damaged, or under his successor the Navy traded the WASP sunk by an IJN sub to cover the arrival of the 7th Marines. While SARATOGA was also damaged along with the BB SOUTH DAKOTA by IJN subs as a result of their operating within air range of CACTUS.

In general the "Abandonment" of the Marines by the Navy is greatly overblown and a disservice to the memory of the men and to actual history. yes for about 2 weeks in mid August there was a reluctance to operate near to CACTUS if it could be avoided, but for the remaining 3 months of the hard fighting the Navy was active in its defense of CACTUS, fighting 2 fleet battles, multiple raids, and operating in sub infested waters to support it. 

To say nothing of the fact that instead of leaving them in the rear at Espiritu Santo the Navy sent planes from the sunken carriers to Henderson Field, most notably FIGHTING FIVE spent 2 months on the island. In its time VF-5 racked up over 30 kills, produced several aces, and was joined by TBF's and SBD's to form a composite strike group commanded by an officer off the sunk WASP which dueled with Japanese Sea Plane Tenders and the Tokyo Express. 

And of course is the fact that you cant really trace the origins of Marine Air to a campaign where it already existed with the 1st MAW.&gt; USMC CAS pilots are all former infantry/cavalry soldiers AFAIK.

Only really True in the sense that all brand new 2LT's spend 6 months playing marine at The Basic School and get to pretend to be infantry. Then they branch out with the aviation guys heading to flight school. 

Glennon and Cory Holt actually do a GREAT VT podcast now, sound quality needs work but discussion is great from guys who know what is up.If by "Polytech" you mean "Polytechnic" then yes.

But I guess we shouldn't be surprised a school without an English Dept. would struggle with words. You may be the first person Ive heard of that actively says "Gah-Tech" 

And in general it is because it sounds dumb for both state abbreviations. You don't see TTU being called "Tx-Tech" or see 'Cah-Tech" 

Cal tech gets a pass in normal usage because Cal isn't the state abbreviation, whereas saying "Ca(h)" would sound ridiculous, same with Vah or Gah. You sound like a toddler learning to speak. To delve deeper, can you share what type of program it was, the type of school, what state etc?True, forgot about them. So we have 1/5 of the Tech's so far that doesn't seem to fight being called "State Abbreviation Tech" Maybe some UGA fans can speak to it more, but what was the discipline culture like. 

From memory it seemed like he wasn't a guy to ignore it, but like every other big time school every year there were plenty of issues to address. 

Reality or not it seems that is something I suspect UVA will look for in the coach of providing the perception of a program staying out of legal trouble. He was actually born while Frank was a Def Asst for The Citadel. 

He also spends a lot of time at his dad's lake house in north Georgia, he is certainly as familiar with that part of the country as he is with SW Virginia for sure. neat, honestly just had no idea, had no real reason to follow the attrition there so good to know he is at least above average for practicing what he preaches. And since there is a CIT, and 2 Cal Polytechnic they do need ways to differentiate them.

There is only one Tech in the Commonwealth. Hell id love the branding opportunities if we just did both and instead of VPI became VIP!

Virginia Institute of Polytechnologies and State University or some such. &gt; I understand the critics have asked why I didn\u2019t announce I was retiring at the end of the season, as some other coaches have done. I felt that if I had done this, I would have been a distraction throughout the remainder of the season about my last game everywhere I went. I did not want a \u201cSpurrier Farewell Tour.\u201d The players deserve to be the story of each game.

IDK Steve, seemed to work just fine for us. Even got us bowl eligible. 

And if by distraction you mean appreciation and simply being thanked for a job well done, while providing the extra impetus to the team then I just don't have an answer to that. 

The players even came together and decided they weren't going to be the ones to tarnish the school and coach's legacy. Ive got to be honest I feel the opposite, if simply because Beamer provided the complete opposite side of the coin and it worked out fabulously. 

Announced retirement at end of year during bye week, was humble and focused on team during last 3 games, and the players responded by carrying him off the field twice, ending the 3rd longest bowl streak in the nation at GT, beating UVA for the 12th straight time, and continuing the nations 2nd longest bowl streak to 23. Do you mean if you say change your major once you are in?

Engineering is handled basically separately from the rest of the school, everyone comes in as General Enginering and has to meet course, grade, and standing requirements by the end of year two to apply for a specific Eng major to continue on. Most are competitive, some of the more obscure ones are not.

For everyone else if you are accepted on your application you come in as said major, but to switch some you just fill out the paperwork, some are competitive, Political Science which I did actually went from competitive to open while I was there. 

then if you are admitted but not to your major you have the generic "University Studies" title which actually falls under the academic advising office.

So I think VT follows a sort of hybrid scheme, but trending more towards the university model since the mission is to see schools like TAMU and PSU as peers more than the other Poly/Tech's. 

You also cant stress enough how much he has seen first hand about program building. Even before joining Spurrier he saw his dad build the program in Blacksburg.

He was on the sideline for Frank's first ever wins over WVU and UVA, and was holding the power cord for his headset in VT's first bowl/bowl win under Frank 23 years ago.

He was the long snapper on the 1999 team that played for the national championship. 

He saw that in just 7 years with the right coaches and players you can go from 2-8-1, to 11-0 and leading the national championship game in the 4th quarter. Huh, honestly never really thought about how other schools did it. That is an interesting contrast then that VT handles the Engineering programs the opposite while it is the liberal Arts (and other sciences) that are similar. But you also have 3 different schools in that state with a Tech or Polytech, it is understandable that you would need to be more clear.

Virginia has just one of any of that, no need to be specific. We are the Technology school of the Commonwealth, Full Stop. Unfortunately recruiting was actually one of his knocks here at Tech.

While he was not the coordinator he was responsible for Richmond and while it was ok the first 2 years, the last two we have not been able to sign any of our 6 targets from the city in this class and just 1 of 4 from the last. So to have him strike out in a major metro that is important for us was disappointing.We can go deeperAfter he had the epidode with his brother at the well there is a news report the home burned down with Christian and his parents inside dead.look at me! I am the captain now!Cap REALLY wants to find BuckyAnd who said it better, Gideon Malick or Jameson Locke: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ht7pwc_LIrcThe COUNTRY didnt make money off of it, they only taxed private enterprises that made money and even then income tax didnt exist before the war so it was mostly import/export, if person A hadnt paid duties on Cotton, the money could still have come from person B exporting something else. And in the end that was tax money which funded the army which ended slavery.

As for those private individuals, that process also wiped out plenty of their wealth too. Any of their personal value that was tied up in slaves was eliminated, any wealth placed in Confederate Bonds was gone, and there is a good chance that their home and property was looted by one of the armies. Except they did not own any, did not import them, and the federal government enforced the banning of importation after the clause became active. 

The closest argument you can make is that they supplemented tax revenues. And thanks to 3/5ths if anything gave the North MORE political power. And even then government income and spending was a minuscule amount compared to any time after 1900. Or that the White House and parts of DC were in part built by slaves, but the US Govt certainly didnt save money on it, the slaves were still rented, the usage of free blacks and local white labour demonstrates that.

And after 1834 Jackson completely eliminated internal Excise taxes until the Civil War, and Tariffs remained such a divisive issue about protecting either Southern slave agriculture or Northern industry that if anything it drove the war on sooner and accelerated the end of slavery.

State governments you can make arguments either way based on free or slave. 

But for the federal govt slavery was at best a shameful source of tax revenue, at worst a bleeding sore requiring output of blood and treasure to keep a lid on (Bleeding Kansas and Navy patrols against slave ships for instance).So does the Empire that freed them to the tune of 600k dead.I would counter they should, if the none in the North had thought the Union worth fighting for they would not have died and slavery would not have been abolished as it was. The existence of the Tariffs fanned the flames of sectionalism to new heights.

By making the South feel economically oppressed and forced to buy Northern domestic products by the Tariff, they saw themselves being cutoff from manufactured goods while the raw materials they themselves created faced a much lower Tariff and duties allowing industry to pick sources. 

So if anything taxation hastened the Civil War, when the oppressors felt themselves oppressed. And seems to me worth it for even though the Tariffs and Customs duties built on the system built upon slavery got the government out of debt for the only time in history, all of that was reversed dumping funding into the war effort. And since none of them died fighting a war that ended slavery the blacks arent free and thus arent owed compensation. While ok there are several things your answer does not include.

Namely service based wealth generation, or creating wealth without using a resource. For instance what resource does a Lawyer, Banker, or Doctor use up to create wealth? 

Or innovation and recycling (which you sort of hint at but not really).Except by all appearances it didnt work. The team didnt improve by his absence they had a worse record without him.

Now it was nice of him to defend Elliott, but at the end of the day Spurrier is without a doubt the best coach on the staff so his removal means there is less brain trust to plan and win games, not somehow more. DO we think Spurrier loses to The Citadel in that manner? 

And you dont have to spend decades at a place to see that bailing doubly screws the school over, the coaching search has now dragged on for 2 months, at the very least his staying on till the end keeps some of the recruit poaching at bay, and if the decision is made but not announced for a time the search can begin without being in near panic mode. Except a Jury isn't a Legislature nor are they Judges. They are not there to opine on the law they are there to determine if a violation of it took place. &gt;  How come the US only entered the Second World War very late, AFTER they were attacked, whereas the British and their empire entered even when they were NOT under threat?

In the first half of the 20th Century there was a long and deeply held streak of essentially isolationism, particularly in the 20s and 30s. 

Many Americans held the view that the backwards and belligerent governments of Europe had brought WW1 upon themselves, and that the best thing America could do was ignore them, while the Japanese were considered a 2nd class race incapable of serious empire building. 

To that end there were no common defense treaties obligating the US to aid anyone in Europe (as France and the UK had with Poland), not were there particularly strongly civic ties that would have made an earlier joining of the war an option (as with the Dominions). An exception making someone not guilty, as in not having violated the law, is a far separate thought process than simply disagreeing with the law.

Me racking up 1000's in parking fines in handicapped spots and then the jury Noneifying it because they hate fines too is FAR different than me parking there while disabled but not displaying tags making me technically not guilty. &gt;  Laws can also be made that are clearly unjust. This is a check on that system.

No we HAVE a check on the system, Judicial Review and the ability of Legislatures to repeal laws. &gt; Embezzling 10 million shouldn't have jail time. Return the funds and house arrest.

So you would allow him to continue in comfort, and expend additional resources on monitoring him, while conceivably also allowing him to resume the practices that got him there in the first place very easily? 

Damn, at least make him pay for the equipment and man hours spent making sure he is there. 
Cetainly, but is a Consequence of the structure, not a part of it. 

We have all powerful and formulated measures to address laws which go too far. Nullification exists, but it being unregulated, limited to individual cases, and reliant on uneducated and unpredictable juries makes it a terrible way to protect a defendant's Constitutional rights from oppressive laws. And by the same logic Jury Nullification is a shortcut to a tyranny of the majority. 

We have already touched on the White killing a Black in the 60's, which I agree is an outdated example.

What about the possibility a man on trial for torching a Mosque today? Lets face it Islamaphobia is becoming a deeply and widely held idea in large swaths of the population. 

That fact is that while we have to accept Jury Nullification as by product of reserving the power of guilt/innocence to a Jury, it does not make it a good system, it has no ability to actually change the law and provide for the general good, does not refer the issue to bodies which are specifically designed to protect the rights of citizens. 

It risks as much harm as good which you seem unwilling to acknowledge.  Not a hard and fast sign but as for offensive depth the leading WR in the ACC is not at Clemson, UNC, FSU, or Miami, it is Isaiah Ford as a Sophomore who just set Tech's single season record for TD catches and will become the school's first ever 1k yard WR. But did they die to free their peers or just for state's rights?

If you say that the blacks who died in a war not started to free the slaves count towards that purpose, by what logic do you exclude every death in the war as being a sacrifice on that altar. Looking at you Mike Vick.

Only QB to sign 100mil contracts with multiple teams, has missed time from injury in every year he has spent in the league. Said construction of democratic government has also  continuously tended towards the extension of rights to all citizens, and with a clear line of restraint for the worst government missteps, while respecting the power of the Legislature as the elected representatives.

So you will forgive me if I place a bit more trust in the current model over a more Athenian mob style as might allow a jury to decide every single case without legal guidance or regulations. 

At the end of the day I will take body which was bale to correct its own previous mistakes (like Dred Scott) with new decisions and the force of legislation behind them, than however 12 random people from the pool were feeling at the time. 
Should also clarify that Nullification doesn't really exist in Civil Trials and that is where you often see lower burdens of proof and crazy large awards. As a white middle class male I would happily trust an organ that has lasted for now several centuries and whose primary interest is in self preservation, IE keeping things good enough for everyone that shit doesn't get real. 

&gt; jury Noneification still happens in the course of a trial, and all of the usual rules of evidence and so on are still in play.

Except the Jury could simply ignore them too, if evidence is tossed during the course of a trial if the law doesn't matter than why should the Jury obey the Judge's instructions? 

But I suppose that is my inner Federalist then, I think Hamilton had the right of this one, I am infinitely more willing to trust my fate to a Judge who is a professional than an amateur jurist. Do we want cost to be the sole factor as to what form punishment takes, the nation was founded on principles not budget ledgers. Whoo!

Good on you FTAB, from a Highty Tighty alumni its always good to see recognition to our peers.

Though come on! A simple Google search would have revealed that while special they are far from unique, they aren't event he only military band in the Power 5!

Just wish VT would get the shout out for being the only school in the nation with 2 bands!At the end of the day I think Bud has become really invested in winning a title at the only FBS school he has ever worked at, and for 30 years we tried doing it with Def and ST alone and it got close but not quite.

Time to see what some Offense can do. Maybe not BB, but Maximus would be cool too.Well they have already survived longer than about half the teams for Stargate Command, so I think that's something to be proud of. So was Crouch. While not wrong I think that is a bit outdated example.

Consider if today a man burned down or even just threatened a Mosque because he claimed he felt threatened or believed they were radicalizing. 

In large swaths of the country there could be plenty of Islamaphobia to let him off the hook. Not necessarily. Since all it really is  returning that Not Guilty verdict in the face of all evidence. 

Since in Federal trials a decision must be Unanimous. So in the end a Hung Jury still results in the defendants at least temporary victory and can be seen as forcing the government to waste resources trying to enforce the "unjust" law to stick it to them. 

But while many states require unanimity for State courts, it is not universal, and while the size requirements have been in flux and legal arguing, Apadoca V. Oregon established that there is no Constitutional Right to Unanimity in conviction for state trials.

So In some states all you need is 50% +1, or at worst for a Hung Jury for at least a short term win. &gt; march pretty damn slowly

Its pretty consistently 108-124 Beats Per Minute, which is your basic march tempo and what most marches you hear were designed to be played at. Originating, unsurprisingly from the march speed of infantry in line. 

The Aggies generally seem to favor marching at the lower end of the spectrum for tempo though. Which makes it a unique choice for playing the SAC march, in general American marches tend on the brighter side for tempo while European ones feel more lethargic. I would also argue that at least military to military relations had thawed even before 1901.

An excellent example would be the exploits of Dewey's Asiatic Squadron in 1898. The squadron was allowed to join together at Hong Kong, make the ships ready for war, and even purchase local ships (including a British flagged steamer) for their coal supplies and as a fleet train. With the ships only being asked to leave once Britain had positively declared neutrality the day the war began. 

Then when, following the victory at Manila bay ships of multiple nations found themselves in the Bay the USN and RN got on very well and closely whilst the German Fleet actively agitated for a confrontation and to force the US out. 

Thus while planning and contingency considerations were smart and did continue, when it came down to it we see thawing between the forces early on. When FAMU stops murdering their Dum Majors they can be on the list. Looks like 6, just like the HT's. 

In line with the Military too. The USMC Field band Manual lays out a 30" step size while the Army Field Band manual has a slightly smaller step of 26 in (.66m). Either way larger than the 8 to 5 stride of 22.5in. Along with VT, VMI, and The Citadel they are one of the last 4 student/cadet Military Bands in Division 1. 

Which means a very distinct and traditional style, military style marching (always facing the direction you are moving), a specific tempo (108-124 Beats per minute), and in general a specific music selection (field or concert marches).

Looks like this is their last show for the season, featuring the 4 way pass through that is their claim to fame to the Strategic Air Command March: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ai3wLjY-AqA

Though I will say were are/were the better dressed
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8E7Kgzw5vL0Which would 3/4 of the states to go along with. I don't think we could get 3/4 of them to agree that the sky is blue. Except it isn't, it is not laid out in the law anywhere, it is simply a loophole in the law.

So yes it is a legal practice but it is no more the law than all those corporations stashing money overseas thanks to a Swiss cheese tax code. &gt; That is correct, because a jury is there to act as a check against the judge and prosecutor.

Were this a Grand Jury I would agree, but as it is a Petit jury, a group of peers has already agreed that there is sufficient evidence and weight of argument that a criminal trial can go forward. 
Seriously, how hard is it to not touch little kids junk, or looka t pictures of said kid junk touching.

This is the 21st Century, haven't we advanced a bit since the days of cave men? Just weeks after China, and years after the USN.

&gt; The use of the Nudol to hit satellites is possible, according to Podvig, who noted the American use in 2008 of a modified Navy SM-3 anti-missile interceptor to shoot down a falling National Reconnaissance Satellite.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=RaKpJ7i-JXA

Though lets all be honest for a minute, BOTH sides have in all likelihood gotten "killer satellites" in orbit for decades from the cold war still. I take the same stance a lot that at the very least a person needs 24 hours to develop any sort of rational response.

But even without this shooting it seems to be a large structural policy failure that a Person can with cause be placed on a No Fly list and pass a background check if I am reading it properly. 

Sure we all here horror stories about mistaken identities or "I Googled going to Syria once and now can't fly" but that seems in the end a sensible flag that we ought to address. Simply not True especially when it comes to firearms. Persons with a documented Mental Illness in every state are limited or prevented form owning or receiving a permit, and yet they have not been CONVICTED of anything.

http://www.ncsl.org/research/civil-and-criminal-justice/possession-of-a-firearm-by-the-mentally-ill.aspx

So no we already today have a classification that prevents firearms purchasing without being a criminal.I mean its not like plenty dont, the guy from Virginia Tech bought them legally for instance, because the school fucked up and didnt disclose that he had nearly been kicked out and required to attend counseling. His Assertion was that you only lose your basic civil rights when in his words "CONVICTED" of a crime. 

I provided a class and situation were that was unTrue, thus proving his claim False, not saying they were the same. Frankly I do wish for much better Due Process for No FLy Lists, but even just last month we SAW progress towards that.

https://www.lawfareblog.com/government-bid-shut-down-challenge-no-fly-list-grounded

Long story short is that the Govt tried to have all reviews go through the DC District Court, and that the courts in general should back off of national security.

The Court of Appeals essentially said 'fuck that" so we are seeing a shift towards a real ability for persons to challenge that status, and improvement in the Due Process that would be needed to tie it to gun permit denial. I tend to agree with you as well, I am on the side for sure of "I would rather an innocent and guilty man go free than lock both up and not know them apart" 

I think if we saw the Judicial system reassert itself with regards to the size, scope, and criteria of No FLy lists we could find a workable median.

And interestingly enough the 6ht Circuit Court actually signaled at least a first step in that direction, asserting District Court's abilities to hear a complaint about inclusion on the list. 

https://www.lawfareblog.com/government-bid-shut-down-challenge-no-fly-list-grounded And we have seen the Courts begin to take that approach too. But in the end would it be so terrible to, if someone were flagged, they might have to get an additional signature or two either from a Judge or the Sheriff saying they are aware of the flag but are going to allow the permit to be issued or purchase to happen? 

Lets bring back the militia too, there would be worse ways to spend a few hours one weekend a month than meeting your neighbors, learning some useful survival skills/ going to the range, and then eating and drinking away the night. And yet as I linked we are seeing that Judges are beginning to look much more favorably on providing a venue for No Fly list challenges, is it so inconceivable to not foresee a way to use the two together as another factor to consider if an hand gun or other application should be approved?&gt; who has the ability to subjectively decide whether or not to sign.

Lets be honest it isnt often but it happens today rarely, but is still around, and you also act like there isnt any avenue for appeals on court decisions, there is always a higher court/Judge till the USSC. Nor is the right to a timely purchase or acquisition protected, simply that there is an avenue for legal firearm ownership. 

I mean if we want to get SUPER Originalist that might not be too out of line, despite legal interpretation today the 2nd does open with speaking to the need for a well regulated Militia.

We dont make potential purchasers prove they dont intend to use it illegally, we certainly dont make them say they will use it for collective defense, or  would drill with their neighbors. 

We can not infringe on there being a right to own a weapon, but also place a burden to affirm an intention to use it legally and in a manner consistent towards the purpose Amendment. But would then the Petit Jury's decision to Noneify be infringing on the rights of the members of the Grand Jury?

The members of the Grand Jury exercised their rights to act as jurors, and in doing so approved the charges. The Petit Jury's decision to Nullify regardless of facts can be said to be a usurpation of the rights of the previous Jury who decided that an actual trial should take place with specific charges under specific laws. &gt; No, for the same reason the Senate's decision to Noneify is not infringing on the House's right to impeach. 

Only assuming that the Senate acts in good faith.


&gt; The petit jury doesn't prevent the trial from taking place. They simply decide after the trial's conclusion to acquit. In our system, that's the end of the case forever. You might disagree with the jury, but once they have spoken, that's it.

&gt;A jury verdict is one of a very few final votes under our Constitution, and once it has been taken, that's the law.

Yes and the assumption that everyone labored under is that the trial is decided by facts. Its why the Constitution provides for a person in the 6th Amd "to be confronted with the witnesses against him; to have compulsory process for obtaining witnesses in his favor" and of course the wording for an "Impartial Jury" one could argue that a juror with intent to try to get everyone to Noneify a case is coming in prejudiced and thus incapable of meeting the Constitutional Standard for being an Impartial jury. 

Again Nullification is in the end nothing more than a petulant outburst by a group of jurors seeking to usurp the system of government for good or ill, it should not be afforded more importance than the process which do orders of magnitude more to protect the rights of citizens at large from being burdened by improper laws.Its from the Musical "Hamilton" about Alexander Hamilton (First Sec. Tres, guy on the $10, opponent of Jefferson, Aide to Washington during the war).

In particular the song "Right Hand Man" about Washington leading the Continental Army: http://genius.com/Lin-manuel-miranda-right-hand-man-lyrics/

[WASHINGTON]

We are outgunned

Outmanned

Outnumbered

Outplanned

We gotta make an all out stand, Ayo, I\u2019m gonna need a right-hand man. &gt; Interesting how you paint the jury with pejoratives like "petulant" while implying other government bodies are somehow more entitled to their exercise of power. The jury is a Constitutionally mandated right of every citizen, and they have the unreviewable power to acquit a defendant, regardless of your theories about the limits of their petulance.

And yet how can they fulfill the charge to be "Impartial" if they willfully ignore fact. 

&gt; It isn't afforded more importance. It is simply the final vote. If they happen to set a guilty man free, such is the price of imperfect justice in a world where the state would otherwise have an insurmountable advantage.

&gt;Their Noneification of a prosecution is the citizen's process of sending a message to the state: This far. No further. Period. 

And yet what good has it done int he end? That one case may be over the law is still on the books, a different jury may return a similar case differently, and nothing has changed.

If anything finding the the case honestly and allowing the Appeals process to play out could very well have done more aid towards removing the unjust law. As it could have gone on to have a higher court agree with the Jury's sentiment, and then if it is found Unconstitutional it is struck and no one is in danger from being burdened by it.  

The Circuit and Supreme Courts have done more than Nullification ever has to help so you will forgive me if I place my trust in the experts not the amateurs. 

Got to go with Hamilton on this one:

&gt;The voice of the people has been said to be the voice of God; and, however generally this maxim has been quoted and believed, it is not True to fact. The people are turbulent and changing, they seldom judge or determine right.
&gt; They decide what is and is not a fact. 

They decide Guilt or not, that is not a decision on facts, while it should be based on such. Example #1: OJ Simpson. 

&gt; shockwaves through the halls of justice.

Shockwaves are nice but they still dont change the law.

&gt; dishonest 

How is it dishonest to do the job you were called upon under the Constitution to do? It never says that a Jury ought to consider the "Justness" of the law, just that on Felony Trials and sizable Civil Trials they might decide guilt or innocence. I give the authority and standing of the higher courts to decide those questions precisely because that is who is given it in the Constitution. 

&gt; Yes you do seem to be in a big hurry to crown kings and cast down their subjects. 

Because it the luminaries and stars of thought which get things done, the Founders and figures of stature since were not common men, and the system they devised goes to great lengths to keep decision making power out of the hands of the common man, I dont think i am smarter than they are and am willing to let the system they hammered out work as intended. 

All Brailsford did was admit that the loophole existed and that it could not be forbidden or stopped at the time.

You conveniently ignore all the cases related to it since then. 

Including notably US v. Thomas from 1997, which while giving every benefit of the doubt to protect Juror Deliberation, in attempting to allow a juror to stay if they are simply unconvinced, or can prove they reach some Moral Outrage during the case. But IF there is evidence they came in predetermined to Nullify they may be removed from the Jury mid case.

&gt; We categorically reject the idea that, in a society committed to the rule of law, jury Noneification is desirable or that courts may permit it to occur when it is within their authority to prevent. Accordingly, we conclude that a juror who intends to Noneify the applicable law is no less subject to dismissal than is a juror who disregards the court's instructions due to an event or relationship that renders him biased or otherwise unable to render a fair and impartial verdict.

&gt; A jury has no more "right" to find a "guilty" defendant "not guilty" than it has to find a "not guilty" defendant guilty, and the fact that the former cannot be corrected by a court, while the latter can be, does not create a right out of the power to misapply the law. Such verdicts are lawless, a denial of due process and constitute an exercise of erroneously seized power. 

And while it stopped at the 2nd Circuit the very fact that it was not seen as important enough or controversial enough to take up by the USSC should be clear as to its falling in line with modern legal thinking. 

Full Decision: http://openjurist.org/116/f3d/606Only 4 ACCCG trips to catch up to that "other" Coastal Football school...And Narduzzi to Pitt last year has worked out really well so far too!Lets see him start with Miami's first ACC Title game appearance.I think good for them, Hell it took a 50yd FG for Iowa to beat them!&gt; It isn't within their authority to prevent. Tampering with a jury is a criminal offense for a reason. They have the constitutionally mandated authority to render a verdict, and if they vote 12-0 to acquit, that's the end of the discussion.

Except that is exactly what happened in the District Court "Juror #5" who was the problem was removed. On Appeal The 2nd Circuit Agreed with the decision. 

&gt; It's no different than if 38 legislatures ratify an amendment. The states have spoken. Case closed. 

Except even then there is recourse for another Amendment, IT IS NOT CASE CLOSED (18th/21st), while Double Jepordey prevents such for trials.  

&gt; The jury is the trier of fact. 

I think i may have misconsTrued how I worded my response. I meant more to convey that a Jury's findings of the answer to questions of Fact are not absolute and universally binding. A Jury in a case that were to somehow find that 2+2=5 for instance would not suddenly change all of math. 

&gt; Nobody is defending a jury predetermined to Noneify.

But what of a single Juror, or one who came in predetermined as you say, all it takes is one to at best force a mistrial. And why then should we separate when the decision was reached, be it before coming to court, during arguments, at lunch during deliberations, if the evidence is there it is fully within the judges powers to remove them to protect the proceedings and to ensure a fair trial under the law is given. 

I also want to again sate my main point. That Nullification is perhaps the worst option and one I would wholly distrust for dealing with a law that genuinely violated my Constitutional Rights, when presented with the ability to change said law both through Legislative means or as recourse by challenging it in the Courts. In one option all I would need is to prove my argument before a Bench, the other to convince enough officials that my concerns were genuine. 

Whilst for Nullification I would have to hope to have a Juror share my same Moral outrage, whilst my attorney could not use or advocate for it as a positive defense. And who doesnt love the Liberty Science Center. Remember going there many times as a kid to see cool IMAX movies and dinosaur exhibits and stuff. I agree it kind of cant go anywhere without really messing with the right to a trial jury being maintained fairly.

My problems then come really from people not the structure. 

Mostly because people get outraged at different things. Since we both agree that you should and can guard against persons from the outset not interested in the judicial process playing out, we must consider when people in the middle fo a trial reach a sense of Moral Outrage at what is going on.

But everyone has their own triggers and issues they care about, a person can be outraged at an unpopular law (lets say not paying income taxes) but which is perfectly constitutional, the harm I see in Nullification is when it is used not against Unconstitutional Laws per se, but simply unpopular ones. 

By and large though I will say i find myself willing to be content with the equilibrium as it stands, persons setting out to be disruptive can be dealt with, the concept remains as a glitch that cant be patched out without breaking the game as it were, but you arent allowed to set out to exploit it as a player if you will forgive my analogy. Enjoyed it overall, lots of good bases to build from, especially with Scott, pre SW it felt like his wrestling with older Scott's legacy was only half taken seriously. 

Though it is frustrating to watch that as Laura gets personality, her competency decreases. http://i.imgur.com/peAxvkT.jpg

That is not a woman who falls down a mountain and breaks her arm while skiing. Idie, she has fire/ice control abilities. She was one of the first 5 mutants born after M Day and following the return of Hope Summer in the Messiah arcs. Then everyone realized Hope sucked and was a bitch but Idie stayed. Her being forced to kill and seeing herself as a monster was a big factor int he schism between Scott and Logan in forming the two camps.

Then there is Evan, he is basically kind of a kid version of Apocalypse. There was a moment where you Scott's heart got stopped and old Scott disappeared, so in general they simply agreed not to die.

Then there is the whole "how gay is which Bobby" thing and if Jean just messed with their heads to have a gay friend. Sure if you consider the war against Germany the whole of WW2. 

But in the end the war against Japan involved as many men, from as many countries, waged across an entire 50% of the Earth's surface, in the deep jungle, and barren coral islands, and in the endless sea. While the death toll starting with the Japanese invasion of China is in the end comparable to the +30 million that were killed against Germany. 

In Large parts though Churchill's' greatest talents lay as a coalition builder. He kept the domestic govt together, kept the Dominions in the fight, and committed to the global war (even as the Japanese bombed Australia there were Australian fighter planes fighting Rommel in Africa for instance), and he used his warm personal relationship with FDR to get as much help before Dec 1941, andin smoothing feelings after.

He also while a dedicated Imperialist, accepted the UK's role as the junior partner. He knew that the more harmoniously the US took over the more they would be willing to use hard won British experience. To the King he was said to remark to the extent that with the US in the war "it doenst matter who leads, what matters is that we have our partner" While not wrong for sure, I think you do come down far too much on the predetermined side.

Simply too much unknown, and evidence which causes pause. One of the largest concerns being that if the US never enters the war Russia is going to have a hard time making up mostly for the shit tons fo trucks they got, meaning the mobilization of even larger formations by 1943 doesnt happen, while allowing Germany to retain if certainly not advantage than at least parity which was close enough for them.

And without US or larger British aid and relief of pressure we dont know how badly those extra German formations could have added to the strain of the Soviet government. 

Remember the preceding German invasion of Russia hadnt needed to win outright in the field, just cause enough losses that the government collapsed and the people had enough of the killing. More or less. It shares the same status as HMS VICTORY, and the Russian Cruiser AURORA, in that all 3 are still warships who are in active commission and "service" to their respective navies and have crews that are sailors not museum employees or volunteers. 

That service is just to be a museum. CONSTITUTION then has special status in the USN's history as she was one of the original order for 6 frigates to be built in 1794, and she scored a series of victories against British ships.

So while you might use it as an easy dig at American peculiarity, it is really not that uncommon for large or old navies to have a similar ship. 

So a better response might be that American, Russians, and British are weird. 

Yes and that is done In Committee where the Bills are drafted and Amendments presented by other Senators and considered. We also should consider its role for for national security. Since it was very much a time over debate on if an Army or the Militia could protect the nation. And while the Militia had performed TERRIBLE during the Revolution it still had many supporters and distrust of a standing army. Hence why it only allows funding for the Army in 2 year increments.

So the Framers sort of tried to have it both ways.Excellent write up.

Only thing I would add is that we do have a concrete example of an Amendment used to reduce personal liberty in the 18th. However it is just one and as we saw led to a whole lot of negative consequences. Nope, some are used for training missions, some will be found to be defective in inspection, some will be retired if the explosives in them pass their use by date. 

There is continual attrition in weapons stocks of all nations. However they do get paid MORE for being in combat, being deployed, being in a dangerous region. The ACC's largest problem was that they held it in Florida and VT and BC played in back to back ACCCG's. 

Since being sensible and moving to Charlotte the attendance has always been better.The closest weapon that the Allies ever had to the front line was the M47A1 Bomb. It was an aerial 100 pound bomb that could carry Mustard Gas, White Phosphorus, or an early form of Napalm. 

Specifically a large cache of 2000 of them were on a Liberty ship in the port of Bari in Italy for potential use when the port was bombed on December 2nd 1943 by the Luftwaffe and the ship exploded releasing the gas. In the end about 600 military personal were effected with 100 dead and only rough estimates as to the number of civilian deaths as at first nobody knew the gas was there and once discovered it was quickly hushed up and the doctors left to their best efforts, though the investigator deduced what was going on and convinced the doctors. http://www.independent.co.uk/news/uk/politics/syria-air-strikes-poll-shows-uk-is-divided-over-decision-to-extend-bombing-a6756171.html

To add some numbers to show that it is a heavily divided issue, while there is a clear majority against it in Scotland according to this poll, there was a slim majority in favor of it in England. 

Just one poll but it begins to paint a clearer picture. Ehh, bombing isn't exactly a high attrition operation for manpower for the RAF. 

Real war, sure, but you then lose those savings on having to train up the new guys. 

Yeah I felt like there was a great opportunity at the end of Korvac when 616 Quill shows up. 

All we know from the original Guardians run is that the future Guardians look on his crew as their forbearers, respect them, and know a lot about them and it isn't all just because of the multiple Starhawks. 

So what if that is because a fully matured Quill met and laid the mission of the Guardians all out, then of course it would require the future GotG to make sure Vance is there to properly coalesce the team.  They went from hardened killers who are some of the best stormtroopers in the Galaxy, who used alcoholism and humor to mask just how overmatched they were.

To a bunch of sarcastic hipsters who play D&amp;D and get punked on the regular. 

Quill went from Bobba Fett level baller to a poor man's Han Solo without a mean streak. Long story short Glob gets used as an improvised Heat shield to land a space ship. &gt; No Fly List is the Terror Watch List

Not True though they are related. The TSC uses a two-step process to watchlist an individual. First, the TSC accepts nominations from dozens of federal, state, local (and sometimes foreign) government agencies to include individuals in a massive Terrorist Screening Database (TSDB). The TSC then sifts and sorts entries in the TSDB into additional subject-specific watchlists for use by different agencies (like the TSA uses the No Fly List). https://www.lawfareblog.com/guest-post-jeff-kahn-latif-v-holder-striking-down-no-fly-list

&gt; DUE PROCESS

Which is being upheld now with the ability to challenge a person's status on said list in court. And namely backed by the obligation if it comes to that for the TSA and TSC to explain why they placed said person on the list. 

In particular while they are dragging their feet the DHS IS under obligation to implement a better watch list system, AND TELL PEOPLE why they are on it. Resulting from the case of Latif v. Holder. 

As it stands we accept a Judge signing off on what can be a 100% BS story resulting in a restraining order without said person being present and that being enough to stop purchase and call that Due Process. 

So long as there is a process to challenge anyone's status on said list, which the courts are now actively upholding, Due Process is maintained. That it takes time is not an issue, there is no right to a speedy purchase.  And yet a person who quite possibly has done nothing wrong, has NOT been convicted, has perhaps NOT committed a crime, yet have their rights to a firearm restricted.

1/2 the states have the requirement for anyone even ACCUSED of Domestic Violence are compelled to surrender legally owned firearms. 

And 2/3 remove the right to posses a firearm for anyone subject to a simple Protection Order.

http://smartgunlaws.org/domestic-violence-firearms-policy-summary/

So tell me again about Due Process, if we are willing to go to those lengths when it comes to domestic security and access to firearms, to the extent of taking legally owned ones away at the first hint of a crime from an Innocent person. The problem is that then becomes a bit of a loop.

Since the vote determines a vote for the award, Keenan winning it would have given him a much better result than if he were left off. No, but if they are also trying to use it as an indicator of the final finishing order, Reynolds winning it would have a tangible effect on that. &gt; It's just that the most likely selections (which are the candidates in the Experts' Poll

Except even then you cant have it both ways. Keenan was never being projected to win, he always projected to finish in the field, but was then the leading vote getter for the Nissan Vote. So by removing him when the ESPN lists dropped him removed the guy who was already most likely vote getter from the default list for Nissan, thus skewing towards the guys who will and should win the Heisman, however the Nissan poll had already trended away from that as ESPN was calling for him 5ht or 6thish while the poll had him first.  &gt; You seem like a smart guy so I have a really hard time believing you really can't see the difference between this and the NO FLY list which is so shrouded in secrecy.

I do, but I am also willing to draw a line somewhere and say that between the courts reasserting their strength, and the new jurisprudence we are seeing on NFL challenges that the era of name matches preventing flight are ending quickly. I think it comes down to that I am willing to let the Judiciary use its power to carve out a place for No Fly Lists as a tool for national security, then see how we can apply them. 

We see the courts requiring that a person be informed of their presence on said list and the reasons why. If we had a less chaotic background check system I could see one day a person who wants to purchase a weapon be able to log on themselves ahead of time, enter their name and see if there are any marks against them (maybe a warrant 2 states over for unpaid traffic fines from years ago, maybe a warrant for unpaid child support, maybe the NSA got wind of them posting about how the Paris attackers did a great thing). Simple, go before your local magistrate, and get it cleared, show you don't have a police record/paid the fines/haven't been to Syria or talk to known recruiters. An imperfect system, but one that could work, be centralized, and above board with who is concerned about you potentially buying a gun ahead of time. 

&gt; And the accused only has to refute the specific charges leveled against him instead of trying to prove he has no intention of doing some nebulous future bad thing.

But that is then just a thin line away from why we are ok with a person diagnosed with a mental illness from owning a gun, NO Judge is involved, so long as a Doctor who may or may not be correct thinks so your rights are removed. 

There are also plenty of situations where a Judge need not be involved and Due Process need not apply. About 12 states authorize Law Enforcement to confiscate guns at a scene where they believe Domestic Violence has taken place, they need to not have witnessed it, they are not triers of Fact as a Jury or judge are, but simple suspicion is enough then to deprive someone of their rights to own them. 

So my question is if you (meaning larger sense not you yourself) are ok with that affirmative power existing when local Law Enforcement deals with domestic violence, why should we not at least consider similar for confronting extremism. 

On the whole though I take a pretty dim view of the 2nd Amendment anyway. mostly I frame it as a side effect of the debate between the importance of a militia and a standing army.

While many seek to emphasize its importance to protect people from the government, it cannot be ignored that its co primary purpose is to protect the government itself. Since the early Republic was so deeply divided over the idea of a standing army and supporters were willing to forgive the Militia's dreadful performance in the Revolution as Republican Enthusiasm, and many like Jefferson would have trusted the nation's entire national security to the 2nd Amendment. 

Well we saw how that works, and now today I dont think anyone can make the claim that the DoD is not capable of repelling just about any existential threat, and the militia as the founders new it is of limited value in the modern world and an easy way to a quick death against a modern force. So then just how useful is the 2nd Amendment?Pretty much, nor do I intend to imply anything malicious either.

just that they had already seen in the Fan Vote a trend separate from the Expert poll, and by following the expert poll they were changing the likely result of their fan vote. Except that is where we differ. I am fine with it.

We give Law Enforcement broad trust and powers to act on their own initiative for the general good and it works. 

I am just as fine with an officer taking the guns out of a home that he sees a husband or wife in obvious distress as an Intelligence agency being concerned about a guy who has travelled to Pakistan for 6 months, donates to known terror funding sources, and posts on radical websites for violence being denied temporarily the right to own a gun. Until both groups can appear before a Judge. As it is I hate it, and hope the jurisprudence on it changes. 

However I do side with the idea of allowing during a lawful search and seizure for a broad definition of what can be seized. 

But where I think the problem enters when the Government straddles the line from Criminal prosecution to Civil as here when they try to punish property as it were. You can achieve the same goals of investigation, and hampering criminal enterprise without bloating the Civil justice system, or abandoning the structures of the Criminal side with its higher standards and burdens. 

You don't get Justice from punishing property, and by definition the govt using the civil courts/system is not seeking justice. And in large part I think it is time the USSC revisited United States v. Bajakajian, to clarify that while reasonable fines are allowed and a strong part of the system of punishment, the seizure of assets without intent to charge, or the retention of any after dropping of charges is a no go, or even the disproportionate seizure of assets is a no go. 

Though we do not see unanimous endorsement of the practice, multiple courts (including the Circuit Court in Bajakaian) and states (such as New Mexico) are  acting to restrain the retention of property back to that which can be proved to be criminal, and the seizing of which is accompanied by criminal charges. I also would like to say a heartfelt thanks for engaging in this with reason, thought, and evidence on the whole.

Reddit would be all the better if we could do stuff like this more often. Not at all, this is an issue that is understandably deeply held, personal, and honestly held across the spectrum.

The news today about the shooting is painting an interesting and really no more clear picture. 

Man and wife, Muslim, and seems to have been set off by a workplace incident and came back, but had obviously been stockpiling after the police raid on the home. 

Likely would not have been tipped off even by a type of system I was describing, looks to have kept out of trouble overseas, and just talking to people tangentially connected to ongoing investigations is no standard at all. 

Really just shows that monitoring is no way to prevent terror or to combat it. Its a hard fact that in the end you cant monitor your way to a safe society. A civil society doesn't work without freedom to travel and associate and simple association with a person can't be enough for condemnation. 

Which means we have to strive to find a balance and if we want as citizens to live in a society defined by liberty it requires working for it. 

Citizen vigilance and community, armed or not can do more to aid law enforcement more than any number of phone taps. The militia of old wasn't just a substitute for an expensive army, but a way for the community to know all were doing ok, to share knowledge, and achieve the common good. 

Now monitoring of communication has its important place but we cant apply it as a salve. Nor can we ignore the requirement to respect the Judiciary and not see the courts lose their ability to protect liberty and the Constitution. Same with the idea of No Fly Lists, use them willy nilly and they become useless and a hindrance, but build a structure that involves the Judiciary and allows for challenges or a burden of proof and they can become both a way for restricting travel of person's identified as under investigation and as a sign that they might want to be examined more closely or possibly denied for firearms purchases. 
The problem then becomes much of that is just going to fund the day to day functioning of the college. 

So what do we cut first with less money to work with. 

The answer in part is for state schools to get their funding returned by the states, which have made huge cuts the past 20 years. it got so bad in Louisiana that LSU had to prepare a Bankruptcy filing, and the University of Virginia gets less than 20% of the cost to educate a student covered by the state. I dont.

There is no need. Daisy mentions that his willingness to get too attached is part of what pushes him to kill.

Well Ward has finally wised up and seen that placing his faith in structures has gotten him hurt over and over again. Working with COulson would require him to do it again, I dont think he is willing to do that. 

He is a man with a talent for violence and who see's himself as having been wronged by figures in authority on both sides. He might fight against IT, but it wont be redemption, it will be a continuation of Ward using his skills for himself to spite others. &gt;could grow and be accepted by southeast Asia or the Latin American world. 

The USSR was comfortable putting nuclear missiles in Cuba, how much more "present and accepted" do you want?

And while others have rightly pointed out the Containment Doctrine (underpinned by the Dominoe Theory).

In the Americas there was still the Monroe Doctrine to consider. Dating from the early 1800's, being the idea that we as the US would be the guardians against non American states founding new imperial and satellite holdings in the America's. 

It has been part of the theoretical underpinnings of a lot of US policy int he hemisphere including the War with Spain, and the occasional intervention( if we do it itll be a lot better than you old colonial masters). And that means the US takes it very seriously when a foreign nation looks to grow influence in the America's.

Doubly so when it is one whose ideology calls for continuous violent revolution, and whose rhetoric is diametrically opposed and threateningly bluntly aimed at the US. They also are heads of countries which ave CENTURIES of antagonism. They were Cold War enemies, on opposite sides of WW1 and fought, the Crimean War was France/Britain helping the Ottomans vs Russia, the Ottomans repeatedly invaded Southern Europe which was split between Austrian and Russian influence.

These countries havent been friendly in centuries which makes any ability to de-escalate all the more unlikely. The idea is that, even if some malfunction (very unlikely), miss (very unlikely), are destroyed before launch (possible), are intercepted (hard but projects have spent decades getting better at it, but really hard still), there will be enough to get through and turn all the targets to ash.

So even if everything goes perfect for the enemy first strike with no warning somehow, it wont be enough to prevent successful retaliation. That is Mutually Assured Destruction or MAD and a big factor in why the Cold War never went Hot, it was unwinnable. And most importantly satellites today give instant notice of launches anywhere on earth essentially, there is no more launching in secret. And return launches take just a few minutes if absolutely necessary, while other options like subs are very very hard to find. 

And why you keep nukes spread out and have multiple methods of delivery. Even today missiles sit in silos in bases in Wyoming, North Dakota and Montana, while traditional bombs or modified cruise missiles can be present on any Air Base or naval vessel. 

But most secure of all are the Boomer ballistic missile submarines, with dozens of warheads. Their patrols consist basically of months of sailing around in a designated box of ocean somewhere out of the way and secret, waiting for the order to end the world. The idea that the Executive was somehow aiming to get the fleet bombed at Pearl Harbor is pretty much disregarded by serious academia. What we can say is that FDR, and an entire generation of naval officers and politicians saw Japan as the primary threat to US dominance in the Pacific, and had resolved to provide them as little aid as possible while being as ready as possible when the war did come.

&gt; Purple codes and knew that Japan was planning an attack just not many specifics.

The problem is that PURPLE was a diplomatic code, not military, and it included instructions to continue negotiations, and only on the morning of the attack ordered the breaking of diplomatic relations, which due to slow typing was not delivered by the embassy until after the attack and was not decrypted by US staff early enough to be useful. Secretary of State Hull aloes took a  dime view of SIGINT, feeling that gentlemen didn't read each others' mail. 

While we had not broken the military codes we could study the volume and knew the call signs of several units. But in the beginning of December the traffic just stopped, the fleet was radio silent for the cruise to Pearl through the North Pacific. However simple silence doesn't really give you much, and the USN was already on the highest state of alert possible, the carriers in fact which were all at sea on the 7th had orders to fire on IJN ship, plane, or sub that approached. 

 Also often sighted as provocative is the movement of the Pacific Fleet's main base from San Diego to Pearl. Though this was not a sudden or out of the blue move. There was always at least some elements of the fleet based at Pearl, and during summer maneuvers the entire fleet spent weeks there. And the base by 1941 had essentially first rate facilities, including a large drydock capable of holding any of the battleships or carriers in the fleet, and all the other facilities to run the fleet. 

it also most importantly was HALF way across the Pacific. It allowed the conservation of fuel, and ability to better operate forward. In War Plan Orange's numerous versions Pearl always became the first of many great staging bases for the fleet, the move was just making it happen from the start. 

Not quite sure what he is referring too on the Admiral thing but there might be a few. The Co of the fleet during the move, Admiral Richardson wasn't big on it, in large part due to the fact that many f the facilities were still under construction. But his successor, Admiral Kimmel was more accepting of it, and in large part felt that any vulnerability to the fleet in port could be answered by keeping the fleet active and at sea, the 7th was the first time in weeks that so much of the fleet was in port together. Kimmel even in his war instructions did not specify where he would be in the event of war, simply that he would be with the fleet at sea, which is something Nimitz never actually did. 

Nimitz also had been offered the command before Kimmel but had turned it down. With war on the horizon he felt rightly that when it did come, an attack on US far east holdings, the ships at sea, or however it started, everyone in command at the time would be made a scapegoat, and he did not relish that. He instead became the HR Chief for the Navy and was then ordered out to take command after the attack.

&gt; He also showed us a confidential list that had all the ways to draw out a Japanese attack and get into war.

The McCollum memo is most likely what eh refers to here. It was written in 1940 by the chief of Naval intelligence's Far East division, LTCDR McCollum. However there is no concrete evidence it was seen by FDR, and while supported by some members of the Navy, it was opposed by others.

&gt;A. Make an arrangement with Britain for the use of British bases in the Pacific, particularly Singapore

&gt;B. Make an arrangement with the Netherlands for the use of base facilities and acquisition of supplies in the Dutch East Indies

&gt;C. Give all possible aid to the Chinese government of Chiang-Kai-Shek

&gt;D. Send a division of long range heavy cruisers to the Orient, Philippines, or Singapore

&gt;E. Send two divisions of submarines to the Orient

&gt;F. Keep the main strength of the U.S. fleet now in the Pacific[,] in the vicinity of the Hawaiian Islands

&gt;G. Insist that the Dutch refuse to grant Japanese demands for undue economic concessions, particularly oil

&gt;H. Completely embargo all U.S. trade with Japan, in collaboration with a similar embargo imposed by the British Empire

And while some came to pass many others did not. For instance the US aid to China pre war was never more than a trickle, and even once war began realities kept it from being a flood.

The basing of USN units in the Far East was also heavily opposed, Planners saw them as being thrown away, what ships were sent East to reassure the Army in the Philippines were amongst the oldest WW1 vintage cruisers, destroyers and subs, with war plans specifically saying the fleet would not come to the islands' relief quickly. 

So we also finally must consider that while many in the US Government felt war was coming and relatively soon, and that many had chosen a hard line with Japan, there was no direct knowledge of a scheme, or attempt to provoke one. 247 is good.

But if you want tech specific there are in general 2 options.

The Key Play is 100% free, pretty good, and has some excellent analysis of all sports, focused on football, and growing recruiting coverage, pretty similar community to /r/CFB http://www.thekeyplay.com/

Your other option is TechSideline (http://virginiatech.sportswar.com/). While about 1/3 free 2/3 pay what is free is always very good. They have also been around a LOT longer. I like the long view perspective they take on a lot of topics compared to the more youthful aspect at TKP. But both have great coverage.

Andy Bitter then for the Roanoke Times is the only beat writer you need to be following: http://www.roanoke.com/sports/columns_and_blogs/blogs/andy_bitter_virginia_tech_football/&gt; The 2nd Amendment's purpose, initially, was for states to be able to keep an armed and regulated militia that would be able to rise up against an oppressive government.

Others have touched on the modern legal interpretation, but you even got the original one wrong.

It was NOT to allow armed insurrection. It was to allow states to PREVENT one. At the time there was great distrust of and many founders were opposed to allowing a standing army. This can be seen elsewhere in the Constitution where Congress can only pass funding bills for 2 years in length for the Army. 

So there was a line of thought that a strong Militia would provide for national defense, and that they would be less likely to be a problem (the Continental Army twice almost marched on Congress when they weren't being paid or supplied). 

We saw the original intent in practice very early one with the Whiskey Rebellion. A large group had fermented trouble in Western Pa. So the militia were called out and along with a handful of federal troops were marched out to the area and the rebellion fell apart. &gt; regulated militias to possess predator drones, spy planes, and armored vehicles.

Except each state's national guard units do just that, and there is a clear line of succession from original sate militias dating back even before the civil war to the modern guard formations, many even retaining their numbers and unit histories. 
I would actually really like to read about that if you have any websites which talk about it!

Some quick wiki about the TN National Guard also provides some neat specifics about the unit lineages for the state.

In particular is the 278th Armored Cavalry Regiment. Which is a direct evolution of the original 3rd TN Infantry, which was itself an amalgamation post war from state militia units which had fought for both North and South, who were themselves left overs from the Mexican War when the whole "Volunteers" nickname was formed. Not just that but the Coastal's HC's are:

Richt

Cutcliffe

Fedora

Narduzzi

Fuente

Johnson

and who know who UVA hires, but that is a large talent upgrade in the space of about 3 years. Rumors are he is being pressured to transfer closer to home since he had a daughter born a few months back, but nothing official though perhaps Fuente could draw him to stay.

The other consideration is that his HS coach was a quality control guy under Beamer this year and no word about his future either.

I love his potential and while minimal he did see some action this year vs Furman and Purdue. Jaccory Harris... That's a name I haven't heard in a long time, a very long time. Ill just say a HS coach could be a diamond in the rough too, see Malzahn. Nice, one of the stories that I found quite a chuckle was that because so many volunteers to fight in Mexico but only so many units funded and authorized they actually had to draw names out of a hat to see who could go. Should also note that it was certainly not an idea Marshall pulled out of his ass as it were. The idea that the USSC and Judges in general had the ability to set aside laws in violation of the Constitution was brought up even during the Convention.

Madison, Mason and Hamilton all supported and wrote on the idea. 

Hamilton in Federalist 78 writes:

&gt;The courts were designed to be an intermediate body between the people and the legislature, in order, among other things, to keep the latter within the limits assigned to their authority. The interpretation of the laws is the proper and peculiar province of the courts. A constitution is, in fact, and must be regarded by the judges, as a fundamental law. It therefore belongs to them to ascertain its meaning, as well as the meaning of any particular act proceeding from the legislative body. If there should happen to be an irreconcilable variance between the two, that which has the superior obligation and validity ought, of course, to be preferred; or, in other words, the Constitution ought to be preferred to the statute, the intention of the people to the intention of their agents. 
Nor does this conclusion by any means suppose a superiority of the judicial to the legislative power. It only supposes that the power of the people is superior to both; and that where the will of the legislature, declared in its statutes, stands in opposition to that of the people, declared in the Constitution, the judges ought to be governed by the latter rather than the former.


So this was a power that the majority of the Framers wanted the courts to have, and designed the system to allow it. Which means I REALLY want the prequel which saw him as the bright young SAS Lieutenant who becomes the cynical jaded distrustful guy we first meet. 

The USAF General reads through his service record, he was no slouch and a team leader, then something obviously happened.

Who knows what exactly happened, but willing to bet one spy agency or another was involved and it probably contributed to the toxicity with Bobbi.

We also see that he REALLY doesn't have qualms with violence, who knows maybe he tried to show restraint in the moment and guys died because of it, so now he plays it fast and loose. Then I will thank you for clarifying the point and filling out what the delegates mindset was. Hey she was trying to help out, sometimes you need a nice sandwich during the day to fill up. Since he couldn't win with OUTSTANDING talent, why would he be able to with less talent on the team? I think itll be more competitive for sure, which is a GOOD thing.

But there is literally no team or game we wont be in so long as Bud Foster is our DC. Multiple times we won the game thanks to Defense alone. Legit hire, look forward to him reviving UVA to at least consistently going to bowls, need that for the ACC and the rivalry. I hope he does ok at least but he is going to have plenty of new challenges being at UVA too.Its not like UVA doesn't like to trout their standards either. And that whole smart school thing.And in the end I dont think all that unique, plenty of schools do have those special standings for their HC's. The Service Academies obviously expect their coaches to be that next level of example, and work pretty closely with the military side of the schools when it comes to scheduling and such. There is actually a case currently Latif V. Holder woking its way around the Courts. 

But the Courts have taken the view that DHS has violated Due Process by:

1. Trying to force all cases related to Watch list challenges through the DC District Court.

and 2. By not informing people if they are on said list when a challenge is made. 

https://www.lawfareblog.com/guest-post-jeff-kahn-latif-v-holder-striking-down-no-fly-listI mean there is going to be a database somewhere of people that the Intelligence community has come across or is looking at, otherwise it would literally just be thousands of sticky notes on some desk somewhere. There is actually a case currently Latif V. Holder working its way around the Courts. Most recently the Appeals Court issued its decision that the local District Court can be a venue for a man to challenge the placement of himself on the list in early November. 

But the Courts have taken the view that DHS has violated Due Process by:

    Trying to force all cases related to Watch list challenges through the DC District Court.

and 2. By not informing people if they are on said list when a challenge is made.

Worth watching and looking to see its impact ripple out. 

https://www.lawfareblog.com/guest-post-jeff-kahn-latif-v-holder-striking-down-no-fly-list
Lets also say that standards varied WILDLY between the powers as to what proof was needed to count a kill. 

In general the Allies were more strict, requiring you to watch the plane crash/explode/bail out, or a witness in the air or on the ground for it.

The Axis in general took a more liberal view on what counted and was ok proof. The Germans in particular did not split kills, so while 2 USN pilots might each receive .5 kills, the senior German Pilot would receive it all. 

Then there is the fact that memory in combat can just be plain deceptive. For instance at Midway Jimmy Thatch and his 2 wing men were jumped by multiple Zero's, but through his new defensive tactic (Thatch Weave) all3 survived, while the Japanese pilots submitted claims of 5 Wildcats shot down. More than had even actually been involved!That is where we disagree, there is no Right to fly, nor is there a Right to get a passport. Except we see the same thing with the IJN. 

And while they too did not rotate pilots, that is not as large an issue when the majority of their kills came in about 18 months from 1940-1942. 

For instance the Tainan Air Group flying from Rabaul against the Navy/Marine Corps air base on Guadalcanal from August to November of 1942 regularly reported 3 to 4 times the number of kills they actually received. (7 August 43 kills claimed vs 10 actual loses for instance)

And while their adversaries fluffed their numbers up to a degree it was not orders of magnitudes!

So I agree you have a point with it being a universal problem, but pilots didnt need to be flying for the entire war to have massively fluffed up kill counts, and in this campaign the IJN in general outnumbered American aircraft. 

So I think the larger conclusion possible to draw is that it was probable for a force on the offensive to be the worse offender for kill inflation. They get settled and watch the games together.

Could be they assign different members to look at different teams more closely so they can report to the group. Or to clarify what they are all looking for with the borderline teams. I mean you really do.

You can get Partial Kills, Confirmed Kills, Probable Kills that are Unconfirmed.Why should a Passport be automatically granted?

It is the US Government affirming that you are who you say and can travel to other countries, whom we have agreements with to check who is coming and going. 

So I would say the Government has an obligation not just to our allies to honor out agreements, but to other Americans traveling abroad and those at home to prevent the travel of those who have been found to be objectionable. 

To not deny a passport application under any circumstances would be foolish and dangerous in the extreme. 

And yes the states and the federal government cannot prevent the travel of a person not charged with a crime, from goign between any of the states. 

But there is no protection in the Constitution for ALL forms of travel, there is nothing saying that the fastest form of travel has to always be available. Take a train, bus, car, boat, bike, or just walk all are still open. Not at all, we restrict the travel of persons who have been CHARGED with a crime but are still innocent until proven guilty, but have their freedom of movement restricted.

So no not just felons, or are you ok with people being granted a passport and fleeing a trial? 
http://dictionary.reference.com/browse/point

Of the 91 different meanings/uses listed for the word Point(s), just 1 is for the score of a game, so no the word is more expansive than your ridiculously narrow construction of it. Except as Ive pointed out current Jurisprudence is that the TSA HAS violated Due Process as is, and has allowed the challenging of a person being placed on the list in their own District Courts instead of the DC one, and has to provide a definite answer on if they are on the list. The two taken together would be sufficient to honor Due Process according to the most recent ruling in November of Latif V. Holder. 

So by doing both those things the Courts have laid out that Due Process can be followed, not that a Judge has to ok every name on the list after reviewing evidence.

There are plenty of similar situations where a person might have their Driver's license taken away, or firearms confiscated and then have to go before a judge to get them back and it follows Due Process.

So no I reject your assertion that the only way to follow Due Process is the action of a Judge, when we have numerous examples of authority of agents of the state to deprive temporarily at least a person of other rights on their own initiative and nobody is up in arms over them, they are instead positive influences. 12 states for instance allow an officer on the scene to remove any firearms from a home or person if he even suspects Domestic Violence without having to charge anyone. Just off the top of my head some of the things that I think could have appealed to him:

1. VERY low initial expectations, just get to a bowl.

2. Obvious financial commitment (UVA/VT's HC's just hired are still the highest paid state employees)

3. Fertile recruiting grounds (757/DMV)

4. Specific school culture that can be sold, very much like the recruiting pitch it mightve took at BYU.At the end of the 2012 VT-UVA game, tied all at 14, with UVA at 4-7 and VT at 5-6, needing the win to go bowling Mike London saved not just one but 2! timeouts to try and ice a kicker who finished with an +80% made number for the year. For me it is relatively straight forward. 

We can all agree everyone has a right to defend themselves and their home. And that we have police to help punish those that attempt to mess with other people and their property.

But the police cant be everywhere at once, they wont be at my home in an instant. Having a firearm provides me the ability to God Forbid it is ever needed but provide the most credible and capable ability to defend me and mine until help can arrive. 

I dont choose to carry in public because I agree there are many more opportunities for misuse or accidents when more people are involved or you are out and about, and there are additional avenues for deescalation or to remove yourself from danger. But for a last line of home protection I am glad I have it.

Plus its a grand time once a month or so to go with some friends to the range and make a day of it, get lunch, talk sports, target practice.Nope living humans are still plenty capable of being giant assholes as is. The US and many other nations have decided that for now an all volunteer force is what they want.

That means in large part that it is just a career path people can choose, but because of pop media many have a very scewed and unrealistic idea o what it is like. So to spread word about the variety of career paths and commitment levels you advertise. Because the more missiles you are slinging the more people maintaining them the more cooks and support staff for the bases they are at the more people analysing damage done and on and on are needed.

And if a real major war starts again air power has NEVER taken ground or won a war by itself. You either need allies to hold ground or do it yourself. Wait they are?

I can get for losing to us, but just scheduling us? We are the winningest school all time in the ACC. That is basically the definition of quality OOC scheduling. Zero point zero.It all began back just after the Civil War, Rugby had just come over to the states, and sort of caught on at the elite Easter schools (most of which would form the Ivy League).

However nobody could really agree on the rules, so interschool play wasnt really a thing. But in 1869 Princeton and Rutgers's clubs agreed to play each other on a mutually agreed set of rules and they had a blast so they decided to do so again a few weeks later. 

Now travel costs money, and the clubs realized people liked watching the games so they started having stands set up and admission charged. Then the schools saw that promoting it was a great way to get alumni energized and excited about their schools and willing to donate. Then the media saw that covering all this was a great way to sell more ads and to more people. 

Then schools all over the country read about and saw what the teams were doing for their schools out east and wanted in the game, so the midwest schools started playing each other (formed the Big 10), the south started playing each other, Texas all played each other, and the West coast schools got in too. 

And all of this before 1905 and the formation of the NCAA and legalization of the forward pass! So in a large sense college football in all its meaningful forms was in place even before 1900. 

GREAT book on it is The Opening Kickoff by Dave Resvine who works for the Big 10 Network.Should note though that college football was BIG business even before the first pro teams formed, even in the 1890's you had crowds of 40k watching Harvard-Yale or Wisconsin-Chicago. 

We would in all reality be having the same discussions about collegiate athletics even without the NFL. Very True. It was big business even before the NCAA in 1905 and it has been a continuous escalation since then.

Though if anything the NCAA has had a cooling effect when possible, for instance they limited the numbers of scholarships and assistants each school could have.

And until a court case actually limited the number of games shown per week, it was after that in the 80's that the tv deals injected insane amounts of money into their conference deals. Well since CA: CW is focused on the Accords restricting the Avengers' operations, it is safe to say they werent going to let the carrier escape back into the shadows either. I highly doubt it is actually unarmed, while it probably doesnt have the large battery the Insight class had, it probably has a few CIWS mounts and point defense missiles like the SeaRAM, or VLS stocks for self defense, especially since it lacks escorts, but probably limited internal power projection besides her air wing. And we helped! Negative ghostrider

http://media.comicbook.com/uploads1/2014/11/avengers-weta-vfx-09-agents-of-shield-what-happened-to-the-origi-112216.jpg

https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/736x/a1/a3/9e/a1a39ed42551c931cbf5adb9c39438cb.jpg

https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/736x/00/14/4c/00144c1d81ff09e2ba6a47684a626b27.jpg

In all 3 photos I would draw your attention to the large rectangular structure on the starboard side of the upper flight deck aft of the island. I would suggest they are a VLS system, likely containing some evolution of the USN's current Standard Missile Family. 

http://rightwing.sakura.ne.jp/equipment/jmsdf/weapons/vls-mk41/vls-mk41_15.jpg

http://www.helis.com/database/pics/sis/412_52.jpg

We also see it never engaged in any sort of traditional combat when in a position to even engage. It was limping and purposely held far away from NYC since the plan as was called was for a large nuke to go off soon, and in Sokovia it was running a skeleton crew, we have no real idea how thoroughly her covert refit actually got done and how re-militaried she was, as was she barely had any crew aboard and essentially operated an aiwing of less than a dozen craft. &gt; The helicarrier was directly attacked when fully manned

When are you referring too? 

&gt; The evidence suggests shield does not use its helicarriers as anything but command centers. 

Dont mean to dispute that at all, it 100% is the case, but just as with modern Supercarriers they retain limited point defense weaponry. To say nothing of the fact that SHIELD obviously agrees with the concept as the ILIAD is just an exact copy of a Nimitz class CVN and probably Reagen sub class, with CIWS and unknown SAM mounts visible: http://vignette3.wikia.nocookie.net/marvelcinematicuniverse/images/9/99/Iliad_s2e17.png/revision/latest?cb=20150422070149

http://vignette1.wikia.nocookie.net/marvelcinematicuniverse/images/e/e8/Iliad_under_attack.jpg/revision/latest?cb=20150505142608My beer is cold, my wings are hot, lets watch Clemson get the ACC a playoff spot!Already better than the SECCG&gt;  It was attacked by hawkeye and loki's forces while fully manned.

Flying a SHIELD quinjet, posing as a supply run, cleared for final approach...Because their radar still worked. 

Also modern air defense weapons dont "change" appearance when ready. A CIWS only aims when given a target. 

Missiles like the SeaRAM: http://www.seaforces.org/wpnsys/SURFACE/Mk-15-close-in-weapon-system-Dateien/image015.jpg

Dont change what they look like, they look like a grey box until the missiles start coming out when a target is locked. 

Those VLS launchers I linked earlier stay shut until the missile in them is actually in the process of launching. 

So it is 100% possible they were ready to start shooting anything down that came close, but that doesnt mean that externally anything would have looked different. Just a reminder, the owner of the Panthers I think, and Beamer are both being honored for their contributions for the ACC at halftime! Right, thats what it feels like. I dont like UNC, but damn I would suit up and play for Fedora between that and his class for Beamer's last home game. Seeing how UNC is going holding them to 10 through 3 quarters and then to OT is probably one of the best performances Bud Foster has drawn up in years. Because if you want to play ta that school and for that coach it is something you will do. Besides adjusting to academics, getting in shape more, it can also allow you to recover from injury without losing a year of eligibility.

But in the end you also lose a year of eligibility by transferring after you step on campus and any coach worth his salt during the recruiting process will be able to sell a kid on either sitting behind established starters, or accepting that he will sit if he cant beat out the current starters. welp already a better game than that barn burner in the B1GCGIm imagining him like Bric from Anchorman. Shoulda been the Cheerwine tuition toss. You are right, UNC's defense made the 2nd quarter quite interesting and Clemson is shutting UNC down currently.If Bojangles is the Official chicken and biscuits of the ACC we need an official soda to match. gloriousLast year or the year before a guy on an AFROTC scholarship in the VTCC at Tech won it, used it to basically finance his medical school instead of having to apply for another scholarship from the AF before doing his obligated service. University of the People (who just like to pretend they tried in school)Why, only one of our schools's have been in trouble with the NCAA since the USSR collapsed.Yes while similar Alias gives a still markedly different feel for Jessica, in particular she is much more actively connected to the superhero community at large and an even more antagonistic relationship with the NYPD. I mean she still got 20k for throwing footballs. To hell with that damn buckeye, wouldnt want him touching my award longer than necessary either. 

And can you name a single championship winning coach that doesnt know how good he is and acts like it? And the fact that the skins have their HQ/Facility in Virginia.I think states like Alabama, Virginia, Washington and South Carolina would have the facilities.One is war fighting one is law enforcement/life saving.

While they DO have a long history of fighting in our wars the Coast Guard was formed in the early 1900's from 2 very different organizations, the Revenue Cutter Service and the United States Life-Saving Service.

The Revenue Cutter Service was formed in 1790 even before the actual Navy in order to enforce customs and duties at US ports for ships entering and leaving, they were essentially half law enforcement half tax men, with just enough arms to force ships to stop.

The Life-Saving Service was formed in 1848 to man shore posts along the coast to aid people in the event of shipwrecks. 

They were combined in 1915 to form the USCG, taking the law enforcement mission from the Cutters (which was soon put to work fighting Rum Runners during Prohibition and drug traffic today), and the life saving aspect all the time.

But the USN meanwhile was formed specifically to protect American trade abroad and to support American sovereignty and interests wherever the President and Congress fell it necessary an to do so through power projection. 

While willing to aid in humanitarian/international law enforcement missions their primary mission is use of force on and from the ocean, to sink other ships and destroy things in essence in order that US ships and US things are free to carry on. 

The two missions require pretty different training, base positions, operational goals, and organizational culture.

For instance you dont need cruise missiles on the ship to rescue a sinking fishing boat, but you dont need to know about fishing quotas to clear sea mines from a shipping lane. The status of the Navy as law enforcement is actually quite a tangled history, and they were excluded from the act on purpose, for the same reason the USN was formed before the modern actual US Army.

Its hard for a Navy to stage a coup, and they can be helpful to prevent things like smuggling farther out than the Revenue Cutters operated.

Even today they work with allied and domestic groups like the CG and DEA and the Mexicans in anti drug trafficking missions: http://archive.defensenews.com/VideoNetwork/1701219762001/U-S-Navy-Ships-Assist-in-Drug-BustWell depending on how old you are the election of JFK as the first Catholic President was absolutely a topic during the elections and Nixon's supporters tried to play on the old prejudices so much so that he even had to come out and say that he wouldnt be secretly taking orders from Rome. 

The implication being of course that a Catholic President would have the Pope's interests ahead of the nation's.Well you would then have to describe what an ordinary "Muslim" believes, are we talking a follower of Sunni Islam in the West? In the ME? But then does just saying Muslim ignore the slightly different definition for the millions of Shia.

So saying they are "Muslim" is tough because its almost impossible to define "ordinary Muslim" as a person following Islam, which ISIL absolutely is, just their own crazy version of it.

Just as the definition of Christian cant really exclude the Westboro Baptists, they are both using the same source as the mainstream, just drawing different conclusions and focusing on select parts. Should also note that many DID call him on his BS.

For instance when he went after some Army Officers the attorney defending them at the hearing had a junior partner, Fred Fisher, who had been in a rather leftist group during college, so when Welch the attorney told McCarthy to either produce his said list of traitors to law enforcement or shut up McCarthy brought up Fisher. 

Welch let him have it and it ended up with the gallery breaking into applause: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=K1eA5bUzVjA

And Edward R. Murrow, whom had gained fame reporting on the Blitz from on the ground in London was engaged in a very public spat with the Senator, closing  his first show specifically dedicated tot he topic with this monologue seen by a huge number of Americans at the time: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=anNEJJYLU8MFuck you Michigan, Fuck you Sugar Bowl, Fuck you whatever the definition of a catch actually is. A few reasons, one it completely get the shipping routes of the Med clear for Allied ships, the Italian Navy and Air Force had been thorns along with German units were a real threat. 

Then there is the fact that by invading your forced the equivalent of essentially 3 German Armies to be tied down to the area along with 2 Panzer Corps, removing them from the board elsewhere.

You also had the ability to establish air bases that could reach eastern Germany and the industrial hearts of the Balkans, the famous Tuskegee Airmen for instance flew escort missions eventually out of Italy for the bombers.

And finally the morale boost from victories, while the timing later ruined it, Rome is one of the most known cities in the world and he capture was no small propaganda victory, o say nothing of the Italian governments breakdown and joining of the allies. Not me, the illegal procedure would have been a rekick, the targeting would have ruined their field position. 

There was a whole lot that UNC did wrong on that play. Were you watching it live Kirk literally says THEY WERENT OFFSIDES, though that hand looks pretty much offsidesSame result though. Both paths would have had the same outcome. COrrect me if im wrong but wouldnt it have been an even worse outcome if Illegal Procedure is called, I thought it was then like when you touch an onside kick too soon the receiving team just gets the ball at the spot? I mean it looks like he turns his head to lead with the shoulder but especially in photo 3 it looks like the helmets still make contact so not sure how hard he really Trued to avoid it.FWIW it hasnt always been this bad and the NCAA has done plenty of good in the past.

For instance they actually in some ways are the reason the spending race among colleges hasnt gone completely insane.

It used to be there were NO scholarship limits and wealthy schools could stockpile as many players as they wanted to keep them from going elsewhere, and there also used to be no limit on the number of coaches a school could have on staff per team.

Both were NCAA reforms that allowed smaller schools to be able to keep up. Clemson because it will mean that 2 ACC schools will have won national titles since the last SEC school did. However it also stands parallel to the Insurrection Act most recently modified in 2008:

&gt; Section 333 of title 10, United States Code, is amended to read as follows: \u2018\u2018\u00a7 333. Interference with State and Federal law \u2018\u2018The President, by using the militia or the armed forces, or both, or by any other means, shall take such measures as he considers necessary to suppress, in a State, any insurrection, domestic violence, unlawful combination, or conspiracy, if it\u2014 \u2018\u2018(1) so hinders the execution of the laws of that State, and of the United States within the State, that any part or class of its people is deprived of a right, privilege, immunity, or protection named in the Constitution and secured by law, and the constituted authorities of that State are unable, fail, or refuse to protect that right, privilege, or immunity, or to give that protection; or \u2018\u2018(2) opposes or obstructs the execution of the laws of the United States or impedes the course of justice under those laws. In any situation covered by clause (1), the State shall be considered to have denied the equal protection of the laws secured by the Constitution.\u2019\u2019The Insurrection Act of 1807 provides that if a situation gets SO out of hand that police giving it their full effort arent enough the President can step in, calling for either the Militia (National guard today), or armed forces when the ability of the states to enforce the laws of the United States are not sufficient. 

In particular this is one of the relevant sections still in force today:

&gt; \u00a7 332. Use of militia and armed forces to enforce Federal authority

&gt;Whenever the President considers that unlawful obstructions, combinations, or assemblages, or rebellion against the authority of the United States, make it impracticable to enforce the laws of the United States in any State or Territory by the ordinary course of judicial proceedings, he may call into Federal service such of the militia of any State, and use such of the armed forces, as he considers necessary to enforce those laws or to suppress the rebellion.

While the Posse Comitatus Act limits what you can do to use military forces as a day to day police force it is not designed to mean there is an upper limit to the force the US government can use to restore order when it breaks down. 

In fact this was done notable during the Rodney King Riots in LA. When National Guardsmen, Regular Army, and Marine units were all eventually used. At the end of the day if we wanted a better Bowl we shouldnt have lost to Duke in 4OT or put up less than 100 yards of offense vs Pitt.6-6 teams dont go to nice games. FWIW the 93 game wasnt a sellout either with about 33k of a 40k stadium at the time. 

Its 50k now and I would expect probably about 50%ish turnout for the game at best. 30k would be incredible. Why do you think it would have been a sellout, we cant even sell out Lane more than once a year now.

BOA stadium sits 75k, last year the Military Bowl was barely a sellout and Navy only sits 34k. Because the stadium is half the size of BOA where they play the Belk bowl. Yep I am in agreement, this is probably the best matchup we could get for one last win.

Mil was gonna sellout no matter what since Navy is in this year. 

I think Belk wouldnt have sold out but between us and an SEC team could have topped 50k.

Either way they will be handing out cheap tickets to locals so Im sure the crowd will look ok, what matters more is that one last win. Hopping they do nothing but a week of honoring his legacy since im sure they were looking for the whole full circle aspect to play up in promoting the game. Itll sellout regardless of the other team, lets be honets, Navy is the reason they will have another sellout this year, between their run, it being home for them, and Keenan's last game. Except the part where would would have been smoked by any of the opponents, we could very easily have been 10 point underdogs, that very much was on the decision makers' minds im sure. Really of the options its our best chance for the win and to keep the winning streak alive. Curious, what were they hoping for?

If anything playing GT will be a benefit now vs Navy, and Annapolis was a lot of fun last year for the VT fans. SHould be a good game too, Narduzzi is no slouch and already beat GT so he has weathered the option once. Good, this is literally the only matchup on the entire ACC bowl roster I think we could win. Good, wont be many there in person but it is literally the only bowl for the ACC where I think we could win. In years past i might agree but this year the only game where really played above ourselves was UNC. The entirety of the ACC and ECU are all pretty average this year and we all ended up within 1-2 games of each other in wins. They did finish with the better record and beat us on the proximity factor. 

And before you want to talk about only 3 P5 wins, they also beat all their G5 opponents which we failed to do. Hell I wish there are 70 Bowls so everyone was playing another game.

There is nothing wrong with more football in this dead time fo year to take up a Wednesday night the week before Christmas and let the players enjoy themselves.

I dont see how letting UCF and Kansas go at it detracts from the prestige of going to say the Orange Bowl. Corrected! nice spot. At the time and recently after he was actually very unpopular and was considered remarkably ineffective. Most particularly the end of his presidency was marked by an economic downturn and the Iran hostage crisis.

However he worked hard as a consensus and peace maker, notably the Camp David Accords in office and SALT II, and after office worked with many international NGO's and at home with groups like Habitat for Humanity earning him more good will and good press than he ever got in office. NCST also beat all their G5 opponents while we didnt. Yep it is actually funny to see that the ACC ended up with more bowl eligible teams than the SEC again this year. Except 2 of those G5 teams finished with the same record as ECU and the other, ODU one less win.

They were all 4 comparable teams. And NCST lit all 3 up while we floundered. Nope that would be FCS-P5 comparison, but South Alabama, ODU, and ECU are all 5-7 G5 teams, so do you really want to try to say they are that far apart?

Middling American or C-USA is no different enough than middling Sun Belt. There will likely be some form of a team walk!

Every Bowl/Neutral site ive been to had some form of team fest/pep rally a few hours before. The bands played they had some sponsor giveaways and such, and the focal point was the teams walking through so check with the bowl and twitter as it gets closer.

Honestly the playing of Enter Sandman is probably 50/50, Ive been to games where they played it (military bowl and 2011 Sugar Bowl) and  others where they havent so who knows. Appreciate it! Since it is so damn far from out heartland just not sure how many will be going, every fan helps!Sugar Bowl team controversy? Is it 2011 all over again? ECU's wins were: VT, Towson, Tulsa (ironically), SMU, and UCF. Combined wins- 21

ODU's: EMU, Norfolk St, Charlotte, UTSA, UTEP. Combined wins- 15.

South Alabama's: Gardner-Web, SDSU (had 10 wins this year), Troy, Idaho, ULL. Combined Wins- 26. 

So yes I would love your reasoning that ECU is much better than the others, they arent, all 4 are mediocre and we couldnt get the job done while NCST did. 

 Very much how I felt going to the UNC game for his last home game.

Could very well be the first time in history a coach is carried of the field in 3 straight games!Should also note that for a long time VT barely could call itself a top 50 team, last year was the first time in 5 years we had even won an ACC Tournament game. 

Finally seeing signs of life to return to at least being competitive in the ACC. Cool, piss off, you claim to support a pretty good school, thought they would have told you about using evidence to support your positions.
CenturyLink is kind of weird in that it was specifically designed not to be big but to resonate and contain as much sound as possible. 

Also on a larger note stadiums for US rules Gridiron football tend to be MUCH larger than European peers. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_stadiums_by_capacity

Of the 10 largest, 1 is that cray North Korean one, another is Melbourne Cricket Ground, the other 8 are all US Collegiate stadiums, Nou doesnt even crack the top 10, coming in at 11. Agree with the first part, but am willing to revisit the issue as the Jurisprudence changes. Specifically I would watch Latif v. Holder as the courts are finally coming to the side that the TSA has to tell you if you are on the list and you can challenge it in any federal court to force the evidence to be presented. 

&gt; having a trial.

However there is also precedent for Rights being restricted on "expert" opinion without a Judge being involved, specifically both the mentally ill, a doctor's actions can prevent you owning a gun without a judge ever being involved. Or a simple police officer, many states allow officers to take any guns in a house if they even suspect domestic violence to have occurred without needing to arrest or charge anyone. Specifically the most recent case, Latif v Holder is of the opinion that not telling a person if they are on the list is a no go if they ask, and any federal court can hear a challenge to being placed on it.

Im willing to give it a year, see where the jurisprudence is at, and revisit the issue. 

There are plenty of other situations that you can have an "expert" keep you from getting a weapon without a judge being involved at all. Plenty of states let just a single doctor's opinion as to mental health do it. Not a ton of Due Process there. FWIW I would wait a year and see where the jurisprudence is at. https://www.lawfareblog.com/guest-post-jeff-kahn-latif-v-holder-striking-down-no-fly-list

The Courts have begun to take a dim view of the list as is, specifically that you have to give a straight answer as to being on the lost or not, and any District Court can hear a challenge not just DC's. Latif v Holder with the Circuit Court's decison in early Nov is the most recent.

If the Courts can hammer out a way that a person can know if they are on it, and can then force it to be reviewed and either affirmed or denied by a judge then I see no reason not to treat it like a person who might have gone to a mental health facility for an addiction problem having to go before a judge before they can own a firearm. Personally I am for it. We as a society have trusted both Doctors and Judges with roles of great import for the general good. Why not allow them both to check each other.

A Judge ought to be able to deny the ability until a Doctor says you are of sound mind. And a Doctor ought to be able to say when you are well if you are committed by a Judge to an evaluation. http://www.ncsl.org/research/civil-and-criminal-justice/possession-of-a-firearm-by-the-mentally-ill.aspx

It looks like it varys state by state. 

Indiana for instance just prevents it when:

&gt;Is mentally incompetent.

Illinois though says you cant own one when:


&gt; He has been a patient in a mental hospital within the past 5 years and has any firearms or firearm ammunition in his possession; or
  
&gt; He is mentally retarded and has any firearms or firearm ammunition in his possession.

And Maryland:

&gt; suffers from a mental disorder as defined in \u00a7 10-101(f)(2) of the Health - General Article and has a history of violent behavior against the person or another, unless the person has a physician's certificate that the person is capable of possessing a regulated firearm without undue danger to the person or to another; 
    
&gt;has been confined for more than 30 consecutive days to a facility as defined in \u00a7 10-101 of the Health - General Article, unless the person has a physician's certificate that the person is capable of possessing a regulated firearm without undue danger to the person or to another.

And I suspect that while the jurisprudence on the No Fly list is changing he selected it because it is the slightly more selective list. There is a shared national database that the TSC maintains, with DHS, Intel, FBI, NSA, etc imputing people they come across. While that is used in part by the TSA to make the No Fly List.
When owning a firearm &gt; than personal health is the decision, how much is any treatment really going to help?And some sort of Hobbesian State of Nature would be better? And what does that even mean, or is the implication that none of our millions of veterans have been able to successfully move on with their lives?Sure why not im for it, Doctors are charged with doing no harm, hard to fulfill that if they believe that a person with a firearm is a danger to himself and others.

Certainly might have helped at Virginia Tech. You know what I appreciate the effort you put into this, kudos to you. 

I think you make a solid point with the Sagarin rankings which I place a lot of faith in. If it reduced the number of suicides by personal firearms thatd be a good first step. https://www.lawfareblog.com/guest-post-jeff-kahn-latif-v-holder-striking-down-no-fly-list

And the Courts are agreeing with you with regards to the list, no doubts about it. I say we check back in a year and see what the jurisprudence has become. the guy was ruled a danger to himself and others. But because of a technicality in Virginia law because he was treated as an outpatient he wasnt reported to the State Police, and him then excluding on the background questionnaire when he purchased the various firearms.

Based on the wording of the NY Act in the article seems like it would have applied here.  John Quincy Adams served as a Senator, Secretary of State, and Ambassador to multiple European States prior to being President.

Afterwards he then was elected to the House of Representatives where he served 17 years until his death, becoming one of the leading anti slavery voices whilst there. I mean the list doesnt stop them from hopping in a hot air balloon, a hang glider, their own air plane...I hate to be the one to break it to you but man has found a way to cross large bodies of water. Craig Kyle and Chris Yost's run on New X-Men, took what had been a boring high school drama as New Mutants and suddenly we had the makings of a great next generation of mutants.

Particularly seeing things like the Purifier Attack, and ONE occupation and all from the students' perspective. The Mercury Falling and Quest for Magik arcs (with Skottie Young) were probably the peak for me. We didnt need no stinking airplanes to discover the world and colonize said lands!unfortunately not, they remain the token mutants on the Avengers roster. 

With Sunspot's character once again reduced to one note, and Sam MIA now in ANAD, and it seems despite him owning AIM and setting up his own team Roberto didnt feel the need to call up any of his old team.

Im sure Magma, Karma, or Dani had no interest in what he was up to. End rant. Based on the state a single doctor's diagnosis is enough to then require you to go before a judge and more doctors.

Maryland prohibits it in instances:

&gt; suffers from a mental disorder as defined in \u00a7 10-101(f)(2) of the Health - General Article and has a history of violent behavior against the person or another, unless the person has a physician's certificate that the person is capable of possessing a regulated firearm without undue danger to the person or to another;

&gt; has been confined for more than 30 consecutive days to a facility as defined in \u00a7 10-101 of the Health - General Article, unless the person has a physician's certificate that the person is capable of possessing a regulated firearm without undue danger to the person or to another.


While Hawaii has this to say:

&gt; Is or has been diagnosed as having a significant behavioral, emotional, or mental disorders as defined by the most current diagnostic manual of the American Psychiatric Association or for treatment for organic brain syndromes

And Georgia: 

&gt; Who has been hospitalized as an inpatient in any mental hospital or alcohol or drug treatment center within five years of the date of his or her application.

All of those are straight forward and no judge needs to agree before hand, just a medical expert saying the person has X wrong with them. http://www.ncsl.org/research/civil-and-criminal-justice/possession-of-a-firearm-by-the-mentally-ill.aspx

Meanwhile about a dozen states allow law enforcement to remove the firearms from a home or location if they even suspect Domestic Violence, without having to arrest or charge anyone.Very True and I am optimistic, the one note was also mostly a dig at them pre SW.

My god the time travel plot with Hill was the worst. They were the fucking frat bros of the Avengers. The Back to the Future joke was ridiculous, especially when they kept repeating it. Sure they are light hearted and good on the banter, but when the job is at hand especially Sam has a history of focusing at the task at hand. You dont train under Cable and be the strike force leader for Cyclops and still be the first guy cracking jokes. And as of now you are free to challenge your being placed on the no fly list, both first by simply asking the TSA, and then if needs be by bringing it to court. The ACLU has actually been leading the charge on this one with Latif v Holder, the most recent ruling from the Circuit Court being that a challenge in local District Courts as opposed to being routed through DC are ok and can go forward.

&gt; What are the requirements to be put on a no-fly list?

Amorphous and unclear, not dissimilar than a medical diagnosis when it comes to mental capacity. And yet all we have at the end of the day is the Doctor's word.

Both also are in the same position in that they have both sworn to protect people, do the best job they can, not hurt people when they can, etc. Exactly, we have a trained person working with evidence provided, with input from other experts in the field, same as with the TSC/TSA. 

Even the ACLU isnt really challenging the process to put someone on the list, just everything after with knowing if you are on it/what courts can hear a challenge. Even they acknowledge that the power to affirmatively say that this group of people, with some input from secret sources, we arent comfortable being on airplanes is a valid power of government. Ive come to accept it, and am kind of glad we arent gonne be run train on by an SEC team.

In the end too being 7-5 wouldve let us in and made me feel a bit more optimistic.

And you do that BY PUTTING UP MORE THAN 100 YARDS OF TOTAL OFFENSE VS PITT COACH!Absolutely depends on the state. 

Hawaii for instance will deny on the grounds of "Is or has been diagnosed as having a significant behavioral, emotional, or mental disorders as defined by the most current diagnostic manual of the American Psychiatric Association or for treatment for organic brain syndromes"

And to get the ok you then have to present a judge with a sworn statement from a doctor saying you are ok. The ACLU is coordinating the primary challenge is Latif v Holder, which as of November the Circuit Court out in the Midwest said the local District can serve as a venue but the TSA themselves had to be made party to the case, which is where we stand now. https://www.lawfareblog.com/guest-post-jeff-kahn-latif-v-holder-striking-down-no-fly-list

&gt; It's not a professional putting their certification and license on the line.

And sitting there in an exam room or a meeting room how do you know the person diagnosing you is who they say they are and has any credentialing at all, unless you ask for ID and credentials every time you get a checkup?Nope I think you hit the important points.

I was mostly using it to show that there are situations where we trust "expert" opinions on if a person should be allowed to get a gun, without giving that person a say first or putting the burden on them to prove they are ok. No, Frank not looking at the clock at the end of regulation vs Duke is screwing the team over.

Starting Motley vs Miami is screwing us over.

Not starting Marshawn against Pitt is screwing us over. 

Blowing a 21 point 1st quarter lead at ECU is screwing us over. 

We have been screwed over plenty this season, this wasnt one of those times. Give me Carlisle Indian School or give me something else you find interesting. Because saying or give me death would have been super over dramatic.k, bye felicia Very True, but you dont have to have been committed to lose the right is many states. Simply being diagnosed, or even an inpatient. Again, some states, such as Maryland and Georgia by this listing dont require you to have been committed, simply diagnosed. http://www.ncsl.org/research/civil-and-criminal-justice/possession-of-a-firearm-by-the-mentally-ill.aspxmighty bigoted perspective if that's your first conclusion. Except we have already drawn a line on the issue. For instance we can all pretty much agree a person has no need to own a MANPADS launcher, or an anti armor launcher of some variety. 

At this point we are just quibbling over where the line is not if one exists. So what is the framing then?

If I live near an airport and think some airplane could get hijacked should I buy a Stinger? &gt; presidential way to do the address

Supposedly the idea was to convey that the US Government is not taking the threat sitting down.

But lets also be honest there have been plenty of important Presidential addresses delivered while standing and plenty while sitting. Hell since its December 7th FDR got his gimpy legs and braces on to stand at the lectern before Congress. 

No obviously as you point out many of the Oval Office addresses have come seated, but it is not hard and fast as a rule, nor is that the only setting for important speeches possible in the room and White House. Because maintaining American principles of rule of law, the Constitution, and a free civil society are more important than defeating ISIL quickly.

ISIL does not represent an existential threat to the US, but by they can win by fear if the US decides civil liberties aren't as important as hunting them. So we are going with the "the 2nd Amendment was to allow civil insurrection" talking point now? No I am actually in agreement with you on this fact:

&gt; The 2nd Amendment is about the preservation of a free state.

But it was not about "keeping the arms in the hands of the people". It was about avoiding funding an army big enough to stage a coup.

Consider the facts as they were after the revolution. 

1. the Continental Army had twice threatened Congress over lack of pay and support.

2. Many Jeffersonian Democrats especially held onto a view of the Militia as saviors of the country despite their absolutely terrible performance during the war.

3. We see plenty of other factors throughout the document about the distrust many at the Convention had about a standing army. Most notably that funding could only come in 2 year increments. 

So in the end we have an Amendment to strengthen the Militia not to fight the Army for the people, but to save money and make the army smaller to make those distrusting them feel better. 

That is a VERY important distinction. The Founders did not ensure public ownership of weapons to allow them to be adversarial with the government, but to aid it in time of need. This is also born out by history as it occurred. When the Whiskey Rebellion popped up a few years later the Militia did not side with the angry mobs over an unpopular tax, they aided and marched under federal leadership to put down the insurrection. 

So yes the 2nd Amendment helped stabilize the early Republic, but not by being some credible threat against the government, but by siding with it against chaos. Or you know, to ensure there was a Militia to help the government not to fight it, since the Founders didn't like the idea of a big army after the issues in the Revolution.Because when you don't pay them or feed them as Congress did they get pissed.&gt; right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed.

Because it is needed to have a well regulated militia.

Especially when you don't have a large army, and aren't going to be paying people to keep and buy their own arms. 

It was economics not some sense of Republican idealism that got us the 2nd Amendment. 

&gt; The militia is the people. 

Not really sure what point you are trying to make here. Since by definition the militia would be those people who actually show up, and that each locality organized together as a group. Certainly not all the people today, and most assuredly not 200 years ago. I disagree.

It was economics, which stem from the weakness of the government as you accurately point out, but not some radical ideology which would allow for armed rebellion any time a large group of people disagreed. 

So if you are a country which wants to maintain sovereignty, like the US certainly was, and have some Indians on the frontier which could be an issue too. 

But taxation and revenue are problematic, and you almost had a riot the last time you tried, you also aren't gonna have the money to pay people to keep arms for the militia. So you mask it by saying, we wont do anything to take the guns away because we don't want to pay you to have them, but because we also don't want to pay an army we need you guys to step up when shit gets bad.

It leaves the door open yes for Civil Insurrection, but only the same way that trial by jury allows for Noneification. its a side effect that rarely is useful and couldn't be fixed without breaking the whole system. You are right I was speaking strictly to the Organized militia, which is for all intents just the National Guard today and several states do maintain their own "militias" and unorganized organizing bodies. But since the Selective Service act is still on the books all men would be in the pool for service in defense of the country regardless of owning a firearm.  Yes and since Heller still stands it is the law, however if we want to get extremely technical the first part breaks down. 

For instance the land and naval forces are granted the right to be equipped with any weapon seen fit. Yet we see very clearly since we are in the comments section for the article that the Court has rejected a case to potentially grant that same right to the individual.
Id rather music than having to listen to Mark May more.Because Mark May &gt; music.

Would also be interested in seeing the breakdown of how much is music and is not currently in public domain. As that obviously would greatly effect the amount of money needed on average. &gt; My guess?

So you have no supporting evidence is what yourre saying?True enough.

Though I wonder how much they are actually talking about here. I am sure since it is marching band after all and not many are playing the latest songs that many would probably be in the public domain. I could, but that doesn't address the larger question of would it be better to have more than one option than just listening to talking heads during every game's halftime. Many do, and that is perfectly alright too, and many don't since they do so many damn cutaways during the game too when they could show some of the live atmosphere at the game. Military Bowl and Quicklane Bowl once again winning it this year. Is that bad?

http://www.dci.org/ViewArticle.dbml?DB_OEM_ID=33500&amp;ATCLID=210283444

Which set a new high water mark in 2015 for DCI shows, showing positive growth in both small events and large. 

Hell just getting 44k to show up for their championship shows that while not the majority it is an economically and statistically significant minority. I don't think the majority do care beyond a "that's nice" level. 

But based on DCI posting a new record for attendance across their season this summer, and a 12% increase on number of bodies at their championship I think it shows that there is an economically and statistically significant body out there that is interested beyond that. 

Would it be enough for ESPN to start getting with schools to see how much the music rights are? Not sure, but probably enough to at least explore it for larger games. Sort of. But it is a long summer of events, where the focus is absolutely on the music on the field, so it shows that there is active interest for field shows. 

And since the allowed age is from I think 16-22 it coincides very much with the same people in college bands, so there is major overlap. Personally im not a big fan of it myself, partially because they don't allow bands to use woodwind instruments (saxophones, flutes, clarinets) or until last year trombones, meaning the sound style of the bands are very specific. 

But it is a good barometer for the size of interest beyond just the high school level.You can use a Corvette just fine without fucking up somebody elses day who may or may not deserve it and infringing on their right to not have their day fucked with. 

Shooting of a Stinger is absolutely going to do just that. Well glad I could share a bit then. And yet we have gotten away from my example and my larger point that we already have drawn a line that there is no desire in civil society or pressing need for things like any air and anti armor missiles in private ownership.

We have drawn a line already and simply quibble over where it is. Personally I think the line isn't too bad where it is, in the majority of states everyone can play with the toys they want. Some states like NY and NJ I think go too far, but that is the nice thing about being able to live where you want. 

As opposed to some camps who want to overturn the ruling saying private individuals cant own a cannon for instance.  

And congratulations you have managed to learn to use both your firearm and your car like any reasonable person should. Of particular note was that the Pennsylvania was the flagship of Admiral Kimmel, and as opposed to how Nimitz fought the war Kimmel fully intended to be at sea with the fleet should war come. You sure I would be more concerned with \#FSUTWITTERIm curious now as to your reasoning for the 1% number.

If we look to the Revolution, with all the same split loyalties and factious population we might see today it took an active participation rate estimated between 6-7% to actually win the war, higher than any recent American conflict. Along with a massively more powerful and experienced foreign ally of course. 

so to split the difference at 6.5% of the population that means that 200k out of the 3mil served in either the Militia, Navy/Privateers, or the Continentals during the war, and with the exponentially more complex nature of conflict today it would assuredly require a similar or likely larger percentage today. 

And the only end game would be an outright victory for one side, we saw it in the Revolution and again in 1861, only military victory allowed civil strife to end. 

So if anything it would take unprecedented levels of active participation again today. 

Source for numbers: http://foxtrotalpha.jalopnik.com/the-revolutionary-war-by-the-numbers-1600199390

So I would suggest that saying just 1% standing enough would be enough to force a political victory is no more likely than those who thought the South firing on Fort Sumter would be sufficient to force Lincoln to the table. Yep, I would be fine if all lines went back to T1. Give me predreadnoughts dammit! As a fun experiment check out my post history real quick. Im not actually sure which got me more down votes, talking marching band here or the historiography of the 2nd Amendment on /r/news.And I you, you are my most recognizable Yellow Jacket and are always capable of making reasoned arguments.

I wouldn't mind a Stinger either, I live under the approach and departure lanes for Dulles Airport, but that is sort of a one time use thing. After I found out Engineering wasn't my fit I picked up National Security Studies with a history Minor. 

It hasn't helped me in work but it makes my Reddit game A+.While I don't necessarily agree with his points I agree with him in spirit.

For instance Midway would be a much more appropriate battle to commemorate for the USN in game. 

You don't generally celebrate defeats. Sure a Dev Article talking about the Arizona or something would have been neat, but to put ships on sale for it would certainly have left a bad taste in my mouth. Others have covered it, they specifically allow Bowls to offer the same gifts to all participants up to a total of I want to say $650. 

Thus since it has its own provision it isnt a violation. Same thing happens I want to say for all the basketball teams that go to early season tournaments that are sponsored in NYC or Hawaii or such. The major presence for the protection of the West Coast WAS the Pacific Fleet at Pearl Harbor. The fleet had moved almost 2 years previously to Pearl full time. Previously the battle force (battleships and escorts) had spent much of the year in California with San Diego as the main base, while the scouting force (carriers, most cruisers, escorts) split time between Cali and Pearl with the entire fleet meeting at Pearl in the summer to exercise. 

Thus the majority of the strength to defend the Eastern Pacific was indeed at Pearl Harbor on December 7th. With some major exceptions.

The Battleship Colorado was in Brementon undergoing a refit, and the Carrier Saratoga was in San Diego to pick up her air group after just leaving refit. Saratoga gathered her squadrons and a few escorts and departed rapidly to Pearl where she, her sister Lexington, and the Enterprise would attempt an eventually aborted mission to lift the siege of Wake island int he second half of December 1941.

Meanwhile the Enterprise and her task force of cruisers and destroyers was returning from delivering additional aircraft to Wake Island and Lexington was doing the same from Midway. 

This list which despite being wiki is useful and accurate to all my knowledge shows the order of battle of the fleet at Pearl Harbor, which is USN planning was the primary defense of the West Coast and thus valuable to consider. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Order_of_battle_of_the_Attack_on_Pearl_HarborYep thats why they have let Heller stand for most of a decade now. 

The Roberts Court has already done its 2nd Amendment Case and we are unlikely to see it considered again without a truly unprecedented question in the case, a stark split in the lower courts, or a new Chief Justice. The Court DID hear a case on the issue and made their position clear with Heller less than a decade ago. 

Since we have not seen a sharp divide in the lower courts in their decisions under Heller, and Roberts is still Chief Justice, unless a case presents a truly unique new question we are unlikely to see it taken up again so soon. To say nothing of the fact that it has been less than a decade since the Roberts Court DID hear a 2nd Amendment Case in Heller and this case is really just a reaction to that, while the Circuits have all essentially toed Heller's line.

It would be very surprising to see the Court reconsider ANY topic so close together when the argument can be made that we have not even seen the full effects yet to truly judge the impact. And this is why we dont let the public decide what is and is not Constitutional. In 2008 the Court said in Heller that while too broad of a definition in banning weapons was a no go (like all those that are bottom loading), more specific bans are permissible. 

Most notably Justice Scalia for the Majority: "It may be objected that if weapons that are most useful in military service \u2013 M-16 rifles and the like \u2013 may be banned, then the Second Amendment right is completely detached from the prefatory clause. But as we have said, the conception of the militia at the time of the Second Amendment\u2019s ratification was the body of all citizens capable of military service, who would bring the sorts of lawful weapons that they possessed at home to militia duty."

SO they still leave States and Localities the chance to construct specific bans and to be tested as to their constitutionality by the lower courts according to the standard they set in Heller. For a group so concerned with the protection of their liberty they certainly arent very big on liberty to debate. Which is sad since the Founders and Framers of the Constitution felt Freedom of Speech was important enough to make the First Amendment. You are very welcome, the decision isnt that long and is actually pretty readable. I would recommend giving it a read through. http://www.scotusblog.com/wp-content/uploads/2008/06/07-290.pdf

Specifically they Held:

&gt; 2. Like most rights, the Second Amendment right is not unlimited. It is not a right to keep and carry any weapon whatsoever in any manner whatsoever and for whatever purpose:  For example, concealed weapons prohibitions have been upheld under the Amendment or state analogues. The Court\u2019s opinion should not be taken to cast doubt on longstanding prohibitions on the possession of firearms by felons and the mentally ill, or laws forbidding the carrying of firearms in sensitive places such as schools and government buildings, or laws imposing conditions and qualifications on the commercial sale of arms. Miller\u2019s holding that the sorts of weapons protected are those \u201cin common use at the time\u201d finds support in the historical tradition of prohibiting the carrying of dangerous and unusual weapons. The Roberts Court has done so both with Heller and again under McDonald. The Kido Butai simply didnt have the ability to loiter at all after the attack. One of the major reasons a 3rd Wave was never seriously considered was that the fuel burned in sailing around and relaunching then waiting for the planes would have meant likely abandoning many of their escort destroyers when they ran out of fuel before reaching the rendezvous with their oilers. Lets be honest it will be and should be Al-Baghdadi.&gt; 2. The students take away the spots of more deserving students.

Can you cite any studies or sources saying that is actually taking place though?Im more or less with you, Hell I wish we would enforce the laws we do have.

CSPAN cited a stat last week where of all the people who lied or omitted pertinent information (like warrants, convictions, mental health) on background check questionnaires for either a license or purchase depending on the state, less than 1 in 100 were prosecuted or faced legal penalty. 

That is an absolutely crazy statistic. Sure not everyone in the group did so willfully, and not everyone who left stuff off got caught.

But punishing a few more of that number would go a long way toward reinforcing that everyone is best served by background checks and they help. I think based on your response we are actually on the same side ass this.

Latif v Holder is designed essentially to allow the Courts to begin imposing their authority over the TSA again. To form that venue for having a person's complaint addressed and let a judge rule on both parties evidence, with the TSA having to answer with a yes or no when asked if a person is on the list. But not remove TSA's affirmative authority to say "since we cant know when and where this person is going to fly next, until more information is obtained we dont want them flying".

So it would allow the government to actively protect infrastructure and public travel, but allow that venue for redress. Just as with a a Doctor's opinion (depending on the state Maryland and Georgia for instance allow someone who has never been committed but simply diagnosed to be bared from buying a weapon). Nice article thanks.

Hell even make it a fine and not a felony (though I think it probably should rate a felony in many instances).

If my old alma mater could track me down 3 years later for an unpaid bill from the on campus pharmacy for some medicine I think the Federal government could at least start making it more painful for people to willfully try to deceive their way to owning a firearm. Not the votes at all. It is more the festering Us Vs. Them ideology that is taking root, admittedly on both sides, but more virulently I posit on the Right (it is easier to get more up in arms when you feel you might personally be harmed).

That, just like the general political toxicity that inability to have the open and intellectually honest debate from ALL comers and the willingness to examine all options is what lead to the genius instilled in our Constitution, that the smartest men from around the nation locked themselves up until they had something. 

I just dont know if, faced with the same pressure, we today could meet it the same way, and that is to our loss. Oh trust me I am quite aware of the issues when it comes to mass shootings, my alma mater is Virginia Tech, and due to a technicality (where the shooter was diagnosed as dangerous but by being treated as an outpatient vs in patient didnt have to be disclosed let alone prosecuted for not sharing). &gt; I don't know if there are any? 

Well one would obviously to posses a form of identification. But mostly that is why I personally intend to watch Latif very closely. It is likely we will get pages and pages about the current decision making process. As it has been described now it is the TSA making the final call, with the TSC/FBI putting together packets about people from the general terror suspect database they feel ought to be on the no fly list with the TSA making the call. But we should at least know what are the general level of evidence that is being sought, I wholeheartedly agree. Very possible, and I would also mention how close they were to bagging Enterprise, and with the potential to kill Halsey with her. 

She was just a days steaming out of Pearl on the 7th. In fact her fighter squadron actually made it back to Pearl around sunset. It ended in tragedy though when nervous gunners ignored warnings and opened fire on the Wildcats, killing 2 of the pilots. She resupplied all through the night of the 7th and her task force was back at sea by dawn the 8th scouting the area North of the islands to make sure the Japanese had actually left. 

But every man ship and plane dedicated to taking and holding Midway, which would likely have resisted as tenaciously as Wake did was one not available for the push South. Frankly for Japan's war effort the Dutch East Indies were more important to keep the machine feed. Actually the did, the Enterprise spent most of December dodging I-Boats along with the other carriers. Repeatedly she was attacked and missed and her planes strafed surfaced subs. And while no lasting damage was done it would presage much of the fall of 1942 when US ships and carriers would fall repeatedly to I-Boats in the waters around Guadalcanal. 

And yes you are thinking of French Frigate Shoals and Operation K which the IJN used to try to get recon photos of the damage done and disrupt salvage at Pearl, but in Spring 1942 a permanent USN presence was placed there.

&gt; I have wondered if they Japs had of taken a disguised cargo ship and loaded it with soldiers and attacked Midway on the 7th if it would of worked.

Unlikely the USMC garrisons were at the very least heightened alert, Midway was also not on any common shipping lanes, and thus any traffic was easily spotted and even more curious. Then the biggest question is once the troops are there, what next? You need additional ships to feed the men, more to bring in replacement men, and even more to protect said ships. 

And finally not as a rebuke but as a heads up use of the word "Jap" is very much not in vogue in academic and historical circles, it still carries all the negative and uncalled for connotations of a racial slur. Wait, there are actually people who would say JMU has it better?

But if you want an honest to God hard ranking you could use the Sagarin Rankings, used in part to rank all both FBS and FCS and see who would be favored over who. http://www.usatoday.com/sports/ncaaf/sagarin/

As of this week VT is at #46, JMU at #114If letting them win every time we played meant we could then win 11 straight and go to the Orange Bowl as ACC champs I wish we would schedule them every year!If only we had some sort of ranking that included both FBS and FCS teams in it!

Oh wait the Sagarin rankings include exactly that: http://www.usatoday.com/sports/ncaaf/sagarin/

VT: 46

JMU: 114And if only a result for 5 years ago still mattered, nobody is still on the rosters from that game. Besides we all saw how JMU handled the national spotlight this year. True enough, True enough.

I guess its just that I look around and see fewer and fewer people in the middle. 

I am a gun owner, and enjoy the one weekend or so a month I get to go shooting, and pray I never have cause to use it to defend me or mine, but I also look around and see a whole lot of people who I dont think appreciate the responsibility that carrying comes with. Not necessarily current owners, but critics, and a whole lot of people who just want to look cool.

I also take a pretty rare view of the 2nd Amendment that is pretty old and almost Originalist. In that i take the economic view.

That it was a move by the Framers to provide for national defense, because with the untested new government they were unsure of their ability to fund a new army and keep it apolitical (which they couldnt during the revolution). And thus the proto Jeffersonian Democrats won that one and tried to build the militia as the key to defense, and do it on the cheap by not providing for weapons, just continuing the tradition of bringing what you have.

In my eyes it makes much more sense as an assurance that there will be people ready to defend the Republic in time of need than to tear it down. That it would allow me to join a Posse and restore law and order, not inssurect it. And my reading of history, by no means the only one at least confirms it to me. I think you might be right, and Reagan was right about most people being in that reasonable silent majority. 

And 6-1 vs JMU who happens to be 0-0 in BCS/NY6 Bowls. A few reasons:

1. it helps keep production lines open, instead of having the US buy more Abrams tanks, support selling them to the Saudis, or Egypt, that way even if a few years go by without a new domestic order, the factory doesn't shut down.

2. Build inter operability. When everyone has the same equipment or very similar, it makes planning very simple, you know exactly how much fuel you need to cover so many miles for instance. You know what the platform is and isn't capable of, and it means that a joint force can operate together more seamlessly. "Gobblering Intensifies" Its a freakin modified Boeing 737, its primary mission is sub hunting and long range patrol, not exactly the most spy like of missions.

And more low impact than an actual ship in the area sailing around. Though even then there is some interesting legal language to examine.

For instance the Court ONLY ruled on the "Exclusion Order" in Korematsu, essentially the order saying that persons of Japanese descent couldn't be residing in designated military areas, and the tap dance around the actual internment order.

Black for the Majority even says:

&gt;The provisions of other orders requiring persons of Japanese ancestry to report to assembly centers and providing for the detention of such persons in assembly and relocation centers were separate, and their validity is not in issue in this proceeding&gt; I was watching a program on Pearl last night and they spoke of how the US had one decoding machine in the PI and three state side but, didn't have one at Pearl. The War Dept sent what info to Pearl that they deemed they needed.

That is actually unTrue. The Cryptology Office at Pearl was in fact the most active and in the end most successful of the stations. HYPO was run by Commander Rochefort, was the group who came up with the ruse to trick the IJN into identifying Midway as their target. 

There was actually a great deal of tension between HYPO and the HQ in Washington. With it mostly being in interpretation of the fragmentary parts of code that were broken by Spring 1942. King the CNO trusted his guys initially while Nimitz in Hawaii went with Rochefort, convinced king and was proven right. 


&gt; Not for those of us raised by veterans of Okinawa.

And while I have no doubt you have no particular animosity towards random people across an ocean, referring to Japanese as "Japs" or "Nips" or similar is still a holdover from the days of the massive propaganda campaign against Japan which was inherently tied to racist tones. And has no more place in serious academic discourse than "Coon" or 'Nigger". Thanks for stopping by, I recall you making a similar comment about usage of the term sometime in the Spring and it sparked me seeing how often it still gets used and to call attention to it. &gt; I don't give two shits what the other countries in the world thinks.

Can you name a single time that it has worked out well when the US has zigged instead of zagged compared to everyone else?

The nation's greatest triumphs has all been in concert with friends and allies, and that means treating them as partners and at least weighing and listening to their concerns. &gt; Why would I care about what the rest of the world thinks?

Because having allies and partners means you at least listen when they have something to say even if you don't do anything. I don't know too much about Trump's business history beyond the broad strokes, though from what I understand a lot of people in New Jersey are still pretty pissed at him for basically going boom and bust in Atlantic City. 

Is that incorrect, or just sour grapes at this point for him? it seems like how the people who worked under his name feel is a good judge on how inclusive he is on decision making.I certainly do, however the President is called upon to be answerable to both of those groups, he is still the President.

Sure Trump is well within his rights and by some measures ought to say, piss off to people who say he had any sort of obligation to AC long term as a private individual

Ideally a President isn't going to be picking sides or localities or economy sectors to help and others to abandon, just fight corruption and work so that everyone can be productive. I mean not for nothing, but plenty of rockslides have killed lots of people through time. 

The rock is an inanimate object, didn't need any human to do anything, and gravity did the rest. And not all allies are created equal. 

I would say at the very least the UK, Australia, Germany, France, Canada, and South Korea have all earned that right to have bluntly honest conversations about the state and future of our alliances. 

All of those nations have been our partners in at times very unpopular endeavors, and any healthy relationship must be based on open communication.

If we are going to have an opinion on if the UK should remain an EU member than the UK gets to have an opinion on our policies too. To add also, the Japanese also had a long head start on mainland Asia. 

WW2 in the Pacific is traditionally held to begin with the start of the 2nd Sino-Japanese war and the full scale start of military expansion by Japan in 1937, a full 2 years before Germany's invasion of Poland. 

Japan had a thoroughly modern (mostly) military, and notably an organized modern air force, and much better supplied and trained Army, and a Navy which allowed coastal landings at will and open supply lines. Me: Im Ready, Im Ready

SHIELD: No you aint&gt; federal laws trump state laws

You have that right but Federal Agents and Agencies cant generally compel a local official to do their work for them, unless it is under a number of clearly defined situations, such as a state of emergency and similar.

For instance a local sheriff cant be forced to do the leg work for a federally run background check. 

We see in general the same principal is what allows states to have legal (at the state level) pot. The DEA if they want to do anything about it needs to use their manpower to go into dispensaries they cant tell the state troopers to do it. So the actual Supreme Court case covering this is Printz v United States.

Basically until a Federal Database could be set up the Brady Bill required local law enforcement to do the background checks and ok any transfer of ownership of handguns taking place within their jurisdiction. 

The Supreme Court found that to be Unconstitutional on a number of grounds: 

1. That it goes too far to upset the formation of Federalism between state and federal level, that the states do retain sovereignty in several key sectors as protected in the Constitution. This being in line with the ruling in New York v United States where it was found that federal law could not compel states to adopt a state policy in order to rn a federal program.

2. Congress by compelling local police to do the work also ignored the President's authority to be the one in charge of how the laws are faithfully executed. 

3. While Federal decisions could dictate how state law worked it was limited to the state's judiciaries, and that is ok, because there is a clear line of hierarchy from the local traffic judge right to the US Supreme Court. 

The full decision: https://supreme.justia.com/cases/federal/us/521/898/case.htmlDepends on the state and situation. But yes it is covered on a questionnaire form you have to fill out. Then some states require medical professionals to say if you have even been diagnosed, some only if you are committed.

Then the gun dealer runs a search on the FBI's system, however states vary wildly sometimes on how much info they and their agencies are required to give the FBI. Or if they want to set up their own alternative systems. https://www.fbi.gov/about-us/cjis/nics/general-information/participation-mapIf you just need a winter show to kill time I would highly recommend giving Galavant a shot, funny, smart, and great cast.Plus the lead kind of looks like Nick Blood so I like to think he is Hunter's distant ancestor, and it makes a lot of sense!I like to think Hunter is his descendant, it makes things nice. Hunter would be proudPhil Archer taught us that sleeping with a concussion is REALLY bad!Based on the uniform we can assume Will was active military in NASA, possible he was just a history buff.

But yeah knowing the HYDRA name was a red flag. Only halfway done...

We can go deeper.0-2 he isnt doing so hotSchrodinger's WillIT controlling a slowly rotting corpse, hence the smell earlierno Will's corpse is possessed, hence the smell Fit mentionedThe explains the smell since presumably Will's corpse is slowly rotting I guess?

IT as will knew about Fitz so we dont know how much it gets from taking a host.So Ward is basically now just a Goa'uld?

I can dig!Gotta be honest I hope Ward/IT stay out of sight for a bit, just to really fuck with Coulson when he finds out the truth.Goa'uld, its basically just a Goa'uld. Just straight copy paste from Stargate, but fuck it that was a good show!And whatever medical attention HYDRA can give it, I assume that crushed chest/sternum Ward got might want to be fixed. Screw that we going straight Goa'uld! Hope Multiple Lady is having fun there too!We know it has Ward's memories, like it had Will's, so who knows at this point.

Could also depend on the personality of the host, Will was certainly not on board wit IT's goals, but Ward certainly is. Might be sort of a partnership. Fuck Animorphs we doing a straight copy paste of Stargate!

Remember Ros wanted Phil to go to Cheyenne Mountain for the meeting! Clearly it was with Stargtae Command.Probably had a Stargate stashed somewhere, since clearly we are just adopting Goa'uld into the MCU. Was also able to contextualize and remember nuanced memories of Will, so safe to say IT's actions are probably heavily colored by the host. Its a Goa'uld, obviously it used a Stargate.Or, OR, we get Col. O'Neill as a new buddy for Phil, and we can add Dr. Jackson to the Science team! And another Black Guy!Now having the meeting Ros was taking Phil to at Cheyenne Mountain makes sense! And is now a baller Goa'uld Host!Yeah, I dont think Daisy could have been any more clear, its not on her the others didnt get it!Just as the Goa'uld intended!and Ra from Stargate! Yes clearly it is actually a FARgate, for traveling very far away, and not a copy of some copyrighted item from another franchise. First Down by the Ballston metro is pretty good sports bar, its one of the two main VT spots and will be sure to have the game on this Saturday, plus some better than average drinks and food. We also see it choke out a trained HYDRA Operator, and sneak up and stab another and kill him.

Lets just say the plot point is going to dictate how powerful it is. Sure, and then he was still sufficiently strong enough to not even give the first guy a chance to fight back, now I highly doubt Will had that amount of strength based on the diet on planet and his state when we first met him. IDK, they gave anyone in the VTCC 3 free tickets to the 2011 Sugar Bowl so long as we went to an alumni breakfast in uniform that morning.

Best crappy hotel breakfast buffet I ever had. So looking at the numbers and yeah she is really really big, and I dont think the picture quite do it justice even. 

Consider:

Zumwalt: Displacement- 14500 tons, length 600ft, beam 80 ft, draft 27 ft.

USS South Carolina (the Navy's first dreadnought battleship) 16000 tons, 450 feet, 80 feet, 24 feet.

She is longer and just about as heavy as the ship the Navy built to be nothing but an armored box with equally larger armored turrets on. http://www.navsource.org/archives/01/012603.jpgThey are stealth gun turrets for lack of a better word. 

Eventually once they are finished the rail guns are going there. It isnt a question of "Can" its a question "Why" in the end other countries receive a greater guarantee of national security and economic boon when hosting a base. The reverse isnt True.

Thanks to two giant oceans there isnt a benefit from having say the RAF have a base in Maine, it would not improve the ability of NATO to defend each other, but basing USAF bombers in Britain allows them to be ready to hit likely targets faster. &gt; on their campus (that's right I called it a campus).

Stunning and brave statement right there. Wouldve been nice to leave him on the sidelines for at least the rest of season 3.

Let Mallek got on a mad rampage against SHIELD for messing with him, let the Caterpillar team form.

Then maybe they kill Mallek as he tries to open another portal to try again, as he lays dieing out steps undead Ward, hell maybe even talking to himself as IT, saying he will take it from there, maybe with a cool piece or relic from the dead cities to help him out. Because whatever we get in 3b is going to be dominated by whatever civil war tie in is there. 

And that is good a lot of the themes will resonate on the show.  But that means a very crowded back end. Civil war and IT/Cosmic origins are both enough to float half a season. like this: https://usatthebiglead.files.wordpress.com/2014/11/b3esvencqaafwdn.jpg?w=295&amp;h=231&amp;crop=1I mean I guess he has a point Ive never seen Galactus end up like this: http://goodcomics.comicbookresources.com/wp-content/uploads/2010/06/thanosofftojail.JPGNope post AvX, the Cuckoo's have discovered hair dye and Emma forgot how clothes work, again. IDK in the last run of Secret Avengers Wade meets up with Hawkeye while leading an AIM posse. 

They have a grand old time, 3 legged races, pie eating contests, karaoke, and then blow up an oil platform together. He didnt last week either. 

You mean over 600 Billion. 

Either way it accounts for less than 1/5th of ever tax dollar so like any other federal program reducing it some would help, but there are plenty of other larger shares that could be looked at for bigger returns. http://www.cbpp.org/research/policy-basics-where-do-our-federal-tax-dollars-goOct 25, 2007, Thursday night.

 Then #2 BC led by Matty Ice scored 2 TD's in the last  minutes of regulation to beat #7 VT in Blacksburg 14-10. I suspect that side could be the flags that Groton has built ships for. Since you also have the "Dont Tread on me old style jack" the original Grand Union flag, and a few others. It sure sucked, but getting them back and winning the ACCCG was nice. So one thing that absolutely isnt appreciated for it as much as it should be is how the field itself is different.

The Hash marks(so the farthest towards either side the ball can be snapped) are less than 20 ft apart in the NFL, and 40ft in the NCAA.

That means there is a much larger Field side for pitch and option plays to the outside to develop and for holes or out of position defenders to be exploited. I mean, Georgia Tech DID win the Orange Bowl last year and beat an SEC team in Mississippi State.Well it is also perfectly possible that over the decades and centuries the motion used changed. 

Just like the way the armed forces or uniformed forces salute has changed greatly. As an Eagles fan it makes our loss to them much more palatable. But you figured out Reddit? I can SORT of get Nova, he did get made an Avenger afterall,

But he is fucking Nova, he needs to be out there doing Nova things in the galaxy, maybe he should be with the Guardans instead of the damn Thing. Pakistan is in Asia.You remember Jane, Thor's sometimes Lady friend?

Well she cut out the middleman and now just IS Thor, also it gives her cancer or something. I want to say De Casta cut him and Black Wido a bigger singing bonus. The Avengers: turns out Sunspot could outspend Tony!And are you some sort of Reddit Idiot Savant?You prefer your Tokens Yellow not Tan/medium Brown. Valid desire.The Avengers: No not the cool ones you know from the movies!Too much of an idiot to work the rest of the internet but somehow Reddit clicks.

Like the mentally handicapped who cant dress themselves but can play Beethoven. 

I'd tell you to Google it but we know how well that would go.BULLSHIT.

The SAME OLD ACC story would have been: Oh Look, VT won the ACC again but it doesnt matter cause they only beat 1 or 2 low ranked teams, and have 1 meh ACC loss and one rough OOC loss. I mean when you start 0-4 in conference play you cant expect good things to happen. Yep. His team wasnt big, fast, or strong enough, unfortunately it appears to be genetic. FUCK YOU CHAOS!! YOU STAY AWAY FROM BEAMER FOR AT LEAST 3 MORE MONTHS!Rivalry trophy will be incoming. Do we get included?

I mean we basically got our governor to break up the original Miami, Syracuse, BC deal. I would accept this, especially if we get Major Victory, and the baller as fuck, olor coordinated, space storm troopers version of the GotG, not Bendis's poor interpretation of the movie team. Thats a motherfucker who knocks. In between the wars, and even really once WW1 began the move was to strip up wood decks VERY quickly. 

One less thing to either burn or worse cause splinters, and in peace to maintain.

For the US BB's for instance its why you see it disappear after their first hull upgrades. 

Replaced with an anti rust paint cover, and a surface layer usually in a version the now universal Haze/Battleship Gray. The Soviet and now Russian Navy were less uniform about the top coat, and in many cases simply left the anti rust paint open for multiple reasons including ease of upkeep, which exposed its red color. Not very "Actiony" but if you want just about the most honest movie about the USN in WW2 you sit yourself down and watch the Caine Mutiny. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CaWOi5lfwyII mea, you get anything hot enough and it will burn, and there are plenty of things aboard a ship that can contribute and help, like ammunition, and fuel(especially if there are aviation facilities aboard), being the most common. 

Besides if it wasn't at least of some concern, why don't they get used anymore? Fuck Miami, Fuck them and their shitty fans, fuck them and their coke'd up fans, fuck them and their convict fans, fuck their shitty school that has had perpetual performance anxiety ever since joining the All Canes Conference. 

Frank's 13-9 record vs those fuck bois is one of the best things about his tenure. I mean if you can name me one good thing that school has ever done I would be shocked and amazed. 

In all seriousness it is probabaly the most underrated rivalry in the ACC. 

We do not like each other, all the way back to the pre Big East days. We were also the team to ruin their 2003 season, while they got us in 2005, and in 2001 we were the absolutely closest game they played squeaking out 26-24 when we dropped a 2pt conversion on a late TD. 

There has been some great football over the years and its continued when both schools jumped ship in 2004 together. Exactly it was big until 2005ish, then one or the other school just wasn't great the same time as the other. 

But if you want further proof we have our own rivalry wiki page and are listed on each other's wiki pages as rivals! 

So ya know, the internet says we are. Its a start, I can respect that!

Scar fans, how would you feel about Shane Beamer applying for the HC gig?

Frank is odds on done this year too, and while his coaching RB's has been up and down, his Def and ST credentials dating back to his early days remain unquestioned. Shane has also been linked to interviewing for gigs even before this at Ark State most notably. 

What say you?Well good to hear. He got a VERY raw deal in Blacksburg.  And did his best which was actually good for a few games a year. 

I would love to see him come back to Tech at some point. But really just be successful and appreciated wherever.And none when you lost to VT, so clearly we are the ultimate thing standing between Miami and greatness.

And ya know what is a really sad number...

ACCCG Appearances:

Duke: 1

WAKE FOREST: 1

Miami: 0

ACC Titles Won:

WAKE FOREST: 1

Miami: 0Why?

One school has shown an ability to develop talent, the other has a coaching staff that does nothing but make good local talent regress. With that reasoning, when you toss out the coach who ahs shown now ability to rebound, then yes I can see you reasoning of who has the higher ceiling. So sorry to revive a dead thread but one run I don't see listed here is Yost and Kyle's New X-Men run, it is about 30 issues and is basically the warm up to their X-Force run which you got part of in Messiah War. 

It serves as the main introduction of X-23 into the universe, after the two created her when working on the X-Men Evolution show. 

Also features primarily the remaining students of the Xavier school post M-Day, and their struggle to survive in the wake of attacks from within and without. 

High point is probably the Mercury Arc, and when Skottie Young is brought on for an arc dealing with Hell and Belasco, and then a nice interlude where we see the school actually try to function.  Its being written and produced by the guys who blew up a bus full of children to prove a point (Yost and Kyle) I am fairly certain we will get some meaningful impactful death in it. I suspect the huge advantage the USN gained through better radars is why we wont see night battles for a very long time. I think it would be interesting, and much more national personalities in ships.

The IJN would be much more reliant on searchlights and optical tools, while the USN could track targets on their better radar.

So maybe the IJN can see better when zoomed in, but the USN has better detection range in general or something to give the fleets some personality. 

Night surface actions are also why IJN DD's and CL's have so many torps, rush in and do damage and rush out. Yep, which means it will likely be the same as normal, with just reduced ranges for detection and some upgrades that cost too much and already exist on the ships, maybe replace the scout planes with star shells. There is a famous quote by the German Military thinker Von Clausewitz. 

"War is the continuation of politics by other means"

So war is a tool you can use when you feel strongly enough as a government about an issue. It could be a simple as you feel strongly enough to fight to defend your territory and existence as a nation from others, or that you feel some grievance that was not addressed through civil, non violent coercion, or any other means, must be entrusted to force of arms. A Bachelor degree granting institution will of course have higher costs than one that normally only grants associates degrees. 

You need double the course work essentially, meaning either double the teachers, or pay them to teach double the classes. You will also likely need larger libraries, or teaching facilities to deal with the more advanced topics a bachelors will cover. 

Plus its not like States themselves are helping much. For instance Virginia in 2013 provided only 13%  of UVA's budget. Man its gonna be hard to beat us when we are already playing Miami this week...

Duke is having their bye week then plays @VT on the 24th. 

And if lets say Vt beats Miami that would leave them 4-3 (with a 2-1 ACC record) while Duke would be 5-1 (with a 2-1 ACC record), now both had tough OOC losses, VT to ECU and Duke to NW. 

But VT will also have Brewer back by then, you might remember him from leading the offense to lead over #1 tOSU back on Labor Day. 

Duke's wins also come over a terrible Army team, a middling Tulane, and a bad GT team, and a great defense and terrible offense in BC.

Duke has yet to beat a team with a winning record. I would pump the breaks on how good they really are and if they should be favored, but th VT game will be an excellent litmus test for them,. Really I don't think it would be a bad loss for either team, we don't know a ton about either team, they have each had inconsistent play all year so far. 

But the biggest stat I think is we cant beat Duke till they beat a team with a winning record, if VT beats Miami on Sat it will be their chance. The Sea Lords are the professional heads of the Royal Navy, they will be serving officers. 

The First Lord is a political appointment and will not be a serving officer.

Same way that in the US the CNO- Chief of Naval Operations is the professional head and an admiral, and the Secretary of the Navy is a civilian political appointee. Can you source that? Everything ive read indicated that while they had passable search radar, their FC systems were not able to offer the same data, offering only bearing not necessarily an accurate distance, hence having to rely on visual, and creating problem such as at the Denmark Straight when both ships' range finders were impacted by salt spray. It should be noted that even before, and indeed back to the founding of the NCAA schools often attempted to limit player compensation. 

For instance Harvard held out a football player when it was found he had a deal with a cigarette company and in return for endorsing them he got a cut of all packs sold to fans on gameday. 

Though conversely Wisconsin helped fund their program by having players sell ads for the programs and got a small cut of it. But what about 5 minutes of Hunter beating men to death a la Russel Crowe "Fightin Round the World"?It was just cover so Lincoln could raid your booze cabinet. Or what if one of their cars gets in a fender bender and they team up to just murder the entire family of whoever did it?I mean if she just avoids him and never talks to him again then they cant technically break up right? And Brand DID do some really shitty douche moves especially to the X-Men early on. or just how many of them have actual rabies...I mean sure when used correctly, or with a well drilled crew the heavy units of the USN did just fine at night and were dominant by 1944. 

But it also glosses over how little training many of the crews had together, and how it was in many cases rushed with the massive expansion of the Navy. And that heavy ships were prioritized in getting the better search and FC radars than light units, leaving CL's and DD's shit out of luck until there was an opportunity for them. 

Tassaforanga offers a good example, while the USN task force of  4 CA's 1 CL and 5 DD's was able to become aware of the IJN ships at 23k yards a firing solution was not achieved until 7k. And due to bad luck and poor positioning the USN got the worst of it in the battle and lost a cruiser sunk and 3 more mauled to 1 DD sunk.

Honestly since the game models and makes actual fire control automated for the player the best thing we can do is just give USN ships WHEN the appropriate upgrades for radar and FC are researched, a boost to night detection, or leave it similar to their daytime values, while ships without it, namely low tiers and most IJN ships with much reduced values, but perhaps a way to use spotlights, maybe to see farther only when zoomed in but it gives away that ships position? Fine but that means the IJN team gets a bunch of battleships and low tier CV's and the USN team gets nothing but Cleveland's and Essex's. this is gold Jerry, GOLDIDK Hunter is getting himself into some pretty scary situations...Can I just say I see Hunter as basically the young version of Gotham's version of Alfred. 

Former SAS Operators (or did they make Alfred SBS?) who left under mysterious circumstances, and who took injured and hurting younger men under their wings and tried to help out, at least Hunter tried at times with Fitz, and Bruce. 

Both have had problems maintaining stable domestic lives, and its implied both have had problems with the bottle at times. 

And both are thoroughly wonderful of course. 100 Fitz and Simmons, 100 years, forever and ever Fitz and Simmons.

WWW.FitzandSimmons.com, Fitz and Simmons ever and ever.comThat we know of, but lets face it, that is probably not the worst thing either has done, nor the youngest person either has probably had to use violence on. 

From what I recall its implied that Hunter got out and into business for himself after a few too many problems with his seniors, he was a LT so he likely would have been leading at least a platoon sized team, and he mentions having been to Africa, maybe killing some child soldiers was enough to make him change careers? I hope we do get it, would likely be one of the fast CV's in game, would be neat to have a CV tailored to staying close to the main thrust for quick turnaround, could be a flavor of Soviet CV's however many they actually have.

There are about 5-6 different design studies and partially built or ordered ships they can throw in too, also they got a RN ship on loan, and Italian BB's as spoils of war. Yes and half of them are not even modeled in game so of limited value.

Additionally do we want nations to stick to only indigenous designs or are we going to be ok with lend lease ships, would be helpful in filling out the Russian tree. Ahem this image has some issues. 

First Saint Frank was born in Mount Airy, NC.

Second the image is now an outdated version, please see the new, remarkably terrible Wake Forest Victory celebration image below: http://media.cmgdigital.com/shared/lt/lt_cache/thumbnail/960/img/photos/2015/10/10/8f/a2/bb39f1b0c29b40ef9cb4d26be04fa707-7949d71c7fd142dea86ba141fefa5869-2.jpgGlancing at it looks like all the ones on that list are either for Search, AAA usage,  or Air Warning, and no discussion on performance or comparative usage. 

Navweps has some great articles, but is that really it on Britsh systems?

This one: http://www.navweaps.com/index_tech/tech-052.htm

Seems to take a dim view of British Radar usage and quality, while it was effective for search, it was underused for actual FC, and thus they relied upon the antiquated range finders mounted for each individual turret, which as mentioned were hampered by conditions at Denmark Straight. 

So while yes they did have systems as warning and eventually everyone got on board late and post war for FC purposes the USN remains the only ones to dive in from the get go with automated and radar based fire control. Consider this. 

There was an IS before they took over any oil fields, do you think that there will be an IS if they lost them? The answer is a resounding YES. 

While as part of a coordinated strategy it could cut off an income stream it isn't some sort of death knell.

Extremist movements, besides the belief factor, are easy to keep going because they can be run CHEAPLY, like really cheaply. 

Old artillery shells are easy to get and you can get an old AK for a few dollars, so while more cash helps, a lack of cash is not going to suddenly stop the IS, terror movements can inflict a great deal of suffering with very little overhead. 

Well the Chinese Coast Guard is experiencing a rapid expansion and militarization alongside the PLAN, so we could see something like an expansion of the current water hose games or collisions we see between fishing, enforcement, and CG vessels in the SCS between China, and the Philippines. 

What if a Chinese CG vessel sinks a Filipino fishing boat or a Filipino CG ships gets fired on for trying to enforce their claims?

Now likely this would be stopped before it went further, or heaven forbid a USN ships is fired on, but it would certainly not be a peaceful assertion of China's power. Welp now I feel dumb for forgetting its in there, I hate that damn ship so much, so many poor SCAR's have fallen to it. A fun twist would also to give the US the USS Robin, the codename for HMS Victorious when the US used her for a few months in the South Pacific in the summer of 1943, and actually received modifications to operate Wildcats ( she hadn't had Martlets aboard yet) and Avengers, and worked alongside the Saratoga for a time. I mean there is the one awkward panel in the one SHIELD comic where Bobbi calls him Clint in bed. Seriously, the duo has earned some credit to see what they can do.

They were fine with blowing up a bus full of kids to prove mutants were still hated, your point isn't being upvoted enough. By having to bring in another writer to balance out what Yost wrote Im actually a little bummed. 

Go back and check out some of Yost and his partner Craig Kyle (who is producing the film) and their work on X-Men Evolution, or better X-Force or the X-23 min series. They can do apocalyptic and violently blunt as befits the end of the world. 

I am willing to give them the benefit of the doubt that they can do, at least until Marvel orders yet more rewrites. if you have ever seen a town do beach replenishment after a storm where they bring in sand once it is washed away this is the same principal, they are just starting from scratch. I thought it was good, also marked the point when they finally realized nobody liked the New Mutants squad and the Hellions where the one positive of the run to that point.

My favorite remains the 6 issues when Skottie Young was doing the art when they go to Hell and then all get counseling.  Agreed, though he even did pretty good when he was in full control of the Rocket Raccoon solo too, so he can write too. I don't but I really think I need to start dropping "What were you thinking Shipmate" some more in chat.

Just a nice classy way of asking "what the fucking hell you were thinking you dumb fuck monkey shit?" Nah I mean I don't think there is a single person in today's Navy who DOESNT use "Shipmate" ironically. Don't worry Shipmate will get you through plenty of situations where dumbfuckery is involved.

People think millennia's are the most ironic group around? Negative, it is PO's in the United States Navy when confronted with an idiot Ensign they are forced to attempt to correct respectfully. It began as an attempt to emphasize unity in the fleet by calling everyone shipmates.  Now its just "you jacked up BIG TIME but I cant yell at you right now"Meh, Some Officers are big on it, but its mostly the Petty Officers and Chief's which propagate it. Its a good clear shot across the bow that whoever you are talking too is not in the right, and had best correct themselves, at least thats what it has become, very handy for situations where profanity might not be appropriate, or if say you cant really curse out an Officer as a Chief, even if they are in the wrong, unless the relationship is there, so it works.

There are also plenty of CO's that get hard about taking kids to Mast (basically a ship board disciplinary board where the Capt is Judge, and Jury), lets them turn around to the Squadron and say "look how hard I am being on disicipline" regardless of BS reasoning, or actual problems aboard the ship. Especially amongst the Surface Warfare community there is a terrible culture and low retention leading to many shitty officers getting commands, the Navy has already relieved over 20 members of the command triad (CO, XO, Command Master Chief) aboard different Destroyers and Cruisers this year, for everything from using military email to set up meetings with Thai whores on port calls, to hooking up with a female Department Head and not leaving your cabin for days at a time when she moved in and leaving your Junior Officers and the rest of the Ward Room to run the ship. Its the same difference as a German referring to their nation as Deutschland and us as Germany... I suspect he might be referring to the US.

The FAA just announced that going forward with rules and requirements to be published next month, Drone operators will have to be registered and finish some basic training about their obligations.

Word is from the hearings though that small 10lb or smaller or similar RC planes that we have all had for years will not be required and that the minimum size to register will be bigger and also based on the max ceiling for the UAV. To also add on, Bismarck was not in and of itself all that great of a design. 

Her armor scheme was all wrong for WW2 gunnery, being basically a moderately updated plan for WW1, the Germans having no experience with the interim which the IJN, USN, RN, and RegMar even to a degree had. She was built for the short ranges imposed by the North Sea, which even in WW2 were pushed out much farther, she wasn't up to snuff of her peers for dealing with severe plunging fire. 

Her AAA batteries were also quite lacking even compared to her direct adversaries in the RN, to say nothing of the monstrous batteries the USN was sporting even in the lead up to their entry into the war. 

And at the end of the day she wasn't a very efficient design, for so much tonnage she was not much better than her direct competitors in the KGV's. That there is the key. 

The 35 can match the range and weapons load all internal as most of her competitors because Gen4+ aircraft have to dedicate external pylons to either sensor pods or fuel to match, while the 35 can do so and maintain a clean outline as it were. I mean, the F-15, F-16, F-4, and F/A-18 all were pretty damn successful mult role aircraft. It sort of did, but it was nice to see at the end they did bring it back t one of the major themes of the DnA run, that RR is more loyal to Quill than anyone else on the team, he is on board with the GotG idea and knows Star-Lord is the one guy who can pull it off.What's worse is that there is no discernible EVOLUTION of government. 

Where are the thinkers? Even in the free cities we dont hear about any treatises on government. 

Martin love's talking about the histories Maesters have written, but no actual political philosophers. not even democratization.

But there arent ANY arguments being made, you have variety of governing structures, but nobody in any of the camps is saying why they are the one that is best. Patently False.

For instance. The University of Virginia, Virginia Tech, Virginia State, Virginia Common Wealth are ALL public schools funded in part by the state. /u/cdb03b gets it mostly right.

We rewind to the Civil War. Most states had one or two existing institutions of higher learning, with the oldest like Penn, or Rutgers dating back to colonial days.

However with the coming of the war and the expansion of the nation West a need for educated young men is becoming more accute. 

So President Lincoln signed into law the first Morril Land Grant Act. 

It set aside federal land in the west for each state, the sale of which would be used to set up a school in the state which would teach Agricultural Science, Engineering, Liberal Arts, and Military Tactics. 

EVERY state now has a Land Grant School, many of the Southern ones like Virginia Tech and Texas A&amp;M had to wait until Reconstruction to be founded. And that expansion is where you get the large number of similar names. Follow on Land Grant schools also added the stipulation that if the school was whites only a SEPARATE school had to be funded for Blacks. 

So int he state of Alabama for instance you have the University of Alabama which existed before the war. Auburn the Land Grant college. And then also Alabama State and Alabama A&amp;M which are both historically black schools. 

And thus you have bills which funded the opening of new state schools, and some decided to change their names. Oklahoma State for instance began as Oklahoma A&amp;M, Virginia Tech never got away from keeping the science part of its mission out of the name. 

Practically there is no difference outside of the school's funding preferences at times, or better programs now at one or the other. Likely only one has a law school per state, and the other might have the only Veterinary Med program. Legacies of their founding missions.Would be interested in seeing them do it again. the market and products to pick from have so greatly changed in the past 6-7 years. ANY plane Canada chooses to buy will be at least 3-4 years before a squadron is operational.

Production lines either have other customers ahead, or are not at full scale yet.

Then there is the fact that pilots need to be trained to fly it, ground crew needs to be taught how to fix it, and units need to be converted to it.  And both the B and A variants of the F-35 have begun to be delivered with both the US Air Force and Marine Corps already establishing the nucleus of squadrons. 

Because the two major bodies that could do it. The ICC and possibly the ICJ have no way to either arrest or compel the US to cooperate or stand trial.

The ICC is governed by a treaty the US never ratified, and that the US has only recently aided and cooperated with at all. 

And both the ICC and the ICJ (part of the UN), have nothing bu the UN Security Council and the force of arms of their member states to back up decisions. The US has permanent veto over the UNSC, and nobody is willing to go to war with the US to try to put a politician or soldier on trial. The South's Least Exciting RivalryYOU SAY THAT LIKE ITS A BAD THING. Often times, if they had served conspicuously it had no negative impact on their careers.

2 we can look at here. One is Elliot Buckmaster, who was Captain of the YORKTOWN, he had assumed command in Feb of 1941, and led her through the first 6 months of the war, the early carrier raids, Coral Sea, and her sinking at Midway. He even led a party aboard the abandoned ship and had gotten her under tow when an IJN sub found her and finished her off with torpedoes. 

He was then placed in command of the Navy's Primary Flight Training program, using his experience as one of the 2 most veteran carrier drivers in the navy to publish the fleet's first wartime flight training manual, and the massive expansion of the home of naval aviation in Pensacola. Her also put on his first star and became a Rear Admiral at this time, and was then sent back out in 1944 as the Commander, Western Carolines Operating Area. He retired a Vice Admiral.

We also then have Charles McVay, the CO of the INDIANPOLIS, who of the +300 ships to be lost by the USN in the war was the only one Court martialed over it. Found guilty for not "Zig Zagging" despite testimony from the Capt of the Japanese Sub that sunk him, he was exonerated by Nimitz, and even promoted eventually to Rear Admiral, but he never again held a command and was mostly in staff duties for the few years he remained active. 

Most experiences fell somewhere in between, but those are just 2 notable cases of Captains who lost prominent ships to enemy action. In general the President enjoys broad protection for acts he approved of while in office. 

There is a good deal of truth to the line from Nixon "When the President does it its not illegal" now that doesn't mean he cant for instance not pay his taxes, but it does mean we vest the position with decision making when using force.

The President is not subject to the Uniform Code of Military Justice, and while the US has agreed to the Geneva Convention, there is now actual law on the books requiring or punishing non compliance. I support it because Im a white male, and have a college degree, I have literally never had it better in the history of the world. Canada was a full partner in combat operations from the get go in 2001 in Afghanistan. 

With at times more than 3000 troops in country, and even commanding the joint NATO mission, and in turn several key provinces including Kabul and Kandahar. 

They also in 2006 led the attempts to clear the Panjwayi District leading to protected combat missions, with Canadian formation actively in combat not just in support roles. It was only in 2011 that alongside their US and NATO allies too that the Canadian Forces drew down their combat mission to focus on training. Since the Craig movies have shown no inclination to have continuity with the older films, knowing what they have established and the state of things at the end of Skyfall should be sufficient.  For real, Squirrel Girl was the best Sunspot could get?

Sure I know a lot of mutants are bailing because the InHumans are dick's poisoning the planet, but he couldtn get a single other old New Mutant to hop on board? 

Where the Hell is Guthrie? Still in space with his new family? What about Magma, they were close.

Or Dani, you saying having Hel's top Valkyrie on the team wouldn't be an upgrade? 

Or fuck it, just see if Magik is board, Lord knows she is probably the most dangerous and powerful mutant around right now. FUCKIN GOT'EMGetting stabbed a few times and then doused in gasoline will tend to do that. The problem being that if we rely upon a signal relayed by satellite from the Pilot to the UAV, then that is the obvious weak point to go after. The technology exists today to either jam or hijack even for a shot time that signal, or in a war before first world states you just take out the satellite and then the drone just became useless. 

The other choice being to create a completely autonomous UAV, which besides the ethical issues of that has a whole host of practical issues currently.

An idea in the works is to slave multiple UCAV's to one manned aircraft, so that it will mostly be Line of Sight communication, less easy to jam, and more timely. Maybe eventually. 

The idea being that say you have an F-35 go in with a handful of Reapers slaved to it, they check the target out, maybe soften it a bit, handle any aircraft in the area. Then a larger aircraft maybe a modified C-130 drops a payload of missiles or even more drones which use the targeting info from the F-35 to complete the strike.

https://medium.com/war-is-boring/darpa-s-vision-of-future-war-swarms-of-missiles-and-drones-247493c1e4c2#.7qqt4iw53

The USN is also looking into the possibility of slaving the eventual production version of the X-47B to either their F-35's or even their Super Hornets, especially the Electronic Warfare Growler models, would mean they have more teeth than previously and the NFO in the back seat means fewer tasks for the pilot to do by themselves.

The X-47B: https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/6/64/A_U.S._Navy_X-47B_Unmanned_Combat_Air_System_makes_an_arrested_landing_aboard_the_aircraft_carrier_USS_George_H.W._Bush_%28CVN_77%29_as_the_ship_conducts_flight_operations_in_the_Atlantic_Ocean_off_the_coast_of_Vir_130710-N-LE576-002.jpg Who are you going to be shooting at? The Red Barron isn't exactly tearing up the shies any more...&gt; -The F-4 was designed without a cannon which meant that it couldn't perform its primary role which was dog-fighting over Vietnam; this was "fixed" with the addition of an external gunpod that screwed up the aerodynamics of the plane and was prone to jamming

Fucking couldn't be more wrong.

The USAF added eventually internal gun and barely managed a 2:1 kill ratio in Vietnam.

The USN NEVER added a gun, taught better tactics, better maintenance, and built better missiles, 6:1 kill ratio.

In 1991 the A-10 was the MOST shot down aircraft in the coalition fleet, and were withdrawn from frontline strikes by the end of the campaign.  So it still having lost the most of any type, while also having had fewer of the type in the campaign is a good thing then? Good luck operating them through the winter when the company that built them doesn't even exist any more. The USAF had to open up bidding over the summer to other companies to reinforce the aging wing struts for instance. 

And im saying that was against a moderately effective Soviet Knockoff system. In this age of even more numerous export systems, and when any John with a pickup and black scarf can get his hands on a few MANPADS, do we expect it to do better now? The modern battlefield includes MORE threats to a slow, low aircraft, not less. 

And that is an interesting claim by the guy defending his airframe when 2 of the 3 most deadly Friendly Fire incidents from airstrikes during the 91 war were from A-10's. Guess being low and slow wasn't enough to ID the targets as friendly. Laziness didn't win the Revolution. 

Didn't want us improving the language? Should've tried harder. The use of the rank of "Commodore" in the USN is actually a neat history.

Until the Civil War there were no Admirals, this was intentional on the part of the US, so the term was used informally for the senior Capt in squadrons when the few US ships operated together, with the rank of "Flag Officer" eventually being created to ensure US officers were given the same respect as their foreign counterparts. 

With the acceptance of the need for admirals essentially the rank of Rear-Admiral is split in half with the 1stars being Lower Half, 2 stars Upper Half. 

Then come WW2 there are a great deal of Captains which held commands of large size and import but not quite of an Admiral. Admiral king suggested and FDR agreed to bring back the rank of Commodore for O-7 for these positions, but by 1947 it was again phased out. 

The other services though got mad that USN and USCG 1 stars were given the same honors and courtesies as a 2 star, and in 82 Commodore was tried again but it didn't last a whole year.

So today we still have the 1 Star as Rear Admiral (Lower Half), while Captains in command of Squadrons of Destroyers or Submarines, and some other formations are allowed to have the honorary title of Commodore and fly a special pennant from the flagship. That was only an error if you didn't mean to bomb the site. 

From a purely utilitarian point of view you have now denied the enemy in their recently taken city a place that could have kept their fighters alive or better fit. 

And I think Canada's problem is that it doesn't even know what it wants in an aircraft. The F-35 is probably the best package for a multi role aircraft that will last you going forward. If only because big brother is buying so many youll never need to worry about spare parts or needing to practice working together. 

But if Canada intends to withdraw from cooperating or participating in interventions, then do they just need a short legged point defense fighter, but even then the damn area to cover means it needs some range. The law on the books for Virginia for instance, did not speak at all too the Asian population, but ONLY to marriage between black and white. 

That was actually appoint during the Supreme Court's hearing of Loving v. Virginia, where because the law only spoke about 2 races, it was clearly racially biased and thus violated the Equal Protection clause. The argument for Virginia was that because a Legislature is not psychic and there were so few Asians in the state at the time of the writing of the law they should not have had to contend with that set of circumstances, and that since both white and non white were punished equally it was not biased the Court took a  dim view of that argument. Can we get a do over and try the year over with Fuller healthy this time?The rank Rear Admiral actually comes from the days of actual lines of battle. 

The junior most admiral was placed in command of the last portion of the line with limited autonomy amd to follow the lead of the Vice snd Full Admiral.

He was the Admiral of the actual rear ships.The story is related in Genesis from the Old Testament, and is known as the "Binding of Isaac." 

The Old Testament, God of the Hebrews is actually really vengeful at times and doesnt take shit from people, this story takes place just a few chapters in Genesis after Jehovah destroys the cities of Sodom and Gomorrah, with Abraham's nephew Lot and his family being the only ones spared when they were found to be righteous attempting to protect some undercover Angels whom a mob wanted to rape. But while escaping in defiance of God's command to not look back, Lot's wife does and is turned to a pillar of salt for it, while he and his daughters escape to a cave where realizing there are no men for them to marry around for now they get him drunk and rape him to conceive.  While funny this clip is actually not far off: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bar3GOzDNzg

The order to bind Isaac is basically then one more test from God to see both how loyal Abraham is, and how much he fear's disobeying God, and the answer was enough to sacrifice his son on the fire if he had to. And on the practical level that this new faith would not tolerate human sacrifice. Abraham is then one of the 3 Patriarchs, followed by Isaac, and then Isaac's son Jacob. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Binding_of_IsaacShe didnt do that bad babysitting the O5 for a few issues, kept them fed, didnt let them die. 

Would also be a much more unhinged, probably fun dynamic with Wiccan. and at the end of the day has more field experience and power levels than anyone on the roster. 

The Soul sword isnt to be fucked with, she has consitently shown surprisingly creative use of teleporting, and she sort of absorbed all of Limbo and is now training to be a future Sorcerer Supreme, that is exactly who I would want as the heavy hitter on a roster. What about if you have just like, a little bit or Orange to help highlight your very dark Red?Or you could combine it with black and you have yourself one of the coolest uniforms ever worn in college football history: http://assets.sbnation.com/assets/429659/DSCN0588.jpgHe was 5'6" dont believe all the Coalition propaganda. And he sort of did accomplish his initial goal in Russia, he burned Moscow to the ground after all. So he got farther than Hitler at the least, and doing it on foot. 

He also single handedly almost brought the conduct of war from the last vestiges of the Feudal levy system to the modern national effort where all are expected to contribute. He was a Corsican General in France during the Revolution who won a string of spectacular victories over the Austrians in Italy, and later the Turks in Egypt. 

He used the popularity to make himself Consul, and later Emperor. He fought multiple wars with virtually the entity of Europe allied against him, and WON. At its peak the French Empire stretched from Lisbon, Portugal, all the way the Russian border. 

He would lose most of his army in Russia, and his rebuilt Grand Armee was defeated in 1814, and after a shot exile he returned to France for 100 days until his final defeat at Waterloo.

He oversaw a massive modernization in the government structure of France, cementing for a time the opening of the social structure, rewrote the legal codes (the Napoleonic Codes), and transformed warfare from set piece methodical engagements to one of maneuver, and built the foundation of modern artillery and logistics. Man, you'd have thought a real conference would have invited them by now with that kind of resume. 

I guess ODU, Coastal Carolina, and App State were all just more attractive. Wonder if Liberty will even get asked to dance first? Let that win keep you warm through the years and years on the periphery of the sport, statistically speaking you were bound to catch Beamer once, he certainly piled up the wins against JMU before that. Do joke programs win their P5 conference that same year? Proof right here and now or I say you are a liar and an ignorant fool. Clinton's charge in the Impeachment hearings was for Purgery. 

The charge was that he lied under oath about his relations with Lewinsky. That falls under what the Constitution says he can be Impeached(basically the Congress votes on if he should be removed from office, NOT a criminal trial), being a "High Crime or Misdemeanor." He was not voted to be Impeached in the end.

There isn't a ton of evidence that anyone in the Bush Administration out right LIED about anything. But that they trusted intelligence that other sources were highly skeptical of. There is no law saying what sources they have to trust, basically they got tunnel vision and only gave credit to intel that supported what they wanted it to. And while that is bad leadership it is not in and of itself against the law. Man its gonna suck when everyone wakes up Saturday to realize what a sad excuse for a school they are being forced to see gameday at. 

Name one other school that has a shred of dignity that has a 4 lane highway running through it. JMU is the definition of 2nd tier, the best thing about Harrisonburg is that you can drive right through it to places youd actually want to visit or get an education at. Most were yea, since Iraq spent the 90's under heavy sanctions, but they still existed, not in good enough shape to be fired from artillery, but who knows that would have made for some nasty IED's.  Very True and well said pointing it out, just really trying to convey that he was seen as half foreign at worst, and a quint provincial at best for much of his career. OP KNOW YOUR OWN TEAM'S HISTORY. 

In 2005 week 2 it was at Pitt for ND@Pitt, Pitt plays at Heinz Field MILES away from Campus, went just fine...

They were also there in 2003 when VT was @ Pitt. 

They have managed for multiple trips to Miami as well, where even the old Orange Bowl was nowhere near the stadium. If Gameday can figure it out for Pitt and Miami I think they can do Philly...And those Clemson orange Bowl Champs, and those VT Orange Bowl Champs, and those Georgia Tech, Orange Bowl Champs.

If you are unfamiliar, a Bowl Game is what schools that matter go to at the end of the year. Writing a whole lot of checks with that mouth of yours, it might be time you included a single bit of supporting evidence.

Because unless JMU bulldozed every dining hall on campus, and reinvented every single one of their hard science departments over night that's a pretty bold claim. 

SMU, Miami, and Texas all might want words with you broski. 

And sure it blows. But ya know what, if 7-6 seasons is our low point I will take it. That is winning football. We haven't had a losing season since the 1st Bush Administration, hell JMU had one in 2010. 

Man for a Master you sure aren't very knowledgeable. Yes. in 1775 very early on in the war Lord Dunmore, the Royal Governor of Virginia holed up in Norfolk, issued "Dunmore's Proclamation"

He promised the slaves of Patriots freedom if they would leave their masters and take up arms against them. He had some success and some free black and runaway units were founded by the British, but they were not very notable and used mostly in labor duties. There is a promo shot of him just walking calmly out of a warehouse WHILE ON FIRE, then in burned clothes standing talking to Jessica, looks like at some point we see he don't take shit. yep, just doesn't go around doing stuff as much. Marvel aint got no chill. only took 6 triesSo are you a fool, illiterate, or a liar. 

Id believe any from a Duke. Its not like they are shy about teams appearing multiple times, or even HOSTING multiple times, but the whole never having been to Philly seems like it might be a big draw. Any other "facts" you want to peddle out as truth? So now you are saying that pre/early season polls are reliable?

That 2012 USC really was #1? So are you a fool, illiterate, or a liar. 

Id believe any from a Duke.

Still waiting for the answer. 
6-1! 

Hint that's the schools records vs each other. Really you don't like having buildings that don't fall down, food that wont make you sick, computers that work, and ya know everything else that you can thank the hard sciences for? Nah. in the 1999 season for instance they came to Blacksburg twice in 6 weeks. 

2014 they were @FSU AND @Bama twice. 1906 is a pretty good date, NCAA formed and Forward pass allowed, along with allowing the QB to advance the football. Yes, national champs used to be selected before the bowls, that's why the Heisman is still given out before them. Empires today tend to be more trouble than they are worth.

It involves having to actually spending resources blood, and treasure administering other areas of various enthusiasm for the situation. The US HAD a colonial empire for 50 years and it didn't really benefit us. And what did taking Spain's empire do to help the US.

The nice thing for the US and Russia, is that they are so bug they already HAVE most of the resources that are needed, they dotn have to waste resources taking them from elsewhere. Hi, Im a Hokie.

It isn't a castrated Turkey, it isn't a mythical animal.

Its a made up word from an old timey cheer. 

We then for years were called the Gobblers and had a simple local boy parade a trained turkey along the sidelines. But Hokie is at least mildly more aggressive than Fighting Gobbler, so in the 50's and 60's it gradually shifted. From 2009 to 2011 we recruited just 4!!!!! O linemen in those classes combined. That is where it starts.

Essentially we had 3 years where we had a ton of whiffs and missed on big targets, like losing Bryn Renner, EJ Manual, and Tajh Boyd at QB forcing the Logan Thomas switch from TE. 

We never recruited tops but always landed about 30-40% of the top talent in Virginia, but our 2010-2011 coaching shake up also burned a lot of bridges in the 757, and UVA took advantage for a few years(not any more) by going after 7on7 teams for guys like Quin Blanding. 

As for being a nobody if 7-6 is our basement I will take it gladly, that is still a winning season, consider that 92 was our last losing season, that is nothing to shake a stick at. Sounds good so long as we all refer to it as the Temple of Doom. Man you love that doggy dick don't you? 

Or do you have some sort of purple fetish, is that it?

You can say, this is a safe place. Really, because according to this, they kind of don't...

http://colleges.usnews.rankingsandreviews.com/best-colleges/virginia-polytechnic-institute-and-state-university-233921/overall-rankings

http://colleges.usnews.rankingsandreviews.com/best-colleges/james-madison-university-232423/overall-rankings

Full list because fuck paywalls: http://www.university-list.net/us/rank/univ-0036.htm (Engineering, JMU falls all the way to the mid 60's for non PhD granting schools while VT sits at 15 for PhD granting schools)

Business schools, VT #39, JMU#113: http://www.university-list.net/us/rank/univ-0021.htm

But I know using the internet is hard for certain types, the lazy, the illiterate, the uneducated, the /u/Master_Of_Knowledge 's of the world. 
For the record I was talking about all the things that a "Tech school that hicks go to" provide the world.

Your case for having a degree from a reputable school is not looking so good, that critical reading ability bro. Must be the presence of those fine institutions of higher learning in UR and VCU, the fun likable 2nd tier schools in the state, not the one named for a Patriot but using Royalty as a mascot. Good I hope they have a good time and enjoy the weekend. 

I care nothing for the school personally and land somewhere from mild disdain to indifference, but it will be nice for ESPN to feature the gorgeous Shenandoah Valley some more. I-81 that it came down runs literally through the middle of the school and town, probably had some people on the lookout for it. Needs of the Service, Needs of the Service, Needs of the Service.

Those are literally the only words that you need to know about this. While most commands are not heartless and care about doing what they can to improve the quality of life of their soldiers, sailors, air men, marines, they have a mission and that is above all. The needs of the service supersede everything else at the end of the day, you know that from day one. Hey we still beat the total score, 6-3 vs 6-2!They have 20k undergrads, they aren't small, just under utilized potential. I mean for what its worth having an interstate through the middle of the campus isn't a great look, but the school is one of the bigger in Virginia. If it means we get to spend the next 5 years talking about how Cyclops was Right, AGAIN, im for it. 

The Avengers definitely come out initially looking like the assholes in AvX, what with Cap going all storming Utopia and all. Not really, but be on the lookout for an XvI in the future. 

Consider also that of the 2 current primary Avengers teams, 1 is OWNED by a Mutant. And Abnett is back writing a Cosmic Marvel book. Cant wait for "Cyclops destroys the Disney Board of Directors" Meh, if you guys never win another game, thatd be just all right with me, but I would be hypocritical to deny the key role gameday played in VT's rise, and to begrudge other schools using it too. Iceman should be up there. 

Everyone forgets Bobby is actually an Omega level mutant right there with Jean Grey and Legion. His power isn't actually creating ice, but to psychically alter the vibration and thus friction and thus heat of everything around him, plus the whole he can create clones to fight with him out of it. 

he has gone all "Day After Tomorrow" on more than one occasion just covering worlds in ice and snow. He is not to be fucked with.What do you have against limestone or collegiate gothic? 

Ours is no different than say West Point. Both are gorgeous. Because we dont have an interstate through campus to begin with. Hey ya know they have managed to beat us more recently than UVA. And you wouldnt know a good school if it fell in your lap, that illiteracy really seems to be a problem, I would look at some adult learning if I were you. So you dont like safe food? ARE YOU A PLANT THAT GETS ITS ENERGY FROM THE SUN?

Is that what you are trying to tell us? Or Craigslist: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jim_Buckmaster

Or even FOUNDING JMU!: http://spec.lib.vt.edu/archives/125th/pres/burruss.htmSee a good deal of rustled jimmies or steamed broccoli about Hokies on he part of a few JMU fans over the past week.

First off, good for you guys have the party of the decade this weekend, the team earned it. 

Second, consider some of that hate, especially Jullian Burruss, key founder and 1st President of JMU was a VPI Grad, and LEFT JMU to come back to Blacksburg. Where amongst other things he adopted the collegiate Gothic and limestone motif for the campus.  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Julian_Ashby_Burruss

So feel free to hate on Hokie Stone, just remember your founder picked it out...

But I digress, give ESPN one hell of a show tomorrow! And you know who picked the style? JMU's first President who left the job to come back to his alma mater.And Counter-Strike: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Jess_CliffeI mean a tire fire would with the words "Richmond" written on it would still be a nicer place than JMU. God that REALLY makes me start to feel old. That was my Freshman year and very first home game, was in the band so had been up to the Boise game 5 days before, just a whirlwind of confusion is all I remember. So you would instead have students cower in fear and weakness like you would? Instead of saying "Fuck you media spin this is what community is about" 

Are you actually saying that we should let ourselves be intimidated by violence and extremism?

/u/Master_Of_Knowledge WHY DO YOU WANT THE TERRORISTS TO WIN?!?!And yet he was just that, the 2nd.

/u/Master_Of_Knowledge WHY DO YOU WANT THE TERRORISTS TO WIN?!?!

Also continuing to talk out of the ass, with no sourcing whatsoever, really putting that assumed college degree to work I see. I mean when the road through town is the most notable thing in the area where else would people congregate?

/u/Master_Of_Knowledge WHY DO YOU WANT THE TERRORISTS TO WIN?!?!And then the founder came home to VPI and did one better.

/u/Master_Of_Knowledge WHY DO YOU WANT THE TERRORISTS TO WIN?!?!Can you point out where it runs between campus buildings or actual sections of campus?

/u/Master_Of_Knowledge WHY DO YOU WANT THE TERRORISTS TO WIN?!?!I actually had no idea and had to google it. I also worked in Burruss Hall (the main one you see in all the pictures) and it was something of an inside joke we all shared, especially since Hokie Stone does get some hate. 

Just a fun bit of obscure SWVA college history!Really because you are advocating here accepting that violence is all consuming of communities, that nothing can be done to change it, and that everyone should just cower in fear.

YOU ARE ADVOCATING GIVING IN TO HATE AND VIOLENCE.

/u/Master_Of_Knowledge WHY DO YOU WANT THE TERRORISTS TO WIN?!?!What did he do first then?

He wasnt first, he didnt grant the first degrees, so now Im actually interested in what he did, I assume the school grew under his tenure.

Also I want to know: /u/Master_Of_Knowledge WHY DO YOU WANT THE TERRORISTS TO WIN?!?!Yep, you can pack those Jersey cast offs in tight. 

/u/Master_Of_Knowledge WHY DO YOU WANT THE TERRORISTS TO WIN?!?!Just remind them they have a Hokie to thank for even being a school. Come back now, we have 2 flairless trolls going at it!You know I always wondered where they got the stock footage they have for so many schools, I assumed they were just given it by the schools from random other events, but that makes sense. Right after they do one on the 1912 Carlisle Indian School.

Coached by Pop Warner and Captained by Jim Thorpe and in two years upset Harvard, and then bushwhacked Army 27-6. It was one of the greatest upsets of all time, and one that had all the racial and social trappings one would expect between teams made of young men whose fathers, and grandfathers had fought each other on the field of battle.

On one play Thorpe rushed 92 yards for a TD but it was called back on a penalty, the next snap he rushed for a 97 yard TD!

Dwight Eisenhower who was on that Army team later said of Thorpe: Here and there, there are some people who are supremely endowed. My memory goes back to Jim Thorpe. He never practiced in his life, and he could do anything better than any other football player I ever saw."

And then just because he was bored Thorpe a few months later won 2 Gold Medals for the US at the Olympics!

Seriously he may have been top 5 all time athletes ever produced on American soil, and his story as a native American in the last and waning days of the West makes it all the more incredible. The school was closed in 1918, and remains the winningest defunct football program.

Seriously THIS was the speech Warner was said to have given his team before playing Army, there is a wonderful article series about the team, and their pioneering of the forward pass and spread principals, but we NEED a 30 for 30 on them.  

"\u201cYour fathers and your grandfathers, are the ones who fought their fathers. These men playing against you today are soldiers. They are the Long Knives. You are Indians. Tonight, we will know if you are warriors.\u201dTrue enough. But both schools also only became large general universities within about 30 years between the end of WW1 and 1950.

VT just had the whole focus of being the state's first and primary Land 